Part 1. Chapter 1 to 61.
“It has constipation.”
“What?” The principal opened his mouth, aghast. His face showed a mixture of
disbelief and shock.
“What did you just…”
“It’s not defecating well.”
The principal looked even more taken aback, if that was even possible. How is that
even possible? He wanted to say that aloud to this young woman, but his face turned
red as she looked at the elementary kids wandering and running around with their
backpacks.
Lee-yeon stroked the tree stem gently. She didn’t like him at all. She had had her fair
share of such reactions before.
“Defecation is important. It’s a completely natural and regular thing. You know that,
of course.”
The principal coughed as if he was annoyed. But he smirked as he covered his mouth,
As expected, she is stupid and mad.
It cost tens and thousands of dollars to fix a few trees. He would rather cut them down
than spend so much money on them. He contacted a shabby business run by this
young woman instead of the big hospital in the city, just in case.
After re-injuring the treated tree, he was going to blame it on this absurd tree doctor.
At least, that was his plan.
“This tree is one of the main trees in our school. It is the symbol of greenness. Will you
be able to fix it for us?” The principal lowered his eyebrows and asked earnestly.
His plan was simple. He wanted to accuse her and get a refund for the damages done.
Then he would cut the tree down anyway. At least it would benefit his school in that
way.
“Consider it done,” came the honest answer. “The treatment process is not very
difficult. To put it simply, it couldn’t defecate properly after eating so it had developed
constipation. It couldn’t lay its roots properly.” Lee-yeon looked around the school
field and frowned. “If trees don’t defecate well, they start dying from the top. Most of
them seem to be already in that process here.”
“So, how will the treatment process go?” asked the principal, reluctantly. He stared at
Lee-yeon from head to toe. Tattered trousers, soil in the nails and a strong smell of
fertilizers. He felt that she was dirty. Her clear face was smudged with soil and her
hair, tied down to the nape of her neck, looked like drooping seaweed. Filthy. This
woman has no appeal. I have another tree dying right in front of me. In addition to
that, her soft twinkling eyes looked dull and dry when facing people. She looked pale
and skinny.
“Principal.”
“Yes, yes.” The principal answered overly politely as if he had been caught.
“All the soil here needs to be replaced by Masato soil.”
“All?”
“Yes. That’s the cause of this. The trees can’t defecate well because of the soil. By the
way…” Her gaze sharpened. “You saved your money, didn’t you?”
Lee-yeon walked around the principal with a dubious face. “Did you bury something
there?”
“What?”
“I heard the school was recently remodeled.” “Tiles?”
The principal’s shoulders flinched.
“Left-over cement?”
“Cement plastic bags are also possible…”
“Or all of the together…”
The principal wiped the sweat from his forehead and avoided her gaze. ‘How does she
know that?’ To save the cost of waste disposal, the waste was instead buried in the
ground. Nobody knew this but the scruffy tree doctor knew everything.
“When those materials meet water, they become as hard as a rock. They contaminate
the soil. The roots cannot grow, and they rot. Once we dig the ground, we’ll find
everything anyway. I’ll send you the estimate sheet by today.” Lee-yeon smiled
innocently, wiping her sweat with the flower-patterned handkerchief that was tied
around her neck. But her smile didn’t reach her cold and sharp eyes. “Of course, I will
have to report this to the city hall first.”
The principal approached her in a hurry with a sullen expression on his face. “Ddoctor, please listen to me…”
“You were happy to have saved your money, weren’t you?” She looked at him. “Now,
payback double or triple the amount of fine. As I said, defecating is very important for
plants as well as humans.”
Lee-yeon turned around in contentment. She sighed. She knew her only staff back at
the hospital would nag at her for leaving this opportunity. She turned to the principal
again. She hated playing politics, but the promotion and upgrade of her hospital was
also important. It was the most important thing right now.
“I’m a doctor who loves her trees,” said she, “I am the best at saving the trees, but I
am also good at weeding out harmful…things.” ‘Especially people like you’, she said
inwardly. Dozens of trees were damaged by this stupid, selfish human’s greed and yet
he talks about how the tree is the symbol for this school. These were the kind of
people who destroyed forests to use leaves as their ashtrays.
“Please visit our Spruce Tree Hospital more often.” She forced herself to smile
sweetly.
Lee-yeon is a tree doctor who runs a small tree hospital on an island located on
Hwaido, Geunil-myeon, Hwayang City, close to Tongyeong to the west and Namhae to
the south. Although it seems like an underdeveloped island, it is surprisingly the
second largest island in Korea. It is a very beautiful and scenic tourist destination
known for its sea, plants and rocks.
‘The old man looked at me very weirdly’… Lee-yeon’s job was like that. She had to
carry tools such as ladders, knives, saws, scissors and so on. She had to climb trees
and inspect it as part of her job. So, people looked at Lee-yeon as though she was a
wild animal.
There were so many clients who called upon a ‘female’ doctor because they charged
less otherwise, they would be out of business. The clients took advantage of the fact.
Lee-yeon was already over thirty years old. She was used to that kind of treatment by
now.
She was driving her scooter along the road overseeing the emerald sea when her
phone rang. She plugged the earphones to her ears and took the call. “Hello?”
“Hey, director,” said a voice on the other end, “If you don’t come within five minutes, I
will unlock the 2nd floor.”

The scooter, which was going straight, leaned to the side. Lee-yeon hurriedly
straightened the scooter again and spoke in a hurry.
“Manager, wait!”
“I heard it clearly. There was a sound!”
“You must’ve heard it wrong. It’s an empty room so how can there be any sound?”
“Look, I am sure I heard something.”
Lee-yeon kept a calm mind but she speeded up her scooter. The clear, usually calm
scenery of Hwaido passed in a blur.
“I am sorry. I have already called the locksmith.”
“No!” she exclaimed. Eventually, her calm demeanor broke. She raked her mind to
find a convincing reason to dissuade her manager, but she beat Lee-yeon to it.
“Stop your lies!” said the manager, “Stop telling me that you locked the room because
water veins are growing. I am also tired of hearing that you are drying chilies and
soyabeans in that room!”
“It’s—”
“Are you a bluebeard or something? Why do you keep forbidding me from opening
that door? It doesn’t matter to me even if you have made a harem of men in that
room!”
Lee-yeon mouth opened wide. Gye Choo-ja, who turned sixty this year, was an arborist
who helped Lee-yeon with tree treatment. She also helped manage the hospital.
Spruce Tree Hospital was So Lee-yeon’s, who turned thirty-two this year. She was
single so she would hardly have a harem of men in the said room.
Manager Gye always wanted to open the room on the second floor whenever Lee-yeon
left Wangjin. And today, she had found her moment. It was understandable that Gye
Choo-ja was curious and upset from having things hidden from her. But manager,
thought Lee-yeon, ‘I really can’t show you the second floor!’ It had been two years that
the room on the second floor was treated with secrecy and mystery. A peculiar plant
was hidden there, which shouldn’t be discovered by others, no matter what.

‘Spruce Tree Hospital’ was engraved in a beautiful font on a wooden plank that hung
precariously, dropped down as Lee-yeon rushed into the hospital. The house which
was shabby was stained with ivory color. However, the second floor was colored in a
more urban gray tone which looked odd when compared to the lower floors.
She passed the first floor which was commonly used simultaneously as an office and a
home. She ran up the stairs in a hurry. “Manager!” she called.
“Damn it!” said Gye Choo-ja. The locksmith was already there, about to break the lock
on the door. Lee-yeon stood there, panting.
“I’m so sick of this, for real.”
“I told you already,” panted Lee-yeon, “There is another owner here, so I am not
allowed to go in either. That is why I am leaving it empty.” That was half true, half a
lie.
“Really? You aren’t allowed to go in?” said Gye Choo-ja, folding her hands in front of
her. “So, how did you dry chilies and soyabeans in there then?”
“That… um…”
“Let me just sniff the air inside this ‘empty’ room for once then.”
“The air might be moldy. There has been no ventilation.” Lee-yeon persuades her.
“Really? You don’t trust me, do you? Even if you hid gold and diamonds in there, I
would never steal them.”
‘I wouldn’t mind even if you stole my gold and diamonds’, thought Lee-yeon. She
smiled awkwardly at Gye Choo-ja and made a gesture to head back downstairs.
“Curiosity killed the cats, Manager.”
“You are a liar! Why don’t you talk like that with your clients?”
“But, for real…”
Gye Choo-ja thought that the tree doctor had looked easy going in the beginning but
as she continued her dealings with her clients who were mostly condescending men in
their forties, especially civil engineers, architects and from agricultural industries, her
distrust seem to show no signs of improving.
“Director, I’m not giving up until I know the truth,” declared Gye Choo-ja sternly, as
she retreated downstairs. Lee-yeon slumped to the floor. ‘This damned second floor…’
She closed her eyes, feeling tired.

The bed was surrounded with various machines. The machines beeped and were
connected to the man lying on the bed. Those were the only things keeping him alive.
It was hard to tell the age of the man. With his eyes closed and his head slightly to the
left, he seemed like any other person sound asleep. This large body had gradually
shrunk over the past two years. The skin on his arms and legs had thinned down.
However, his wide, angular shoulders were the same as the night Lee-yeon saw him in
the mountains.
Lee-yeon sat by the patient releasing a huge sigh. It had been two years since the
incident but there were no improvements. She ran her hands through her face to get
rid of the fatigue. Even though she was a doctor, she was a doctor for the trees not for
humans. This man – even in a vegetative state- was still a man, not a tree.
That night still played in Lee-yeon’s mind like a movie.
‘Don’t you need to run away?’
When she swung her tool, her power saw, to protect herself the man did not move an
inch that day. There were clearly bloodstains on the tip of the saw but that didn’t
matter to him. He did not move.
Lee-yeon remembered thinking that she would breathe her last breath there. She had
turned around one last time to look at her killer. The moment she turned around and
met the eyes of the man. He had stopped. She saw him clenching his jaw tightly, as if
in pain. And slowly but surely his heavy body fell to the ground with a thud.
It was evident that someone had struck him from behind with a stone, that now lay
beside the body stained with blood. The attacker was the man who would have been
buried alive if Lee-yeon had not been spotted. The attacker stood tall covered with dirt
and blood. He staggered looking at the body he had just attacked and as he tried to
open his eyes he collapsed and rolled down the hill.
Sitting in that room now Lee-yeon felt chills running down her spine thinking of how
easily she could have died that night. Now in this room filled with nothing but
machines and silence, she looked at the body lying on the bed.
“Kwon Chae-woo,” she quietly spoke. The name still awkward on her tongue, “please
don’t wake up” she continued. Pressing her temples, she took a deep breath. All she
wanted was a quiet life ever since she ran away from home. For Lee-yeon an ordinary
and boring life was a privilege what she yearned for.
“Please don’t wake up,” she whispered.
Lee-yeon buried her face in her hands because of the fatigue. At that moment, the
man’s finger slightly moved.
“Lee-yeon, it’s time to make some changes.” Gye Choo-ja said with a slight sparkle in
her eyes as she showed her phone screen to Lee-yeon.
“What’s this?” asked Lee-yeon curiously, stopping from jotting in her treatment diary.
“Do you know Soleil Landscaping Company?”
Lee-yeon nodded. Everyone knew the landscaping company. There were well know all
throughout the region for their huge projects.
“He’s the son of the president of Soleil Landscaping Company,” said Choo-ja wiggling
her eyebrows.
Lee-yeon rolled her eyes at Gye Choo-ja’s excitement and checked in picture in her
phone. “Oh” she said as she withdrew her gaze from the picture and started writing in
her diary again. Choo-ja furrowed her eyebrows at Lee-yeon’s disinterest in the
picture.
“This is it? A simple ‘OH’,” asked Choo-ja baffled.
“Manager, don’t you think he is a little too young for you to be dating him. He can be
mistaken for your grandson,” voiced Lee-yeon still focused on her diary.
“Not me, you!” replied Choo-ja.
“What?!” exclaimed Lee-yeon confused with where this conversation was headed.
We can’t continue with our jobs. We’ve hit the limit. Our major contracts have all
ended and D hospital’s taking over all the other projects,” said Choo-ja with a soft
voice. Lee-yeon could see the sadness in her eyes which she reciprocated. She
clenched her jaw to cover the anger and frustration rising in her chest.
D University Agricultural Biology Department Hospital. A large tree hospital that built
a new five-story building and has its own research lab.
D Hospital, which entered Hwaido, aggressively provided entertainment to
landscaping companies, nurseries, civil works, and agricultural corporations. They
eventually took Hwaido by storm, everyone wanted them to take over contracts. This
gave them resources to build a five-story building housing their own research lab.
With these developments taking place, Lee-yeon’s hospital barely survived. Their
contracts disappeared overnight and with the loss of majority of their projects, the
hospital depended on medical examinations at the town hall, and other few clients
opting for cheaper rates.
“We have to do something about our situation! We can’t give up,” voiced Choo-ja
desperately. Pacing around the room.
“Then what should we do?!” Close our hospital and work at the D Hospital?!” spoke
Lee-yeon. That’s what Hwaido’s entrepreneurs had been doing.
“Sorry Manager. I didn’t mean to shout at you,” apologised Lee-yeon feeling bad about
dumping her frustrations on her colleague.
“I don’t mind. Do you want to go work in the D Hospital and write curses on the
bathroom stalls?” Choo-ja snickered as she spoke. Remembering the time Lee-yeon
threw manure at their construction crane and ran away during an environmental
protest against a golf course permit.
“I know you are very clever, but you could try to steal the contract back,” said Choo-ja
slyly holding out her phone to Lee-yeon. Seeing the mischievous gleam in Choo-ja’s
eyes, Lee-yeon immediately hardened her face. She showed me a picture of the man
and it was obvious what she was going to say next.
“All you need to do is have tea with him.”
“W-what? Don’t be crazy,” said Lee-yeon and took a step back trying to process what
Choo-ja was planning.
“Sole’s son is in Korea for a blind date. So just go and introduce yourself to him. I even
have the list of girls he’ll be meeting,” said Choo-ja wiggling her eyebrows.
“I’m not going! You make me sound like a gold digger!” exclaimed Lee-yeon and sank
into her seat.
“What are you talking about?!” Choo-ja raised her voice.
Lee-yeon had never seen Choo-ja raise her voice at anyone. She was a beautiful sixtyyear-old lady who didn’t look her age. She was always well dressed and was the
epitome of elegance in her heels. Lee-yeon always felt like an eye sore near Choo-ja as
unlike her Lee-yeon preferred comfortable baggy clothes.
“Think carefully. Love and Romance doesn’t mean a thing today and you are not
getting married to the dude right away. You are just going to have tea and introduce
yourself to him. You will just be doing it to save your livelihood. Your hospital. It is not
so bad to think about your career,” said Choo-ja walking around trying to make Leeyeon think of her offer. At the end of her monologue, she stood in front of Lee-yeon
and hoped she changed her mind.
“I do want to save my hospital but…” murmured Lee-yeon.
“Great!” said Choo-ja clapping her hands, excited once again.
“Did I give you the hotel key?” asked Choo-ja who had returned to planning the how’s
of the meeting.
Lee-yeon was still thinking of how fast the conversation took an unexpected turn. ‘I
am just doing this for my hospital. My career.’ She thought and took deep breaths.
“But wait! Who did you hear it from?” asked Lee-yeon. Stopping Choo-ja from her
planning and cheer.
“Hear what?” asked Choo- ja confused.
“About Sole’s son returning to Korea. And what do you mean by the waiting list?”
Gye Choo-ja raised her perfectly shaped eyebrows and smiled. “Who will I hear it from
other than the president himself?”
“What? The president? Why did he…”
“What do you mean why? I used to date him.” Choo-ja said smugly.
“Choo-ja!” Lee-yeon shouted as she jumped from her seat surprised. Choo-ja’s colorful
love story was somewhat like a dark fairy tale to Lee-yeon, who had little experience.
Lee-yeon met Choo-ja when she was 17. At the time Lee-yeon had just run away from
her home and with nothing to live on, Choo-ja took Lee-yeon under her wing. Choo-ja
tried to make Lee-yeon understand that there is more to live than just working hard
but the girl rejected the notion of love.
While Lee-yeon was thinking of the past Choo-ja had proceeded to give yet another
monologue.
“… Destiny has nothing to do with finding a partner, you’re choosing your partner by
yourself. So, don’t give up. Life is too short to eat food that doesn’t taste good. Being
anachronistic will leave you only rotten pieces of bread.”
While Choo-ja was engrossed in her speech, Lee-yeon quickly ran away. The extremely
conservative girl was very different from the free-spirited old lady.
Hardly has Lee-yeon stepped out when she heard Choo-ja yell “Are you going to be
alone your whole life?!”

Moonlight shone through the window which lighted the stairways to the second floor.
A couple of creaks could be heard as a dark silhouette tried to climb the stairs in
silence.
The longwall clock which had been in the hospital ever since its opening, struck 12
and chimed loudly.
Making a visit to the second floor every night had become a routine for Lee-yeon.
Initially Lee-yeon planned to go just once but now it served as a reminder that as long
as the murderer lay there, she was safe.
Like any other day, Lee-yeon pressed the password and turned the door

Plants also have spirits, so the more people say nice things, the healthier they grow,
and the more people say negative things, the sooner they die. Knowing that, Lee-yeon
prayed this could be applied to her life. Words have power so she chanted in her head,
‘Please don’t wake up. You shouldn’t wake up.’
‘Please let me live a peaceful, quiet life.’
As Lee-yeon opened the door in hopes of seeing the frail body lying on the bed like
usual, she paused.
‘…He’s not… here?’
She couldn’t believe her eyes. She blinked once, then twice and once again. The
person was always here. He was a mere ghost of a human. The bed, where only the
hard shell of him remained, was empty.
She felt chills down her spine and as goosebumps claimed her body, she realized she
might not be safe anymore. The incident of that knight replayed in her mind,
reminding her of her doom.

<Flashback>
‘The man who fell off the hill may have died.’ Lee-yeon thought as she looked at the
pool of blood on the floor.
‘He must have died. He rolled down the hill after getting his head smashed probably
multiple times.’
When she barely pulled herself together, she was left alone in the mountains. ‘Let’s,
let’s return home after reporting this to the police.’
She was sure that she was going to get nightmares after this incident, but a new
morning will come. She had to live.
Lee-yeon managed to pull herself on her feet, she felt like she was going to collapse
but she willed her foot to take another step. She was celebrating this small victory in
her mind when something heavy covered her face. She smelled something bitter and
strong which made her feel faint. She tried to resist but the smell got to her head and
the darkness took over her.
Lee-yeon could feel her head pounding. It was hard just to open one eye. She shook
her head several times to get rid of the headache and focus.
‘Where am I?’
The first thing she saw was an old flickering light bulb in the backdrop of darkness.
Every time the light flickered, she saw a silhouette of a man smoking a cigar. The
smoke filled the air.
“Who are you?” asked Lee-yeon with what little courage she could muster. When she
tried standing up she realized that she was tied to a chair. A cold metal dug into her
wrists as she tried to free her hands. The man was still smoking.
“Why did you do that?” asked an emotionless voice. The fear in her chest which
stopped her from her struggle against the restraints.
“I don’t think he’ll live with his head smashed like that,” continued the man.
Lee-yeon was confused and scared so the only answer she could give was silence.
“The half-dead guy is my brother.” When the light bulb stopped blinking, her senses
became suddenly sharp.
Then Lee-yeon realized what was happening here. As her eyes adjusted to the dim
light, she tried to look around to make sense of her surroundings. Hooks hanging from
the ceiling that supported the bodies of slaughtered pigs. The blood dripping from the
pigs made her stomach churn.
Workers, wearing heavy rubber boots, walked around casually minding their own
business. They didn’t throw a look her way even once. They removed the intestines,
cut the flesh by part, and washed the bloodstains with a long hose.
She had woken up in the middle of a slaughterhouse in front of a man who stood tall,
wearing an expensive looking suit.
The man took a long puff of his cigar and said ““While you were sleeping, I pondered
whether I should simply tear you apart, or throw it into the sea.”
He was interrupted by a series of bangs. Lee-yeon looked around to find that it was
coming from a drum at the far end of the room and froze at the desperate scream that
echoed in the closed space.
“My brother is dying, and someone must pay for that,” said the voice again with an
uncomfortable edge.
Lee-yeon by now started panicking. She could hear her heart beating in her chest.

“…I, I think there is a bit of a misunderstanding. I’m not the one who hit him in the
head, that’s not what I did,” she said tears streaming down her cheeks and continued
“Your brother was trying to bury someone alive when—”
“What’s the matter with him burying someone?” asked the man as he tossed his cigar
ashes to the side and continued “and he clearly got mad when he was interrupted.”
The man with the cold silver-rimmed glasses looked like he was in his late thirties or
early forties. His face was smooth without a single wrinkle. Is face had no hint of
warmth.
“It wasn’t me, it was-it was someone else. The man who was being buried suddenly hit
him with a stone. It’s not me who pushed him down. For real. What I did was for selfdefence, but… —” the words left her mouth trying to convince him. This was the only
thing she could do to stop herself from breaking down.
“My brother has good ears.” The man was sceptical, “He’s neither stupid and not
insensitive enough to not be able to avoid a guy approaching from behind.”
“B-but…” Lee-yeon didn’t know what to do. She could feel that her life will be
shattered to the point of no return if she failed to convince him. There was no witness
or evidence to prove that she was there at a wrong time.
She wanted to know where she was and who this person was but at that moment all
that she could think about was, ‘I need to get out of here safely.’
There were constant bangs coning from the drum, which scared Lee-yeon more.
“Then, are you his accomplice? Accomplice of the man who hit my brother?” the man
asked.
“Wh-What? What do you mean accomplice! I don’t even know him!” she replied. The
man was indifferent to her struggle. She felt like her life was slipping through her
fingers, but this man was relaxed as if this was nothing but a dinner reservation.
“So, Lee-yeon. I don’t care about who you are.”
He spoke as he lowered his body to her level and looked right into her eyes.
“As someone who saw my brother slipping into coma, I really hope I can make
someone pay for my brother’s state. That’s it!”
‘Coma. The murderer was in a coma?’
“Whether you hit him with a stone, or not, that’s not really important to me. Instead,
let’s make a deal. If you’re wise enough, you’ll leave this place safely,” he said with a
smirk.
“A deal?” she asked unsure of what she heard.
“Yes. A deal.” The man put his cigar out into a box of meat and casually said, “catch
the real culprit and bring him to me. Until then, you must take care of my brother.”
He freed her from her restraints and made her sign a contract.
As he turned around to leave, he said, “don’t let him leave Hwaido.”
All she could hear then was the noise from the drum gradually disappearing as it was
dragged out.
<Flashback end>

He had disappeared!
All she could see was the medical equipment in the dark room lit by the moonlight.
‘Where-where did he go?’
The fear that was forgotten ever since that night she was kidnapped was revived. She
could feel the tension of that day and still smell the air.
The things that man said were running in her mind.
“While you were sleeping, I pondered whether I should simply tear you apart,
or put you in a drum with cement and throw it into the sea.
I really hope I can make someone pay for my brother’s state.”
Lee-yeon’s body trembled. That man would kill her if he found out!
‘I must find him,’ she thought and tried to calm herself.
When she turned around a shadow behind the door scared startled her.
It was clearly an attack. The man was hiding behind the door and rushed towards Leeyeon and pushed her hard. The medical device fell with a bang.
However, it was impossible for a person who suddenly woke up after two years of
sleep to walk properly. With his knees bent and staggering, he turned Lee-yeon’s body
as if binding her and flopped down on the bed.
One side of her cheek was pressed hard against the mattress. She wrestled with her
arms and legs at the weight of the man on her back. His strength surprised her. How
was he so strong after being in a coma for so long.
The man twisted Lee-yeon’s arms behind her and with his legs made sure she couldn’t
move. She could feel a firm body through her thin pajamas. In particular, she was
even more terrified of his thick penis that was pressed against her buttocks.

She was frightened to death. Her heart was racing fast, and her chest could explode
anytime. All she wanted at the moment for ground to cut open and swallow her whole.
Yet, Lee-yeon somehow pulled herself together. “Kwon, Kwon Chae-woo. Kwon Chaewoo.”
On receiving no response, she gulped. “You don’t seem to be in a good condition right
now,” she with trembling hands reached out to her phone, “I’ll call you a doctor!”
When Lee-yeon and Choo-ja were off to work or were away for a house call, the
medical staff Kwon Chae-woo’s brother hired was expected to be on his toes. Reaching
their expectations, the medical staff who took care of Kwon Chae-woo was always on
standby. He was supposed to come in through the back door they had secretly built
when constructing the second floor. He was so far discharging his duties diligently
and being in charge of massaging, washing, drying Kwon Chae-woo, he was keeping a
close check on the equipment. There was only one thing that Lee-yeon was
responsible for.
To take care of him until the real culprit is caught. And not let him leave Hwaido.
She froze remembering the eventful day.
There was only one information that she received about him; his name being ‘Kwon
Chae-woo’. Other than that, she had no idea who he was. Yet it was not difficult for
her to guess, his family had great wealth and power, considering the second floor,
which was built in an instant.
“It’s not difficult for me to make you a murderer.” She shivered as those words began
ringing in her ears.
She has never felt this helpless in any situation. Already, she was found guilty and had
to pay a fine for making a false report to 112 because, by the time the police arrived,
there was no one left at the mountain. And the person who hit Kwon Chae-woo with a
stone flew in a jiffy.
It didn’t take her long to recall the words of policemen– It’s either I went insane, or
the world surrounding Kwon Chae-woo is in a way more terrifying place than I can
imagine.
Once, she had tried visiting the police station but at the right time, she received a
phone call from Kwon Chae-woo’s brother. He said he only called her to say hello, but
when the call was over, a picture of him with the police chief was sent through a
message.
She regretted the day her destiny intersected their paths. There wasn’t anything she
could do. Nor her mind was in a position to find a way to escape. Even worse, she
already gave up long before without even putting in the effort to fight. All she was
hoping was that the man in vegetative state would never wake up.
Alas! He was there right in front of her. His stare was not definitely something she
would ever classify as comfortable. Right in the moment her mind reminded her of
that one thing she must do. Never ever dare to bark at the opponent who can easily
hush up the things.
Hence, to not rot in prison for a false accusation, despite her reluctance, she had to
make sure that the murderer is in good hands. Wish, those hands weren’t supposed to
be hers.
“Kwon Chae-woo. I know that you’re confused since you just woke up, but I’ll explain
things slowly,” she took a deep breath fighting his gaze. “So, please let me go and
stand up!”
The man had to react the opposite. Like her destiny.
He lowered his upper body and brought his face closer to hers. His giant shadow
covered the bedside and an unfamiliar warmth pressed down Lee-yeon’s back. In the
process, the tip of his nose touched her nape.
“What, what the…!” she screamed at the top of her voice.
The man didn’t budge. He was burying his nose and inhaling the scent of Lee-yeon’s
body like a wild animal. His hot breath tickled her skin.
“Stop making a fuss and answer my questions.” His voice was rough.
Gulping the lump formed in her throat, Lee-yeon nodded quickly.
“Did you lock me up?”
“What?” she looked at him bewildered. His tone threw her off track. Kwon Chae-woo,
what kind of life did you live? Wait, why is he speaking extra politely?
“Or, did I lock you up?”
Her fear soon disappeared at the absurdity of the situation. She shook her head in
frustration. “Absolutely not! What do you think of me?”
“It’s me who’s asking questions here,” he glared. “Why am I here?”
This time his voice was extra sweet. She was unfamiliar with the innocence he spoke.
His polite question was no less than a threat to her. But is it because I know his true
nature?
When his tone of voice pressured her to answer, she spoke, “You are just a patient.
You woke up after a long sleep.”
The silence stretched. She took it on her shoulders to convince him. This is the least
she should be doing to save her life. “It’s, absolutely, not a dangerous situation. Please
calm down.”
The man who was breathing heavily regained his normal breathing pace. Perhaps her
words were convincing to his ears.
Since the day she’s here she has constantly prayed for him to remain vegetative. He
shouldn’t have woken up. Things will get complicated in many ways as and when this
murderer will begin to move at his will. How will Lee-yeon deal with his cruel and
selfish nature? She wasn’t ready.
“But why are you trembling?” His hoarse voice scratched her ears and brought her out
of her thoughts. Did she see a tinge of smirk on his face?
He added, “Did you do something wrong to me?”
“N… no?” Her eyes turned big at his audacity.
The strength pressing her body was gone in an instant. Her body turned over like a
fried egg as he grasped her roughly. Her heart slowly started pounding and her ears
could catch hold of the vibrations.
He brought his face dangerously closer to hers.

Despite the tension in her throat, her eyes caught glimpses of his sharp nose and light
wood-coloured iris. His hair, which had grown long enough to cover his neck, was
messy, and his loose-fitting hospital clothes were shabby. Although his body shrank in
size, his thick bones were still strong.
Besides, his gaze. His light-coloured eyes wavering like flames gave away a strange
feeling. It caused certain movements in her stomach.
She was terrified to look into his glowing eyes that looked polished. His clean eyes
were rather like an empty pit.
He got on his feet and instinctively tied her up. Lee-yeon turned anxious and started to
sweat. Such a man would never forget the woman he was trying to kill. Worst of all,
the face he saw before he rolled down the hill was her!
She prayed earnestly that Kwon Chae-woo would not recognize her. Lee-yeon knew if
he was harbouring malice, there was a possibility that he’d pour out all his anger on
her.
“You look familiar.” His face looked blank as if he had emptied everything inside him.
She lost the colour of her face.
On receiving no response, he smirked. “Kwon Chae-woo. Kwon Chae-woo,” he
whispered with a low voice as if mimicking Lee Yeon’s tone. “That would most likely
be my name.”
This time his face grew serious. “Are you important to me?”
Lee-yeon heaved a deep breath. It was a strange intuition. She couldn’t point out if it
was a feeling of joy or fear that was making her heart race endlessly. Joy?
“Or, are you someone who I can just kill?”
Lee-yeon’s gaze followed his movements. Chae-Woo Kwon took out the needle he had
been hiding the whole time and pressed it repeatedly like a ballpoint pen.
She resisted to run away. He started poking his thumb with the needle a few times.
Dark red blood dripped down.
She breath in rough gasps. To her, his gaze resembled that of a butcher. She could
feel him taking a good look at his meat. Frightened, she poked him without a second
thought.
“Don’-don’t say that. I am very important to you,” she tried to catch her breath, “for
real! Don’t you remember me?”
His perplexed face answered how confused he was. “I’m very close to you! We’ve met
each other longer than you are thinking,” her eyes were spinning because of the
stress that had already crossed the threshold, “and we’re intertwined in a complicated
way.”
She remembered the contract which she was forced to sign. Those men who dragged
in black suits at night still haunt her.
“And we can’t just end our relationship at will,” she added, rubbing the skin of her
forehead. Shouldn’t she have simply told him to go to court back then? Maybe this
would’ve saved her from this vicious vegetative man.
“Ahh!” She trembled with fear as Kwon Chae-woo suddenly grabbed her face. He
squeezed her cheeks so hard that they started to tingle. He wasn’t controlling his
power at all and she felt her jaw would break anytime.
“You told me you’re important to me, then why are you trembling?”
“N-no, I’m not!”
“Were you sold here with your fingers cut off or something?” She couldn’t believe her
ears.
“To suck the dick of a guy who can’t even move or think?”
At his harsh words, Lee-yeon felt her cheek twitching.
“Why can I only remember such trashy words?” He rubbed his forehead with a
confused look.
He transferred more strength to his hand, grabbing Lee-yeon’s face. All her focus was
on his fingers which were on the verge of suffocating her. She noticed tendons
appearing over the back of his hand.
“Please don’t scream. My ears hurt.”
Lee-yeon clenched her teeth. A stabbing pain spread all over the bones of her face.
She had no power to push his hands off.
She was crying at her fate. She knew nothing about this man. All she had an idea of
was his name which she heard from his brother. Everything else, be it his age,
occupation, education, hometown, family or medical history, she had no clue.
She was constantly trying to focus her mind on what could convince him. After seeing
his real side at the mountain, nothing else appeared. Not even a single escape plan to
save her from the man, standing right in front of her and showing wild emotions.
Even if the land is unsuitable for living, you have to adapt and change according to the
environment. Like the way those plants, she loves and adores, live. The locust tree
that lives lying down even if it collapses, and the maple tree that grows crooked due to
the wind. It was a battle. Yes, a battle! She now knew.
Clenching her teeth, Lee-yeon grabbed his wrist in a hurry. “Kwon Chae-woo, Kwon
Chae-woo!”
Slightly frowning, he lowered his hand. His eyes popped out of sockets seeing red
handprints on both of her cheeks.

“But we are not in that kind of relationship! Don’t get me wrong. We—we,” she raked
her mind, searching for the right words, “we got along very well! You were very kind.”
She lied hoping it would persuade her.
Her fingers touched the weapon around her neck, “You even put a necklace around
my neck.” All the way she tried to speak naturally, but her voice cracked. The man
looked down at her with an expressionless face.
“So, did you suck it?”
“What do you mean?”
“I must have fucked you like a dog.”
Her demeanour was on the verge of breaking apart.
“Because you speak like someone who has been brainwashed.”
“No, no, no!” She exclaimed and shook her head, screaming internally. It was her who
was trying to brainwash him, only if he gave in.
Lee-yeon felt strangely annoyed at his silence. The feeling of being swayed by him was
terrible. “You neither treated me badly nor forced upon me anything. You never used
violence or threatened me.” Big time lies!

Unknown to her, she was actually convincing him for what she really wanted from
him. “You just couldn’t do anything bad to me.”
All he did was quietly raise and lower his eyebrows. His face showed how her words
were falling in deaf ears. He didn’t believe an inch of what she said.
Stepping forward, he gently stroked her neck. “Why?”
She was thrown off track. His fingers were doing something to her, “Huh?”
“Why can’t I do anything bad?”
“Uh, it’s because…,” Every time the man’s hand touched Lee-yeon, her heart raced
like crazy.
She bit her lips remembering what happened at the mountains. Getting caught by
him, failing to flee and the necklace in her neck! His soft touch began appearing
suspicious. Lee-yeon spoke without a second thought. “It’s because the law says so!”
“Law?”
“Yeah, so, it’s…,” this time, she bit her lip in anxiety. Choo-ja’s words ringed in her
ears- Destiny has nothing to do with finding a partner, you’re choosing your partner
by your foresight.
There was a visible gleam in her eyes, “If you kill me, it’ll be a uxoricide.” She finally
discovered a way to be safe from him.
For the first time, some kind of colour appeared on his face. He frowned outright and
dropped the needle.
Lee-yeon’s conscience pricked her, but she immediately covered it with a poker face.
That’s her way of declaring her determination. “Because I’m-I’m your wife.”
That night, she germinated a deadly seed.

The unexpected always happens. And it is extremely difficult to foresee or predict
those happenings.
The accident right before her eyes was a case that could only be found in foreign
research papers. She struggled with the right words for a while. “Are you sure it got
hit by lightning last night?”
“Yes.”
Lee-yeon hardened her face as she looked at the recently-turned-black tree. It had
split into half.
The lady who called Lee-yeon held her hands tightly, wiping her tears with a
handkerchief. “This is the tree I planted when my son was born. But he’s grown up
now and is a part of the army. I am certainly having a bad feeling about this.”
“I’ll take a look at it first.”
The tree appeared unsightly and was severely damaged. Lee-yeon frowned as if she
could feel the pain of the tree and started the diagnosis. “Manager, this needs
surgery. Let’s fill the hole with chains for now and fix the date for surgery.”
Choo-ja, who followed her with a surgical box, whispered in a worry, “What if they
hold you responsible if it dies?”
“Fortunately, the roots are not damaged, so it can recover. Besides, it’s the birth tree
of her son.” Lee-yeon sat on her knees and asked, “Is there enough local soil in the
hospital?”
Choo-ja sat beside her. She was surprised looking at Lee-yeon’s face. Somehow, her
face looked even more tired under a bright light. The dark circles under her eyes
looked unusual.
“Manager, these days I’m…,” Lee-yeon’s phone rang. After checking the caller, she
excused herself and moved to a quiet place.
She picked up the call. “Hello?”
The mature and calm eyes that Lee-yeon maintained even after looking at the state of
the tragic tree suddenly changed. She bit her nails and walked around, resembling a
gambler who ran away from a debtor. “What do you mean?”
Her eyes, which were hidden under the straw hat, trembled uncontrollably. It’s been a
month since Kwon Chae-woo, that vegetative man, woke up. The medical staff took
him for a check, and all he told her was, “he’s amnesiac”. And the phone call that she
finally got told her something very absurd.
“I can’t tell when he’s going to wake up,” answered the caller.
She was at a loss of words and couldn’t comprehend the caller’s intent. But then she
shook her head. “I don’t understand what you’re saying. Don’t joke with me. I had a
conversation with him. He even got on me.”
She could hear him coughing over the phone.
That night, when Kwon Chae-woo heard the confession, “I am your wife,” he collapsed
as if he had used up all his energy. Lee-yeon immediately contacted the medical staff,
and this is the result.
She had been extremely nervous while waiting for his well-being. Her heart was
pounding fast, and she even plucked out her hair as if she had paroxysm.
After these many sleepless nights, Lee-yeon was now realising how terrible her idea
was. Wife, a murderer’s wife! Out of so many other plausible lies, why did I?
“No. That’s not what I’m saying. It’s a bit different.”
“What?”
“According to the result of the brain test, it has been confirmed that his consciousness
has returned. It’s hard to believe that he woke up from a vegetative state, but he did.
Fortunately, the result of the reaction test also seems fine. However…”
Lee-yeon held her breath. She was expecting another shock.
“I can’t tell when he’s going to wake up.”
“But you just said that he woke up!” She frowned as she felt someone around her
neck.
“I can’t give you a definitive answer because the patient is showing rare symptoms”
“Rare symptoms?”
Caller answered, “Hypersomnia”
She touched her lips with a confused face.
“It is also known as Sleeping Beauty Syndrome. I’ve done all the tests I can but can’t
pinpoint the cause. There’s nothing wrong with the brain, so this is just a guess.”
Lee-yeon opened her mouth with a blank face. She quietly blinked her eyes. With
these people around, she was somewhere getting used to unexpected turns of events.
“We’ll have to wait and see, but if it turns out to be this syndrome,” the doctor turned
silent.
“Then?”
“Once he falls asleep, he may not be able to wake up for a week, 10 days, or even
more” Hearing no response, he continued, “Currently, the patient has been sleeping
for 12 days.”
Lee-yeon wasn’t aware of ways to react in such situations.
“For now, I’ll bring him to you again.”
When the doctor was about to end the call, Lee-yeon hurriedly called him, “D-doctor,
wait!”
She took a deep breath and lifted her hat. The wind blew on her sweaty forehead. “So,
you mean although Kwon Chae-woo is not in a vegetative state right now, no one
knows when he’ll wake up, right?”
“Yes. For now, we cannot expect anything.”
“Huff,” Lee-yeon breathed out as if crying. The anxiety she had built up in her chest
disappeared all at once. Her tightly closed eyelids trembled. “Thank you. Thank you so
much.”
“Pardon?”
She sighed in relief and couldn’t thank God enough. ‘Because I’m, I’m your wife.’
Now, she can just pretend not to know anything. And can, anyways, tell him that it all
happened in his dream. “Thank you, doctor. Thank you!”
Lee-yeon, who returned to the scene, spoke optimistically to the client who had not yet
erased the face of despair, “I’ll do my best to revive this tree!”

“Thank you, doctor. Thank you!” The call ended as Lee-yeon finished her words.
The doctor looked down at his phone with a confused face. He put his phone back in
his pocket. He couldn’t understand the sudden change in her voice.
A patient, who’s been in a vegetative state for 2 years, woke up by a miracle. Thanks
to the good care, his joints were flexible and the rehabilitation went smoothly. The
primitive reason being he was born with strong bones and sensitive motor nerves.
Recovering in a short time, he was able to move his body freely.
But strangely, his miraculous recovery lasted only for a week. Since then, he has slept
for 12 straight days, like a person addicted to vegetative activities.
The patient had already suffered from memory problems. The doctor didn’t even
expect in the first place that he would fully recover from a vegetative state. He was
continuously pondering over his case when it struck him. Since the patient’s head was
seriously injured, the after-effects must have come in some form.
But for some reason, he felt bothered. He asked the patient, “Can you tell me your
name?”
“Can you hear me?” Doctor asked, perplexed. “Speak whatever comes to your mind.”
“Se…”
A small smile appeared on the doctor’s lips. “Yes, good. Just like that.”
Later, he couldn’t forget what his patient said.
“Please don’t wake up.”
Kwon Chae-Woo had repeated those words countless times, even in the hazy
consciousness. The doctor walked down the empty hallway. He rubbed his chin and
furrowed his eyebrows.
“Director Kwon must be upset about his younger brother.”
He bent backwards and stretched. Although it would have been much better for Kwon
Chae-woo to receive treatment at a larger hospital. Director Kwon’s order of sending
him back to that shabby old house was somewhat strange.
But it wasn’t his place to question. Although he lived a life of a caregiver in this
distant life, his salary was too high to question or squabble on such details.
“Ah…,” he suddenly paused and snapped a finger. “I forgot to tell her…”
The sequelae Kwon Chae-woo suffered from was not just oversleeping. It was known
as Sleeping Beauty Syndrome. Or, in technical terms, Klein-Levin Syndrome. It is
usually accompanied by symptoms of behavioral abnormalities, uncontrollable urge to
eat excessively, aggression and excessive sexual desire.
“I mean…he’ll be okay for today.” It’s just a day. Nothing is going to happen. He
yawned.

“Um hm hmm,” Lee-yeon hummed as she walked up the stairs. She had escaped death
by the skin of her teeth. She had spent the day feeling miraculously rescued after
falling into the cruel man’s trap. When she reached the door and entered the
password to open it, she felt a sense of déjà vu.
“What the!”
Dang. Dang. Dang.
The bell rang. It was midnight and a chilling sight froze her in her spot. The back door
had been pushed as though hit by a car.
“Where did he go…?”
For more than thirty minutes, Lee-yeon wandered on the dark, dirt road where a few
old electric poles stood by the side. Should I contact him? Kwon Chae-woo’s brother.
The ‘A’ who made Lee-yeon the ‘B’. She rubbed her phone screen repeatedly,
nervously until it became very shiny. She didn’t want to offer any excuses to Director
Kwon to be able to control her. She tied up her long, wavy hair and sped up.
“Kwon Chae-woo!” The dogs sleeping along the way barked at her shout. Lee-yeon
busily looked around and searched the narrow neighborhood. She suddenly found a
strange trace. It looked like a trail left by the crawling of a huge snake.
“He truly is horrible…”
She laughed dryly at the absurd sight. She turned to follow the trail. When she moved
closer, she heard a fluttering sound. Her heart pounded nervously at the ominous
situation.
“Kwon Chae-woo! Put that down!” she shouted in shock.
However, Kwon Chae-woo was already chewing at the raw flesh. His eyes were blank,
and the muscles of his jaw moved as he chewed. When he groaned and spat out the
raw meat from his mouth, Lee-yeon almost vomited. She restrained her urge to throw
up. The rooster was already dead, its neck broken. Her hands trembled. She was
terrified of this man, who stood there nonchalantly with blood on his lips.
This was just one of the effects of having Klein-Levin Syndrome and by the looks of his
unfocused gaze, he must not be aware of what he was doing and was simply out of
touch with reality.
“It must be difficult for you to move right now. Why did you come out?”
Lee-yeon pretended as though she was worried about his health. Lee-yeon tried her
best to gauge his mood so that she could correct herself about her telling him that she
was his wife. “Let’s go back. You shouldn’t be here.”
Kwon Chae-woo threw the chicken and looked at Lee-yeon. His gaze which fell on her
made her uncomfortable. He stood in the dark where the moonlight didn’t reach him.
He looked taller than before. He was two heads taller than her. It seemed he walked, more like crawled on the ground towards her. His sleeves, legs, and chest were all
covered with dust.
When the wind blew, his clothes fluttered and revealed the silhouette of his well-toned
body. Slightly dazed, Lee-yeon recalled the Dragon Blood living in Socotra Island,
Yemen. A bloody tree. It was a strange tree with red blood-like sap flowing through its
veins.
Two years ago, she had seen Kwon Chae-woo for the first time. And a month ago, he
had woken up from his coma. He had always been covered in blood, and even at this
point, he was splattered with blood. “Kwon Chae-woo…”
“Name…”
“What?”
“What’s your name?”
His cold gaze rested on her. It was hard to read his thoughts. Think Lee-yeon, she
urged herself. Think. She was at a loss for words. She didn’t know what to say.

“Where were you this whole time?” he asked again, before she could respond to his
first question. “The only face I remember is yours. But I couldn’t open the door.” He
groaned. Ignorance and confusion filled his eyes.
The door on the second floor through which Lee-yeon used to enter the room could not
open from the inside. He had smashed the back door and crawled on the floor just as
Lee-yeon had entered the room. As she recalled the series of events, she shuddered.
Kwon Chae-woo was not normal. He had woken up after twelve days of sleep all
covered in sweat, dirt and blood. But there was still hope.
A sign that it might be the last.
Instinctively, an idea hit her. It was time.
“I… don’t know what you’re talking about.” When Lee-yeon pretended to not know
anything, the man tilted his head and frowned. “Maybe you had a long, vivid dream,”
she continued. “I am the doctor who looks after you, and…”
She felt a prick of her conscience. “This is the village foreman’s farm. We should leave
quickly. I will compensate for the chicken.”
The man who was still frowning, looked at Lee-yeon as she spoke.
“Kwon Chae-woo, do you remember that you were asleep all this time? You were
terribly sick and unconscious. It is normal to be confused. But don’t worry. You were
dreaming. You are awake now.” She put emphasis on ‘dreaming’ just to be sure.
“Everything you think you saw or heard; it was your brain playing tricks on you. A
coping mechanism. You need to rest. Then you will feel better.”
However, Lee-yeon overlooked something. Her plan to dismiss everything as a ‘dream’ might backfire on her.
“A dream?” said the man, slowly licking the blood away from his lips. It seems like he
was truly awake now. “I see.” He pointed to Lee-yeon’s lower body. “If it wasn’t a
dream, you wouldn’t be standing here like this.”
Puzzled, she looked down at her legs. Just then his low voice caught her ears. “I only
dreamed of having sex the whole time I slept,” he said.
Lee-yeon couldn’t respond. “With my wife,” he said, “I was in and out between your
legs.”
Lee-yeon almost screamed. Her whole body froze at his words. “So, I am not
confused,” he said, “I remember clearly.”
She took a step back, instinctively. Does he remember everything that happened? The
day we met on the mountain…
“I have a wife,” he said, as he walked forwards towards her. “And she is trying to run
away right about now.”
He walked towards her, neither too fast nor too slow. Lee-yeon desperately wanted to
run away. Her legs trembled. She had planned this trap, but she was the one caught in
its snare. When he was close enough to reach out and touch her, Lee-yeon finally
made herself pull away.
“You wanted to ditch me because your husband was now a sick good-for-nothing
man?”
He is not an idiot.
“What’s your name? Don’t make me ask you again.”
“I… I am So Lee-yeon,” she said finally.
“So, Lee-yeon. Lee-yeon.” Kwon Chae-woo licked his lips and swallowed her name,
along with the blood on his lips.
“Why are you trying to leave me? Did I become so useless to you just because I can’t
use my body properly?”
Something was definitely wrong. Something with force wrapped around her ankle
tightly. She couldn’t tell whether it was a shackle, the gravity of the swamp or the tail
of the beast but one thing she was irrevocably sure of was that she was in danger. Her
body felt the danger and was ready to run.
“Kwon Chae-woo, that’s not what I was―”
“No?”
Now the situation was completely reversed. Lee-yeon could only twiddle her thumbs.
She barely managed to come up with a good enough reason.
#7.
“A wife that you can’t remember having appeared right in front of you, so I thought it
would affect you. I thought it might make you uncomfortable and make you feel
overwhelmed. So, that was why I was…”
“So, you are telling me you did that for my safety?” He asked with such a voice devoid
of emotion that it made her doubt herself. But Lee-yeon decided that was a suitable
excuse and nodded her head in affirmative.
“Bullshit,” he said. “Why are you doing something that I didn’t even ask for? I don’t
want that.”
Ever since he woke up, he had used a polite tone of voice with her. But that docile,
polite voice still felt devoid of emotion right now. “You told me we are married under
the eyes of the law, but suddenly you are trying to give me up?”
She could see his eyes glimmering in the dark. “Someone tore everything in my mind
but yours is the only face I remember,” he continued. “I really must be your husband. I
was off my mind when I realized you were trying to give me up.”
That’s because you are naturally evil. Lee-yeon tried to say something but couldn’t
utter a word. I am seriously dead…
Lee-yeon had to pretend like everything was okay. She couldn’t break down right now.
This could turn even worse. However, it seemed his interrogation wasn’t over yet. He
had an innate talent for appearing intimidating, but his weakness was that he couldn’t
remember anything.
Lee-yeon had that advantage. She could steer him wherever she wanted using his lack
of memory as a tool. But her plan had backfired.
“I guess I loved you a lot,” he said.
No, you didn’t, you idiot! You tried to kill me! Her plan had entrapped her. And now
his murderous intent had turned into love.

Lee-yeon was dragging a cart with a staggering man on it. She could feel his gaze at
her back, but she didn’t look back. The sounds of crickets filled the silence.
“How old am I?” he asked suddenly, leaning back in the cart.
“Uhm….” Countless possibilities filled her head at the question. This was like a game.
A landmine, more aptly. One wrong movement and everything could explode in her
face.
“I am thirty-two,” she said, turning to look back at him. It was difficult to gauge his
age just by looking at him. He as handsome with not a wrinkle on his face. He could be
a high school boy for all I know. If he wore a suit, he could even be a businessman.
“You are the same age as me.”
He nodded slowly. “But do we always use honorific when speaking to each other?”
“Uh… yes,” she said. “You are always very polite and gentle.” She lied outright. She
had to say something! She felt as though thorns were growing on her tongue. Trees
have the ability to create branches and and new seed, they grow. Lies do too. Once
lies germinate, it spreads out of control.
“What did I do for a living?”
Lee-yeon was speechless. Bury people alive, that’s what you do. You plant them in the
ground and kill them.
“Uh… so…,” Lee-yeon stammered. As she hesitated, she felt a tab on her elbow and
looked back to see his hand touch her shoulder. She spat out words randomly. “You
planted well!”
“What did I plant?”
“Um….” People. You planted people. “Flowers…”
“What?”
“You planted flowers at my hospital. That’s how we met.” She wanted to sew her own
mouth shut.

The man was a mess. He had dirt and wounds all over his body. After he took a
shower, Lee-yeon helped apply ointment on his wounds. She frowned at the reddish
scratched on his body. However, Kwon Chae-woo did not flinch or groan. There was
only calm breathing. Each time she applied ointment to his wound, her hands
trembled. She wanted this night to end quickly.
“Let’s sleep here, together,” he said.
Lee-yeon flinched. “What?”
“We are married, aren’t we?” he said, “Can’t we stay together here?”
“I… but you are still a patient here…”
“Yes, I am still a patient, but I am no longer vegetative, and I am still your husband.”
He eyes looked at Lee-yeon with a piercing gaze. She got up from the edge of the
mattress instinctively. She had never thought about what it would entail for lying
about being a married couple. Her heart began to race.
“Are you uncomfortable with me because I might not be the same as you remember
me?”
Lee-yeon couldn’t respond. “I…”
“It’s alright,” he looked at Lee-yeon. “I will not treat you harshly. I will neither force
you nor threaten you, just like the old husband you knew me as.”
His eyes looked bleak. It felt like all the violent moments were a mirage. “So, sleep
here with me.”
The doctor had told her once that when Kwon Chae-woo falls asleep, no one knew
when he would wake up again. So. Making him fall asleep was the priority. Lee-yeon
sat laid down next to him without a word. It wasn’t a very large bed but was big
enough for two people. She could smell disinfectant.
“I have so many things to ask,” he said turning to look at her. His gaze hit her like an
arrow. She didn’t look at him. She stared up at the ceiling.
“What are you most curious about?” she asked.
“How did I become a vegetative man?”
“We… went to the mountain together… and we met with an accident.”
“You too?” he said and frowned.
She nodded. “But I didn’t get hurt a lot.”
She avoided the details and kept it vague so that it would be easier to make up
excuses later. Lee-yeon’s heart continued to pound.
“Did you take care of me since then?”
“Yes, but the medical staff struggled more than me.”
She might be killed the moment he discovers all of this was a lie. Lee-yeon had to play
it safe. She felt like she was walking on thin ice.
“only think about yourself for now. You will soon be able to meet your family. You have
an older brother too.”
“I don’t remember him,” he said.
He held her hand. Lee-yeon tried not to flinch. Although it was only her hand that he
had grabbed, she felt like her whole body was tied to him. “The only person I need
right now is Lee-yeon,” he said. “It’s only your face that lingers in my mind and
nothing else. I guess I love you very much.”
Love…. All of a sudden, the face of her parents came to her mind. Lee-yeon held her
tongue holding back the urge to curse. Kwon Chae-woo lifted himself a little and
draped the blanket over the both of them. Lee-yeon felt at ease at the sudden warmth.
It was cozy enough to relive the day’s fatigue and fall asleep. As she instinctively
snuggled in the blanket, her eyes met his.
“When did we marry?”
“Uh… two years ago?”
“Have you ever cried because of me?”
“What?”
“We were newlyweds and you had to nurse me ever since,” he said. “That’s terrible.”
“I’m used to treating patients who can’t speak, so I didn’t cry very much.”
“How long did we date?”
“Ah, um….” The questions were getting a lot complicated. Lee-yeon didn’t know what
to do. She had been single her whole. What can she say about someone else’s love
life? “We didn’t date long. We got married right after we started dating.”
“Right after?”
Is it wrong to say that we got married right away? There were quite a few
international marriages that happened on this island and Lee-yeon would often meet
them in coffee shops. When Lee-yeon was lost in thought, he raised his eyebrows.
“One night?”
“What?”
“Did we sleep together right after we met? And you thought I was a perfect partner?”
As she opened and closed his mouth in shock, he smiled. “It’s sad that I don’t
remember any of that.” He looked young when he smiled. His eyes especially no
longer looked cold and distant. Lee-yeon looked at him in shock and fear. It was like
waking up into a nightmare.
“Guess you were quite bold back then,” he said.
“No! That’s not what it is!”
Such a misunderstanding made her feel very uncomfortable. However, she couldn’t
come up with a plausible story to refute what he just said. When she was quiet, Kwon
Chae-woo tilted his head and rested it on his pillow.

“Ahh, so I picked you up.”
Lee-yeon didn’t respond.
“I whispered sweet nothings into your ear and brought you to bed, right? I was a
shameless bastard.” He smiled. He was enjoying listening to the memories of his past.
She felt like she was losing composure. If she couldn’t come up with something quick,
she would be the one stuck. Suddenly, Lee-yeon felt so distressed that she wanted to
run far way from there. He had made her lie down on the same bed with him as
though they were a married couple (which he assumed they were). Lee-yeon was
scared that if she didn’t come up with something to stop this, he might force himself
on her next time.
Cold sweat trickled down her back. I have to stop this. “You are actually not
shameless. We weren’t sexually compatible.”
The smile slowly disappeared from his face. “It wasn’t good?”
“sex?”
“Yes.”
“Who?” He asked.
“What?” She replied.
“Who wasn’t good at it?”
It took all of her effort not to avert her gaze from his, but Lee-yeon held onto his
persistent gaze which was urging her to respond.
“Both of us?” He asked before she could respond. He then let out a dry laugh. He then
frowned and became serious once again. “This is even more shocking than my
memory loss.”
Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes seemed to be strange. He usually looked amicable when he
didn’t know what he was doing. But his eyes at that moment looked like they knew
something. He facepalmed and let out another laugh.
“So, you’re saying we didn’t indulge in sex after that?” he asked.
“Yes.”
“What exactly was the problem?” His soft voice sounded determined yet subdued at
the same time.
“Ah…” Lee-yeon felt that she was going to run out of answers soon. His questions
were getting very personal and intimate, and she was finding it hard to lie out of her
teeth. But she was an adult. She wouldn’t let him intimidate her.
“I… I don’t think we were compatible with each other. I didn’t feel anything the first
time we did it. I still don’t know what orgasm is…”
Kwon Chae-woo didn’t respond. “You also told me once that you didn’t have a very
high libido and that you didn’t really like doing it so much. That was actually what I
liked about you. I fell in love with you because you didn’t really care about being
sexually compatible. What mattered to you was only love. You were like a monk.”
“A monk? Me?” he said in disbelief. Perhaps he was blaming himself or the Kwon
Chae-woo that Lee-yeon had created. He furrowed his eyebrows.
“So, we were mostly in a platonic relationship. It worked out for us both at the time,”
she said. Lee-yeon struck the final blow.
Kwon Chae-woo was speechless. He looked up at the ceiling for a while in silence. He
was so quiet for such a long time that Lee-yeon was sure he had finally fallen asleep.
Just when she was wondering whether she should get up and leave, Kwon Chae-woo
said, “So, you nursed and took care of me even though we aren’t sexually compatible.”
Lee-yeon didn’t say anything to that. It wasn’t as though people took care of other
people only to do the deed. What kind of twisted thinking was that?
“You really do love me a lot, So Lee-yeon,” he said finally.
He let out a short sigh. Lee-yeon lamented that she had caused yet another
misunderstanding. She felt very uncomfortable, but she didn’t say it out loud. She
decided that the more he believed it, the safer she would be. It was the only way to
keep Kwon Chae-woo away from her.
“Go to sleep now,” said Lee-yeon, putting an end to the conversation. The more she
talked with him, the scarier it was that she might let slip something and would be
caught in her own trap.
“Okay. Good night, Lee-yeon” He closed his eyes and turned away as though he no
longer wanted to hear about his past.
Lee-yeon prayed to the god of trees. Please make this man fall into a deep sleep! A
coma would be very preferable. I hope he doesn’t wake up for weeks. The doctor did
say he was suffering from some syndrome. Please, please make him fall asleep! She
prayed desperately.
Just when she thought he was asleep for good, he whispered, “But why wasn’t I good?
Was it the deed itself or my caresses that left you dissatisfied? Or… was I a virgin and
hence not experienced?”
Lee-yeon was lost for words. “I… I don’t know for sure. I think you didn’t like doing it
and also that you finished very quickly…” Ugh… Lee-yeon cursed herself.
He fell very silent at that and muttered to himself with a short sigh. Eventually, Leeyeon heard his breath even out and she was sure he was asleep. She tried to pry her
hands away from his so that she could leave but in vain. Eventually, the day’s events
had made her so tired, that she drifted off to sleep right there. She had wanted to ask
him just one question. Why did you kill the chicken cruelly?
The next morning, Lee-yeon woke up feeling well-rested… and screamed. Kwon Chaewoo looked down at her, his hand propping his head up. “Good morning,” he greeted
her in surprise.
What the…! The doctor said he had Sleeping Beauty Syndrome! What is he doing up?
She had expected Kwon Chae-woo to sleep for a few days straight because of his
condition but here he was, up earlier than her and saying, ‘good morning’. His flaxcolored iris appeared reddish than usual in the morning sun.

Lee-yeon stood at the corner of the room, glancing frequently at the man getting his
check-ups. She felt very anxious. She patted her arms, pulled at her sleeves, and bit
her nails but nothing helped to calm her down. How can this happen? How?
She buried her face in her hands. Her heart pounded. She felt her whole body
trembling perhaps because of her rapid pulse and anxious thoughts.
“It is still too early to draw any conclusions,” said the doctor, “We need more sleep
data to understand the pattern. The patient might still fall into a long sleep starting
tomorrow. We will have to wait and see.”
Today, Kwon Chae-woo had woken up ‘normally’. The man who had slept straight for
three days, five days and even 12 days had suddenly woken up ‘normally’. For Leeyeon, who had just one hope that he might fall in a deep sleep for several days, this
was a shock! A stab in the back!
“There is nothing wrong with the patient’s brain,” continued the doctor, “There is a
high chance that this might be a psychological condition. Sometimes the change is
triggered when there is a shift in environment. A house feels different than a hospital,
so that might have brought about some change in him. For now, it will be helpful to
find the cause which defines his sleep pattern.”
While the doctor explained, Kwon Chae-woo glanced at Lee-yeon. “There is just one
thing that comes to my mind,” he said. He rubbed his lower lip.
“And what is that?” asked the doctor, busy writing down on his table.
“I slept with my wife yesterday.”
An awkward silence fell in the room. Lee-yeon was horrified. The doctor slowly
blinked and looked at her and Kwon Chae-woo in turns. He quickly fixed his
composure and nodded. “Am I to understand that you two made love?”
“No!” exclaimed Lee-yeon. “We just slept on the same bed. Nothing of the sort!”
The doctor nodded. “Then let’s try that for the moment,” said the doctor, “It would be
great if you two continue this and see how it goes.”
Lee-yeon’s face turned dark at the news.

While Kwon Chae-woo went to the hospital for physical therapy, Lee-yeon lay down on
the sofa, watching the news in exhaustion.
『Voice phishing is becoming more deliberate. 』
The headline blared. But Lee-yeon’s head was a mess. If Kwon Chae-woo’s condition
improves, she won’t be able to hide him. If he happens to go down to the first floor, it
would only be a matter of time before Choo-ja finds out about him. But if Choo-ja does
find out…
“If this contract gets leaked, I will understand it as a breach and that there
was another accomplice.”
His threat to accuse Lee-yeon as the murderer might affect Choo-ja. She had only two
choices: either convince Kwon Chae-woo to deceive Choo-ja or tell Choo-ja everything.
She was lost in her thoughts and only heard the news reporter’s voice faintly.
『—Just like this recording, the frauds threaten the victim and stop them from hanging
up by saying, ‘If you hang up the phone, we will consider it as a getaway.’ This is a
technique used to prevent victims from receiving help from other people. 』
On the day of the incident, Lee-yeon had to talked with Kwon Chae-woo’s brother from
night till dawn. The fact that she was at her most vulnerable state and didn’t have
anyone to consult with, had made her more passive. Under pressure where she was
being threatened, Lee-yeon had rashly signed the contract in order to escape the
situation at the moment.
『Recently, the way they psychologically isolate the victims…』
Lee-yeon couldn’t take her eyes off the TV screen. Her blood ran cold, and her hands
trembled. She hugged the cushion to calm herself. She crouched down to manage her
anxious thoughts that was about to overwhelm her. Ever since Kwon Chae-woo had
woken up, she hadn’t been able to get a good night’s sleep for almost a month. It was
actually a little before that when her life had started going downhill.
The news reporter’s voice became faint and distant, and Lee-yeon could finally figure
out a way to put an end to her worries.
She dialed a number on her phone.
Ring. Ring.
She heard the beep and tears welled up in her eyes suddenly. All her worries and
struggles that she had tried to hide for two whole years began bubbling up inside her.
It was finally time.
“Why are you calling me on a weekend?” said a voice from the other end of the phone.
“Choo-ja… I…” Lee-yeon sobbed.
“What’s wrong? Are you drunk?”
“I don’t know what to do! A vegetative man will work with us here in the hospital!”
Vegetative man? Is she on drugs? Choo-ja thought.
Lee-yeon’s story poured out of her, like a confession. She went at it for a long time.
The details were confusing. It all sounded gibberish at first. Choo-ja ran to the
hospital. When she saw Lee-yeon’s face, she took a step back. Bloodshot eyes, a
reddish nose, and swollen lips. Lee-yeon was blowing her nose with a pile of tissues
beside her.
Okay… okay…. Choo-ja tried to make sense of everything. She witnessed a murder.
The murderer chased her. He got into an accident and became vegetative. And then…
she brought him to the hospital…. Choo-ja checked the bottom of the sofa to see if
Lee-yeon had hidden any bottles of alcohol.
“Choo-ja…”
There was nothing beneath the sofa. Seeing Lee-yeon, who never cried, bursting into
tears in front of her unsettled Choo-ja. What happened to her? She thought.
“Why didn’t you call the police?!” asked Choo-ja, incredulously.
“I had no choice!”
“I have never heard of such a story ever in my life! I knew how stupid you can be ever
since a broke kid like you began spraying nutritional supplements on the mountain!
And now, you’re telling me you brought a vegetative man to the hospital. How
amazing!” Choo-ja said sarcastically.
“Why are you telling me this now!” Choo-ja asked.
“Because…”
It broke Choo-ja’s heart to see Lee-yeon hesitating to tell her the entire truth. She
hadn’t changed since the first time they had met. It didn’t matter how long they had
been together and faced things in their lives, Lee-yeon still couldn’t open her heart to
her entirely. It was always the same. Lee-yeon was only ever open to the plants she
loved so much.
She grew up as a lonely little girl. Even if Lee-yeon looked like an adult person on the
outside, Choo-ja felt that the lonely little girl was still in there somewhere. Choo-ja’s
anger melted away at the thought. She sat down on the sofa beside Lee-yeon.
“So… you have been hiding a man all this time…”
“A vegetative man,” Lee-yeon corrected her, wiping her tears.
“So, then how can I help?” asked Choo-ja.
“Choo-ja…,” stammered Lee-yeon, looking as though she might burst into tears again.
Choo-ja patted her back awkwardly.
“No need to thank me,” said Choo-ja.
“Okay… before anything else, I have to tell you that I lied to him and said I was his
wife.

“What?!” thundered Choo-ja. Lee-yeon flinched. “Are you crazy?! Are you out of your
mind for real?”
Choo-ja almost slapped the back she was patting. Lee-yeon jumped up from the sofa
and ran away from her, around the sofa. “He doesn’t remember anything. He has lost
his memories! I had no choice, he held me so tight as soon as he woke up! I was
scared so I lied to him so that he wouldn’t kill me!”
“You can’t hide the truth forever!” said Choo-ja.
“You don’t know anything, Choo-ja. That man was burying a person alive! He is the
kind of person who would kill you for making eye contact with him!” Lee-yeon gasped
when she was reminded of the terrible scene. “I was scared, okay? What if he had
dragged me and buried me alive?”
“My goodness…”
“I had to come up with something! Especially when it’s a monster like him.”
Lee-yeon put her hands on her waist and stood there for a moment, looking stubborn.
Choo-ja saw a gleam in her tear-filled eyes. “I just want to get back my life back. I
have always worked hard to make a living.”
Her voice trembled. Choo-ja nodded. Lee-yeon wasn’t the kind of person who gave up
so easily. She had always wanted a quiet and peaceful life. Lee-yeon seemed terrified
by the prospect of losing the reins to her life because of this man.
“What if he finds out about everything?” Lee-yeon muttered. “I just have to catch the
real culprit.” Choo-ja frowned because what Lee-yeon said did not make sense.
“Then everything returns to normal,” Lee-yeon mumbled as though trying to convince
herself. She looked like a ghost with her long hair hanging haphazardly down her
back. At that time, that night, all her thoughts and strength had been focused on the
saw she wielded. It must have been quite a blow to push him into a vegetative state.
Lee-yeon knew that everything started from that moment. Her life had gotten out of
control without her being able to navigate it herself. She didn’t want to be controlled.
She would do anything to get her life back without getting caught in trouble for long.
The man could have doubted the whole situation and harmed her. To keep the
situation under control, he had HAD to lie and say that she was married to him. If she
wanted him to do what she wanted, she had to make him believe that she was
someone close to him that he couldn’t hurt.
But that didn’t make any sense to Choo-ja. That cannot be the right answer. Lee-yeon
doesn’t know how quickly a relationship between a man and a woman develops and
changes overtime. She didn’t know how tiring it could get to be stuck with the wrong
person. And a murderer at that!
“I don’t know. I’m not getting involved in this,” said Choo-ja.
“Please!” said Lee-yeon, “Please just pretend like I am married, and you know
everything. Please!”
Choo-ja pressed her temples. Choo-ja had been in a marriage five times. Three of her
husbands had died. She had mourned them. And this bothered her. She found the
man’s situation very suspicious. Why is someone like him with wealth and power here
in the countryside instead of a big, fancy hospital in Seoul where he might have been
taken care of better? And why is his older brother threatening Lee-yeon to take care of
him? Where are his parents?
“Lee-yeon?” a voice called. Choo-ja’s eyes widened at the unfamiliar voice.
It was a very serious kind of voice. A voice that demanded attention from whoever
listened to it. Choo-ja turned around to face him. He walked to her, down the stairs
from the second floor.
“Hello, my son.”


“I’ve never heard of a tree hospital.” Kwon Chae-woo slowly looked around the
interior.
Lee-yeon couldn’t stop rocking her body back and forth as though she was trying hard
not to run away from the man who sat on the sofa in front of her. Choo-ja looked at
Kwon Chae-woo carefully. Choo-ja had decades of data. Ever since she learned
physiognomy under her favorite monk, she had never made a wrong conclusion about
any person.
Is this really the same man who buried a person alive? He looks so authoritative and
handsome.
She couldn’t find any flaws in his cold and neat expression. His long, straight eyes
appeared warm and soft. He didn’t look like a murderer. Besides, he looked
glamorous. She could tell by his face that he was born wealthy.
It would’ve disappointed me if he was just a mere murderer. At the very least, he must
be in a position where he holds authority and power.
“Mother,” Kwon Chae-woo lowered his gaze and called politely. His mouth was stiff
as though he was unfamiliar with such a word. “Can I move over there? I want to sit
beside Lee-yeon.”
Choo-ja was taken aback. She had always been someone who was calm under any
situation of duress. But this time, she had momentarily lost her composure unsure of
how to react. Lee-yeon froze. When both didn’t respond, he looked at them
questioningly. Hence, Lee-yeon moved to the other side of the sofa to sit beside him.
He relaxed. His eyes filling with relief.
“Um…Kwon Chae-woo, Choo-ja is not my mother. She’s a staff here. She has known
me for about 15 years. I think she just blurted out and called you ‘son’ because she
feels comfortable with you.”
“Why do you call me by my full name?”
“What?”
“I want you to feel comfortable with me, too.”
While Lee-yeon was lost for words unsure of how to respond to that, Choo-ja rubbed
her forehead. Perhaps because he had lost his memories, his eyes only focused on Lee-
yeon.

“Is Choo-ja someone important to you?”
“Um…yes.”
Kwon Chae-woo silently stared at Lee-yeon and nodded. “Then I should make an effort
to receive her favor.”
“No, you don’t have—”
Even before she could finish her words, he turned to Choo-ja. “Mother, I’m very sorry
to tell you this, but I might not be able to keep the promises I made with you before
the marriage.”
“I knew that ever since you began sleeping.” Choo-ja responded without hesitation,
completely at ease.
“Lee-yeon told me I was gentle and polite.”
“Yeah, you were.” Choo-ja smiled at Lee-yeon. Lee-yeon could tell that she guessed
this was how Lee-yeon had tricked him.
“I think it will take some time for me to become a husband that Lee-yeon remembers.”
“I know, and of course, I understand.”
“But it won’t take that long. The doctor told me that it wouldn’t be that hard because I
have the inertia that will turn me back to my true self.”
Choo-ja could see Lee-yeon flinched.
“Lee-yeon, when should I start working?”
“You want to work?”
He frowned when Lee-yeon widened her eyes in surprise. “Don’t you find it unfair that
you had to take care of everything by yourself this whole time?”
“No, but…you can rest! Right now, you have to focus on your recovery, Kwon Chaewoo. And it would make me less worried….” She rubbed her pants with her sweaty
palms anxiously.
“Chae-woo.” He corrected her.
“Huh?” Suddenly, he put his arms around the back of the sofa and leaned back.
“It’s Chae-woo,” he said again. “Call me Chae-woo.”
As he spoke with a low voice, he lowered his head and looked straight at Lee-yeon.
She found those eyes more terrifying than anything else.
Lee-yeon stiffened as if someone was aiming a knife at her neck. At the sight of the
woman’s pale face, Kwon Chae-woo suddenly buried his face in his forearm. However,
the tip of his raised eyebrows was still clearly visible.
“You no longer see me as a man?”
For some reason, she couldn’t even move a finger. The sudden change in the
atmosphere reminded her of the day she first saw his eyes in the dark mountain. He
then pressed his temple with his index finger.
“I’m an idiot with only one thing in my head.”
Lee-yeon couldn’t respond.
“Your face.”
Lee-yeon felt like she was sitting on a something sharp. She had to tread carefully.
“Lee-yeon, you don’t know what that feels like,” he continued. “It drives me crazy.” He
scrunched his eyebrows as if it was causing him pain. “All I have in my head is the
face of a woman I don’t remember properly. But it scares me to think that I might
forget that too.”
Lee-yeon couldn’t take her eyes off Kwon Chae-woo, who let out a dry laugh. I
shouldn’t feel this way, but he looks pitiful, Lee-yeon thought.
“I’ll want to become a bad husband if that happens.” He reached out and gently
stroked Lee-yeon’s cheek. Her heart raced in horror. His fingertips were cold, and she
was scared that he might be holding a string or a syringe. Her heart was beating so
fast as if she had just come back from a hundred-meter run.
Seeing Lee-yeon stiff, Choo-ja quietly mumbled to herself, “He’s not just any man.”
Choo-ja took out her cell phone and looked for someone’s number. First, I should find
out who Kwon Chae-woo is.

That night Lee-yeon was alone on the first floor, using ‘work’ as an excuse to stay
there. I will not sleep with that man today no matter what.
She wanted to close and lock the door to the second floor forever, but the lock was
broken, by none other than Kwon Chae-woo. When she peeked into the room through
the slightly open door, she saw that the man was doing push-ups. His upper body was
bare and slick with sweat while loose pants covered his lower body. He didn’t even
pant while working out.
Muscular back, curved midline, bulged veins, and a steady pace. His recovery was
remarkably fast. Lee-yeon could see a great difference between the vegetative man
that he had been and the man he was now, at this moment.
I feel comfortable with plants, but not beasts. The clock chimed and Lee-yeon was
pulled out of her thoughts to the present. Lee-yeon went to her own bedroom and
closed the door. Her breath was rugged. She could feel a stabbing pain at the back of
her head. Since sunset she had only one thing in her mind: How to avoid spending the
night with Kwon Chae-woo?
After a few seconds, there was a knock at the door. “Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo’s
voice called.
She could see the shadow of the man’s feet under the door where the paint had fallen
off. It was her first time being very concerned about the old door that wasn’t locked
tightly
Lee-yeon pulled the blanket over her and tried to block the sound. Just go back! She
repeated to herself. But even from childhood hour, no mercy was ever directed her
way. Her prayers were never answered.
The doorknob shook violently as if it was about to fall off. Lee-yeon bit her lip and
pretended to sleep.
“Lee-yeon, open the door.”
She trembled, hearing his toneless voice. She thought if she could see the eyes of the
man standing outside, she would have felt a little less scared, but his low voice was
enough to frighten Lee-yeon.
The silence fell thickly. How many minutes have passed? Lee-yeon wondered. The
wooden floor creaked outside her door. Lee-yeon flung aside the blanket she had
draped over herself and quietly got out of her bed. At the sound of him moving away
from the door, she could finally breathe easy.
The woman who claimed to be his wife is avoiding her husband. What will he think of
this situation? The moment the clock rang, her body moved first before she could
think. Lee-yeon brought her ears close to the door.
“Did you think I left?” came the voice.

Lee-yeon staggered back from the door in surprise. She covered her mouth and tried
not to scream.
“Where are you going? Come closer.”
When she looked down, the shadow of his feet appeared again through the crack
beneath the door. Perhaps Kwon Chae-woo was also watching her shadow as she
moved away.
Then what’s the creak I heard earlier…. Lee-yeon tried to calm her racing heart.
“Come closer to the door. I can’t smell you.”
“W-what?!”
“Did you not know? You smell like wet grass.”
Bam!
The door shook. Lee-yeon stepped back. The light bulb flickered from the force. Her
palms were wet with sweat.
“I don’t even know who I am without you.” Kwon Chae-woo spoke quietly with his
forehead against the door. “Although my legs and arms are attached to my body, I
can’t really feel whether I’m alive or not.”
She heard something scratching against the door and realized, horrified, that it was
his fingernails scraping on the door. The bedroom felt like a trap. The man was
constantly trying to terrify and deceive her. She felt scared.
“So, tell me I’m not in my dream—”
He hit his forehead against the door once again.
“Tell me I didn’t go insane.”
“Tell me about my past. Anything’s fine. Just convince me that I existed.”
Bam!
His breathing was rough. Lee-yeon had a momentary thought that he could easily
break the old door down. She was petrified. But he didn’t break it down. He just
scraped the door and hit it again. Cold sweat trickled down her spine.
Kind, gentle, polite…
She had uttered those nonsense to Kwon Chae-woo to save herself. The evidence was
in front of her. He was far from anything like it. Lee-yeon was just grateful it had
worked. Her lie had worked.
“Kwon Chae-woo.”
The metallic doorknob rattled again at her voice. She held her hands together and
took a deep breath.
“I’m not wearing anything because I was taking a shower,” she said. She wondered if
he would believe her. “My eyes sting because of the shampoo. Can we talk another
time? This isn’t a very good time…”
There was complete silence for a moment. Unlike the wild and violent door rattling, he
had stooped everything at that moment. He changed in the blink of an eye.
“Okay.” She could hear his low, heavy voice. “Good night.”
It was something she had wanted to hear so much, but she felt unconvinced. Lee-yeon
rubbed her cold hands together, still on edge.
“Remember to keep the door locked.”
His words were the exact opposite of how he had been acting moment before. Leeyeon scratched her forearm reflexively in uneasiness.
Creak.
Finally, Kwon Chae-woo was leaving! As she watched the shadow move away from
beneath the door, she tried to relax her stiff shoulders.
“I’m telling you just in case, but please don’t come up to the second floor.”
“What? Why?”
“I’m thinking of shaving my lower part after a long time.”
Lee-yeon blinked in confusion. She could tell somehow that he was smiling.
“Then Lee-yeon, see you later.”
He spoke like someone who knew that he would not see Lee-yeon for a while. Leeyeon couldn’t sleep properly. On the contrary, Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t wake up for
more than a week after that night.

Lee-yeon had a horrible dream. She woke up drenched in sweat. Her eyes were out of
focus and sleep deprived. She only remembered what day it was when she felt fully
awake.
Ah, it’s ‘that’ day…
She felt all her energy seep out of her body even before the day started.
“Director So!” When she checked her watch, it was way past the time she usually
worked. When she got out of bed in a hurry, her vision blurred.
“Are you having a fever?” Choo-ja asked. She had just come into the room and helped
Lee-yeon up. She touched her forehead to get a temperature, worry lining her
forehead.
“Why is every day so hectic for you?” said Choo-ja. “Take a rest today. There’s not
even much work to do.”
Lee-yeon frowned and pushed Choo-ja’s hands away and stood up. She clenched her
hands to help her tingling hands. “That is when I have more work to do,” said Leeyeon.
“I told you not to! Why are you so stubborn? Take the day off!” said Choo-ja sternly,
with her hands on her waist. “You should just look at your plants on the second floor
for today!”
Lee-yeon veered towards the bathroom. She paused at her reflection in the mirror and
turned the faucet on. The woman in the mirror looked slender. The kid with the
tangled hair was long gone. It was as though she never existed.
I was born wrong.
The girl in the dream wrote it again and again with her tiny hands. I was born wrong. I
was born wrong.
She had had to write that nonstop. The stack of A4 papers far exceeded the height of
young Lee-yeon. It was Lee-yeon’s reflection letter that she had to write whenever she
had spare time until she left home at 17.
“But Director So, there is something I forgot to ask,” said Choo-ja. “Our plant son-inlaw has been sleeping the whole time… how does he even pee?”
Lee-yeon burst out into a laughter. Today is a day no different from any other day. As
always, everything will be okay.
Because she had long since forgotten her birthday.
When Choo-ja first set foot on the second floor, she had looked around the house as
meticulously as a real estate agent. Seeing the neat structure and luxurious furniture,
she had held out a pen and left a checkmark besides ‘A lot of money’ checkbox.
“I heard he goes to the washroom.” Said Lee-yeon.
“In his sleep? Like sleepwalking?”
“Yes.”
“Oh my goodness! What a weird guy.”
Once, Lee-yeon went to see him without much thought, but when she saw Kwon Chaewoo standing tall in the dark, she almost had a heart attack.
“Look at his clear skin.” When Choo-ja tried to reach out, Lee-yeon immediately
grabbed her arm.
“He might wake up.”
“He won’t, I already tried shaking him awake.” Choo-ja insisted.
“But still….” Lee-yeon averted her gaze and took a step back from the bed.
The fuss that continued for a few days was now blurry as though everything had been
a dream. I can’t believe I’ve regained my peaceful life. Lee-yeon looked down at the
man lying like the dead, with a calm face she rarely saw.
Please, she prayed. Please just sleep like this.
“By the way, did you read the newspaper? Remember the elementary school we
attended before? The principal got into a big trouble. There’s a rumor saying that the
playground was turned into a wasteland due to school construction….” Choo-ja
suddenly stopped talking and looked at Lee-yeon.
“You didn’t, right?” Lee-yeon scratched her cheek. Choo-ja widened her eyes.
“Did you report it to the newspaper?!” asked Choo-ja.
“I mean…”
“Are you not going to do your business?! Didn’t I tell you that we make our living by
managing customers?!”
Lee-yeon left the second floor without a word. She could hear Choo-ja yelling at her as
she went down the stairs, but there was nothing she could do about it.
“Do you even have a brain―?!”
Lee-yeon tried hard not to smile. It’s not only the principal who abused trees and used
them only for ornamental purposes. A world that values trees more than humans will
never come, Lee-yeon knew but that wasn’t a problem for her.
Then Lee-yeon, see you later. The sudden chill made Lee-yeon shiver. It had been a
week since the man didn’t wake up. Kwon Chae-woo might have expected the result of
not sleeping together.

“This is crazy!” Lee-yeon, who ate the soil at the root of the tree, clenched her teeth.
She abruptly took off her straw hat with a grim look on her face and went straight into
the restaurant.
“Sir!”
“Welcome! Ah, you! Please leave!” The man frowned as soon as he saw Lee-yeon.
“Are you trying to kill them again?”
“I don’t know what you’re talking about.” The man roughly tapped Lee-yeon on the
shoulder and steered her out the door. She, however, held onto the door, refusing to
leave.
“Last time, you put herbicide in the ringer and killed it—”
“If you keep interrupting my business, I’ll have to call the police.”
“This time, you poured seawater, didn’t you?” She could still taste the saltiness.
The customers began to murmur, seeing them quarrel. The man’s face turned red.
This troublesome bitch is ruining my business.
“I thought it was strange that the ginkgo tree kept withering.”
“I never called you! This is not your business!”
The man pushed Lee-yeon roughly outside the restaurant. He narrowed his eyes at
her. But to Lee-yeon, his worried, trembling eyes were ridiculously easy to read.
“Your hospital went bust because you keep snooping around from house to house like
that, not minding your own business. You know that?”
“I know.”
“If you know, then stop doing the same thing!” He spat on the ground.
Everyone in the village knows So Lee-yeon, the director of Spruce Tree Hospital.
Recently, she became even more well known for her notoriety when the article about
the principal of the elementary school was published regarding the school
construction. Many residents got tricked by her innocent face that contradicted her
personality.
This tree doctor didn’t bother to understand people’s circumstances. She rushed to
save the trees as long as she could help it and people thought she was crazy.
“Just shut up and leave, okay?” said the restaurant owner. “I have the right to do
whatever I want to do with my tree that is on my property, and I will never call your
hospital for help! Stop being a nuisance and go! You are crossing the line!”
“Then who would do it?”
“What?”
“If not me, then who helps that ginkgo tree?” Lee-yeon pointed to the dying tree. “I
know you’re trying to get rid of this because it’s covering the restaurant signboard.”
The man’s face stiffened.
“Every morning, you spray seawater, peel the tree bark, and apply waste oil to kill it.
You inject insecticide into the canopy and cut it with a chainsaw.’ Her voice trembled.
“What will happen to them if I stop caring? Even if they appear no different from a
power pole to people’s eyes, these are living things! Once they have put down their
roots, they deserve to live!” The uneasy feelings that Lee-yeon had repressed since
morning led to an emotional outburst.
“Who are you to kill these trees? What gives you that right? What have they ever done
to you?” She felt sick to her core. It reminded her of the small, trembling hand that
held the pencil and the reflection papers that were piled up as tall as her height.
“It’s not fair for them to be used and thrown away like that.”
The man was angry at the childish stubbornness, but when he saw the woman’s red
eyes, he suddenly couldn’t breathe for some reason.
“Do you want to hear something scary?” said Lee-yeon. “Even after you die, the trees
will live on.”
They’ll live through centuries. Lee-yeon clenched her teeth and held back her tears.

Everything had gotten messed up. It had been a tough day and left her tired. Lee-yeon
sat on the sofa, holding one of her favorite flowerpots in her arms. She was looking for
comfort in her plants. She instinctively looked up at the second floor. She was
startled. She shook her head to clear her mind.
What am I even doing? I shouldn’t even be turning my eyes that way. That man has
nothing to do with me!
It had been a peaceful, uneventful week like Lee-yeon had always wanted. She had
finally found some form on peace in her life, and she relished it. But the longer Kwon
Chae-woo slept, the more sleepless nights Lee-yeon suffered. After the chaotic nights
and days, she had lived with because of that man, this peace and quiet felt unsettling.
She hated to admit it, but she had lived two years with the plant-like man. She had
formed a kind of balance. Maybe this was meant to happen. Lee-yeon became
excessively paranoid and checked on him every night to make sure he was in a coma
and not awake.
“Oh, no, no. Just stop thinking… stop thinking….” Lee-yeon leaned forward and stuck
her nose among the herbal leaves of the plant she was holding.
Lee-yeon raised her head suddenly. What was that?!
It was faint, but she heard a soft cry from somewhere. Frightened, she sat up straight
and alert. The first thing she saw in front of her were the stairs to the second floor.
She looked at them suspiciously. Lee-yeon momentarily debated with herself on what
she should do, then cautiously took the stairs. She opened the shabby door on the
second floor.
The lamp by the bedside gave off a dim light. The man who slept on the bed was so
motionless that he might have been more of a statue than a human.
But I did hear something… Lee-yeon put her fingers close to Kwon Chae-woo’s nose
and mouth. She could feel his breath brushing her skin. She then stood up and looked
around the room. Wasn’t the sound coming from here?
She saw Kwon Chae-woo’s mouth open slightly. Her body stiffened instinctively. But
the man didn’t wake up, and words coming from his mouth weren’t of threat but of
sorrow. He was sobbing in his sleep.
“Ahh….”
Her whole body froze, starting with her ankles. Kwon Chae-woo was crying. Thick
drops of tears fell from the corners of his eyes.
“No…,” he mumbled. His dry lips barely uttered understandable words. “Go. Go
now….”
His face was scrunched up in pain. Is he having a nightmare? Lee-yeon was puzzled. Well, this is new. I never thought murderers had nightmares. If you have done so
many heinous things, then you deserve a nightmare. It’s Karma.
As she looked down at him, she felt that a weight had been lifted off her chest. Her
eyes were fixed on his tears. After a moment he began gasping.
“Hide me…,” he stammered. “Forget…”
The man kept mumbling incoherently. Lee-yeon couldn’t make sense of his words at
all. He looked desperate and even sad.
“Hide me…!”
His handsome face was now distorted in pain. Lee-yeon clenched and unclenched her
hands not knowing what she was supposed to do at this moment. Choo-ja had praised
his handsome features when she had seen him for the first time. While Lee-yeon had
nodded, she had also known that he was a cold-hearted murderer, who would break
anyone’s neck while they were sneaking a peek at his face.
But now, he just looks like he is trying to run away from something.
“—live…,” he gasped.
Lee-yeon had to admit that she was worried about him. She turned away to go back
downstairs but couldn’t stop herself from glancing back again. She hesitantly turned
to him and reached out a hand to wipe his tears, at least. When her hand touched his
heated skin, she got a static shock. She pulled her hand away.
“Looks like you don’t want to sleep, Kwon Chae-woo,” said Lee-yeon. “But I don’t want
you to wake up.”
“Please… I….”
He had only seen him sleeping. His face had either been cold or blank. Seeing him like
this, sad and in tears, was strange. She wiped her hands on her pajamas. So, you are
human, indeed. I had hoped you weren’t…
“But I won’t feel guilty if you don’t wake up forever… maybe just a little. But it’s
better this way.” Lee-yeon ruffled her hair. “I feel less sympathy for you than the trees
out in the streets.” Lee-yeon let out a long, weary sigh and sat down on the chair
beside the bed. Resting her chin on her lap, she began mumbling rambling, “Trees are
clear and gentle while you belong to the poisonous group. Do you know how tricky it is
to handle plants like you? Carnivorous plants are very scary.”
“Don’t cry,” said Lee-yeon as she wiped his tears away again. “You have to wipe your
tears yourself.”
“I couldn’t cry because even when I did, no one heard me,” said Lee-yeon sadly. Only
the trees, the flowers that bloom every season, listened to her story. For Lee-yeon,
who had never had any friends, they have been her only companions.
“Today, I tasted the soil under the tree. It was very salty, but it shouldn’t taste like
that,” she continued. “Are your tears like that too?”
It was Lee-yeons choice to either help Kwon Chae-woo out of his nightmare, or just
leave him be. She leaned towards him and whispered in his ear.
“Who poured seawater on you?” she asked. The man didn’t answer but he frowned.
His nose wrinkled. Kwon Chae-woo continued to gasp and groan.
“Today, you look like a ginkgo tree I saw at the sushi restaurant,” Lee-yeon grumbled.
There are times when you deceive yourself and make bad decisions even when you
know it could turn out to be dangerous. Lee-yeon faced him trying to forget the mild
fever that she had had all day and trying to not run away in fear at what she was
about to do.
“Consider this a birthday present,” she mumbled. Today had been a very bad day and
she wanted to cry. She made up her mind and lay down next to the man.

A sharp sound reached his ears. Kwon Chae-woo blinked and raised his hands in front
of him to brace against the sunlight pouring in. But before he could, the back of his
hand collided with something… someone. He turned to his side, frowning in
puzzlement.
Lee-yeon was sleeping beside him. She clung to his arms. Kwon Chae-woo stiffened.
He forgot what he was going to say. He felt fully awake as though a bucket of ice
water had been upended on his head. He vaguely remembered having a painful
nightmare but all that disappeared when he saw her.
Seems like this man named Kwon Chae-woo was born stupid. My head goes blank at
the slightest touch from her.
So Lee-yeon.
My wife.
A tree doctor.
An accident.
Kwon Chae-woo looked at the woman at his side and pondered a few things that came
to his mind. All the information he heard and found out was nothing special. He
clicked his tongue as if he was annoyed. He remembered the first time he saw her.
The day he finally became conscious, hers was the only face etched into his memory.
He still remembered the strange smell of wet grass and dirt that tickled his nose when
he was near her.
Memory loss came as a big blow. He felt more nauseous and frustrated than he
thought he would be. In place of everything he might have ever done from his birth,
only one face lingered. He didn’t remember his family, his friends, his life. Only her.
It had been instinct. It hadn’t taken him long to make up his mind. The only thing in
his empty head was her face, so he accepted her. But the more he got to know her, the
stranger he found things relating to So Lee-yeon.
“A wife you can’t even remember suddenly appeared in front of you. I was worried
about how uncomfortable this would be for you, so that’s why….”
“No. I could tell at a glance why you are my wife and why you have to be my wife.”
“I couldn’t take my eyes off of you.”
“Kwon, Kwon Chae-woo. Kwon Chae-woo.”
But although her mouth claimed that she was his wife, her body didn’t stop trembling
whenever he came close to her. Her eyes always filled with fear. Her fingers had no
ring marks to indicate a wedding ring. Her house had no wedding photos of them.
There was no sign of delight when she saw him, only fear. Every time he moved, she
flinched. Sometimes, he wanted to gently hold her chin, turn her to face him and ask,
“You are my everything in this world. But why are you so afraid of me?” He wanted to
ask her why she had nursed him back to health if she didn’t want him anymore.
“Good morning,” said Lee-yeon, waking up and rubbing her eyes.
Kwon Chae-woo stared at her with his chin resting on his hand and did not answer.
Lee-yeon’s face slowly hardened.

Lee-yeon was on her guard, studying his face. Kwon Chae-woo could even hear her
racing heartbeat. Look at her, he lifted an eyebrow and thought to himself. Was Kwon
Chae-woo really kind and gentle?
“Lee-yeon, have you been doing okay?” he asked.
“I… yes…”
“I have been feeling under the weather. How long did I sleep?”
Lee-yeon slowly lowered her shoulders in relief at his gentle voice. “A week and a
day.”
He stretched his neck to loosen the stiffness. There was a cracking noise. “Hm… now I
know for sure.”
“Know what?”
“That you hold my mornings.”
Professional findings and examinations didn’t matter to him. When Lee-yeon slept by
his side, he slept peacefully and woke up normally. Without her, he was unable to
wake up.
“I also want to leave my night to you.”
She winced and her face stiffened. She desperately tried to hide her feelings, but he
knew what she was thinking. He knew she wanted to run away from him. He found it
sad seeing her make an attempt to smile at that, not realizing that he had already read
her mind.
Perhaps So Lee-yeon had been waiting for the perfect time to escape from him this
whole time just like the door of her room that didn’t open no matter how hard he
knocked. But he didn’t know for sure. It was something he needed to figure out on his
own. But, in any case, he didn’t want to let her go.
What kind of idiot would let go of the only memory he has? She was his everything in
this world and Kwon Chae-woo was ready to become anything she wanted. He would
be the ‘kind and gentle’ husband she wished for. If that is what she wants.
He would do anything to make her comfortable so that she might confess everything
that might have happened.
So Lee-yeon running away from him—
And Kwon Chae-woo making her stay.
No one knew who would do better.
“Lee-yeon, sleep with me from today.”
The way she tried to avoid his gaze. Kwon Chae-woo lowered his gaze and in doing so,
noticed her wet sleeves. Ah… now I understand why my eyes sting. He felt a warmth
spreading in his chest. He covered his face with his hands trying to hide his smile.

“Kwon Chae-woo, won’t it be better for you to take a break today?” Lee-yeon looked at
Kwon Chae-woo in neat slacks and a round t-shirt. He looked like a college student in
those clothes.
“Are you worried I might cause trouble?” he asked.
“No, it’s not like that…,” Lee-yeon said hurriedly. He’s like a completely different
person!
His messy hair, which had been left untouched for two years, was neatly cut and his
bangs fell to his forehead. As a result, his facial features stood out even more. The
man, loyally looking at her from under the sun, looked different from the murderer in
her memory.
Suddenly, the glistening raincoat he was wearing on top of the beige-tone top flashed
through her mind. The thought made her feel uncomfortable.
“I can go alone,” said Lee-yeon pulling her straw down to cover her face from the sun.
All this happened because of Choo-ja. Kwon Chae-woo had nothing to wear other than
the patient’s clothes until Choo-ja completely transformed him by buying him new
clothes and giving him a haircut.
Lee-yeon, who was thinking about hiding his shoes, laughed at herself. She was acting
like the woodcutter from the fairytale, where the woodcutter becomes anxious of the
fairy wearing her winged clothes.
Lee-yeon had no intention of letting Kwon Chae-woo go out. She didn’t want her lies to
spread. If that happened, then God knows how many times she has to come up with
new lies to cover up her original lie. Her deceiving Kwon Chae-woo was already
making her guilty and shortening her lifespan.
She wanted him to stay inside and focus on his rehabilitation, but the fact was that his
recovery rate was already excellent. What excuse should I use to not let him follow
me?
“Lee-yeon, are you seriously going out like that?” Choo-ja looked at Lee-yeon’s attire
doubtfully. White sneakers soaked in dirt, gray suit too big for her, and a worn-out
straw hat. “Where’s our hospital’s pride?”
“It’s here,” said Lee-yeaon proudly, holding out the file that contained the treatment
log. Although she looked shabby and worked at an even shabbier hospital didn’t mean
she wasn’t competent at her job. No one tree had died under her care. That was her
pride.
“Because you’re like this, you have to take him with you.” Choo-ja glanced at the man
behind her. “From now on, think of him as the face of our hospital. If you take a man
like him with you, all the ladies will be impressed. Who knows, our services might be
sought after even more if the people think flowers will bloom for them too!”
“What are you even talking about?!”
Lee-yeon’s eyes fluttered and she blushed. She awkwardly pretended to tidy her
clothes. Today was the day of bidding briefing session for Beautiful Hwaido promoted
by Hwayang City, the Korean Forest Service, and the city park office. All the officials
from the three sectors would be there.
“Kwon Chae-woo,” Lee-yeon put her hand on her waist and took a deep breath. Leeyeon was looking at the floor, hesitating to speak. She then raised her head and faced
him. “It’s… dangerous outside.”
Choo-ja had a what-nonsense-is-this expression on her face.
“Especially for you, Kwon Chae-woo,” said Lee-yeon.
“Why?”
Because if you’re exposed to strong external stimuli, you may retrieve your memory.
She didn’t say that out loud. Kwon Chae-woo waited silently because he could see that
she was trying to come up with a rational explanation.
“Lee-yeon, are you hiding something from me?” he suddenly asked.
“No!” she said hurriedly. A strange expression flashed across Kwon Chae-woo’s face.
Lee-yeon realized that this minor crack needed to be remedied quickly.
“It’s because you’re too handsome!” she blurted out without knowing what to say.
“The place I’m heading to is full of old men. A young and kind man like you will never
know how scary an old man’s jealousy can be.” Lee-yeon wiped her sweat as if she had
completed a big mission.
“Am I so pretty that you want to hide me?”
“What?”
Kwon Chae-woo fiddled with his ear with a strange expression on his face. It was hard
to tell whether he was smiling or frowning. He pulled and folded his earlobe so hard
that his skin turned red. “Am I pretty in your eyes?”
“Um…” Flustered, she murmured, not knowing what to say. After a short moment of
silence, Lee-yeon decided to convey her intention as vaguely as possible.
“I just want you to stay at home.”
“Is it because you don’t want others to see me?”
“Ah…,” the more she avoided the question, the more she kept getting stuck. Lee-yeon
looked at Choo-ja pleadingly for some help. But Choo-ja was busy giggling at a
distance enjoying Lee-yeon’s predicament.
She had no choice. She needed to convince him, appease him and persuade him
somehow to make him stay in the house.
“We, we are newlyweds. Considering that your time had stopped due to an accident,
we are still newlyweds. So, of course… I want to be the only one who sees you…”
Kwon Chae-woo smiled softly as though he liked that answer. “Then you can’t go out
too.”
“What?”
“Because I don’t want to be apart from you even for a minute.” Lee-yeon was trying to
find a convincing retort. “I will stay quiet,” he continued, “Just think of me as your
favorite flowerpot and take me with you.”
Lee-yeon tried not to flinch at his sharp gaze. Unlike his gentle tone of voice, his eyes
looked tenacious and passionate. If she refused, he would get suspicious of her trying
to isolate him from the outside world. She tried one last time to use honeyed words to
try and convince him.
“Are you sure? You’re still a patient. I know that your recovery speed is excellent but
to be honest with you, I don’t want to bring you to a such complicated place,
especially when you have no memory.”
Her soft cheek, which seemed like it was going to melt by his touch, moved lovingly
every time she spoke. Ignoring his intense gaze, she continued.

“I think it’s too early for us to go out together.” She reasoned out.
“Is it me or you who’s not ready?”
Lee-yeon was lost for words for a second.
“I’ll only do what you tell me,” he said. “I will only do what you ask me to do, and only
what you allow me to do. So, just let me come with you.”
What is he talking about…? Lee-yeon was bewildered. It seemed she was the one with
power here. Looking at him, she recalled the kind of person he was. She perhaps was
a deceitful liar, but he was an obedient murderer. It left her speechless and confused.
There was no other who knew how to make someone lost for words than Kwon Chaewoo.
For some reason, his smiling face lingered in her mind for a long time.

Lee-yeon reached the lobby of the Hwaido Grand Hotel banquet hall.
“Look over there. Spruce Hospital is here too.” People began whispering to each
other.
The moment Lee-yeon’s straw hat passed by the whispering voices stopped. The eyes
glancing at her were suspicious and even fearful. Spruce Hospital was a difficult place
to define for other tree doctors. They couldn’t decide whether the place was an ally or
an enemy.
Especially since there was only young Lee-yeon and an old woman who fit perfectly
like a pair. People gossiped about them. A young tree doctor who was a loner and
didn’t entertain any personal or private conversation with anyone, and the arboreal
therapist, Gye Choo-ja, who used to be a heartthrob of every man in the locality.
In this job, usually people were in their mid-50s or 60s, it was impossible for anyone to
be unfamiliar with Choo-ja. One was an old wise tree, and another a withered flower.
They certainly were a pair.
Lee-yeon felt overwhelmed at the eyes of the people judging her. This is why I hate to
go to places with too many people. Eyes told of so many emotions. No person could
hide their feelings in their eyes. When faced with so many unfiltered, raw emotions,
Lee-yeon usually got a stomachache.
Her hands were getting colder and colder. Suddenly, something warm held her hands.
Startled, she flexibly pulled away but Kwon Chae-woo gently held firm.
“Didn’t you tell me that you’re only going to do what I tell you to do?” Lee-yeon glared
at him. The man smiled slowly.
“I will. Pick one.” Usually, his cold impression drove off anyone from approaching. But
today, his smile made him look so innocent. “Will it be the eyes or the mouth?”
“What?” asked Lee-yeon, puzzled.
“These people who keep looking at you. Is it the eyes or mouth that you don’t want
them to have? If you don’t say it aloud, you can point it with your finger.”
Her mind went blank. She felt her uneasiness disappear.
“Do they know that you’re married?”
“What? N-no―”
“No?” He asked sharply.
Was it a mistake to bring him with me? Kwon Chae-woo spoke threateningly which
made Lee-yeon fear that he might get his memories back. She felt helpless.
“It’s because… you were in vegetative state for a long time. A lot of people probably
don’t know that I’m married.”
His eyes which scanned the place looked scary. Lee-yeon tugged at his sleeve, fearing
that all external stimuli might trigger him to recall his lost memories.
“Just don’t do anything.”
“Is that what you want?”
“You promised. That you will only do what I allow.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at Lee-yeon’s stiff face. “Was I not nice just now?”
“What?” She was bewildered.
“Don’t the owners pet the dogs when they bite things that disturb them?”
Who the hell raises dogs like that…? Kwon Chae-woo fiddled with Lee-yeon’s long
hair. He was frowning slightly. “Did I do something that I’m not supposed to do?”
Lee-yeon felt as though she was floating in space. She looked at his charming face,
unable to think of a suitable answer to his question. There was no hint of mischief in
his light brown eyes but Lee-yeon wasn’t fooled. A man with misplaced sense of
identity in the world sometimes didn’t know the line. And right now, Kwon Chae-woo
could be dangerous even if he no longer recalled being a murderer.
Rather than explaining everything, she decided to make things clear to him. “Yes.”
Kwon Chae-woo turned to look at Lee-yeon at her stern voice. She determined not to
be intimidated by his sharp and persistent gaze like she usually did. He was planning
something in his head, she could see. Soon, he nodded as if he understood her. Leeyeon finally felt relieved and let go of all tension that she had held onto.
Seeing him so gentle, she almost wanted to stroke his hair. She held back on the
impulse but when her hand grazed his, she couldn’t help but panic. “Kwon Chae-woo,
your hands are so hot!”
“Is that making you uncomfortable?”
“What? No. But do you have a fever?”
“I’m okay.”
“Are you sure? But what if something is wrong and your body is manifesting it in the
form of a fever?”
Kwon Chae-woo relished the moment. He had never even thought that someone
worrying after him would make him feel so warm. He bit his lips, looking at Lee-yeon’s
face. She was unaware but Kwon Chae-woo wished he could memorize every part of
her face and immortalize it in his mind.
” I like it.”
“What?” she asked, puzzled.
“I like the feeling of blood rushing every time I see you.”
“Are you really okay?” asked Lee-yeon, worried and suspicious.
“Very,” he said firmly.
He smiled at her. Silence fell in the lobby. Every eye was turned towards Kwon Chaewoo and Lee-yeon. She was highly aware of it. Tall, well-toned body. Hair neatly
trimmed so that his sharp nose was even more prominent. His eyebrows that sat
perfectly over his eyes, and his cold, beautiful eyes. Everyone was mesmerized.
Right at that moment, the door to the conference hall opened. “I have to go now. You
can wait here.”
Lee-yeon turned around to follow the crowd. She realized she had been holding his
hand this whole time. He held ono it a few seconds longer and then let her go.

The Dome Project. The largest botanical garden in Korea was to be built on Hwaido.
Various attractions such as artificial waterfalls, tropical dome-type greenhouses,
outdoor ecological parks, hanging gardens, and tropical rainforest recreations were
public projects that Hwayang City was trying to run to become a place of tourist
attraction. The directors of each tree hospital who gathered for the competitive
bidding could not hide their greedy faces while looking at the aerial view of the 3D
simulation of Hwaidome. But when the speaker’s long presentation ended, the
conference hall erupted into loud talks.
“What did you just say?”
Someone pressed the microphone button that was attached to the long desk. The
director responded mechanically without the slightest hint of emotion. “I said we will
make the competitive bid through an open contest.”
Silence fell in the conference hall once again. Everyone looked confused and
flabbergasted.
“You mean… you’re asking us to audition?” one person asked with barely retrained
anger. The displeasure was reflected in everyone’s faces.
Despite the hostility, the director continued in the same dead-pan tone of voice, “Is
there any problem? We’re trying to entrust the job to the best tree doctor. The plants
introduced into the Hwaidome will be the world’s rarest and most expensive trees. We
need to make sure the best person gets hired for the job. We don’t want scammers
and slackers to get the job through influence of money.”
Lee-yeon flinched at his harsh words. Even the director of D Hospital, who remained
the most confident, was frowning as if this was all ridiculous.
The director, in contrast, continued calmly, “Open contest will be held as a
tournament.”
It would be laborious and time-consuming for public officials to undertake such a big
task. But due to the government’s guidelines for the Green New Deal, interest in
nature had to be put forward as the marketing point.
“As it opens on next Arbor Day, the tournament will be featured in a promotional
video. Please note that the documentary film crew will be present at the contest.”
The director then added the most important thing that everyone wanted to hear. “The
hospital selected in the final is guaranteed a 10-year contract with Hwaidome.”
10 years?! Lee-yeon couldn’t believe her ears. The conference hall erupted once again
in loud talks.
The largest botanical garden in Korea. The most precious and expensive trees. It was
a contract that would bring a huge customer flow and an annuity.

“So, are you going to do it?” asked Kwon Chae-woo, glancing at Lee-yeon.
Lee-yeon entered the nearby cafe, looking down the whole time. She felt exhausted
after being exposed to the rapidly changing emotions of people in the conference
room. Even in the midst of her exhaustion, she felt him glance at her.
“There will be cameras….”
Choo-ja wanted to protest but she held her tongue. But Kwon Chae-woo didn’t. “What
about the camera?”
He didn’t want to miss out on anything when it was about her. Lee-yeon looked at him
and sighed. “It’s just… I want to live as quietly as possible. If my face appears on a TV
show by any chance, things might get noisy.” She shrugged her shoulders as if it was
no big deal, but her face said something else. Kwon Chae-woo nodded, but he knew
that So Lee-yeon was reluctant about something.
“Hey, Director So!” called a voice that she absolutely hated.
Lee-yeon frowned but she quickly hid her annoyance and got up from her seat to greet
him. “Hello.”
“Long time no see! We live in the same area, but we rarely see each other,” said the
director of D Hospital, Jo Kyung-cheon. He was a man with thick hair even at the age
of 60 and was once Lee-yeon’s boss.
Seeing his face exhausted her more, mentally as well as physically. She lamented at
her own bad luck having had to see his face again. There were countless reasons as to
why she hated him from the core of her being.
“Come on, say hello to each other. You two also didn’t get to see each other for a long
time, right?” said Director Jo, as he softly patted the back of his student and pushed
him forward.
Lee-yeon clenched and unclenched her palm. Before moving to Hwaido, Lee-yeon had
lived in Seoul in a small private room of 12-meter square. She felt claustrophobic
thinking about her small, congested room. She tried hard not to frown.
“I called him to come to Hwaido. Two of you used to be good friends. You guys should
get along well with each other. Get to know each other more. Young people should
hang out more than just spend time with trees all day.”
Director Jo had no decency and not courtesy just like in the past. Maybe it made his
life easier to boss people around and make other people’s life awkward and miserable.
His student, Hwang Jo-yoon, looked awkward. He was still nerdy. He stroked his thin
eyebrows gloomily. “Lee-yeon, it’s been a while…”
“It has,” said Lee-yeon, “How have you been?”
After the niceties were done, she turned away.
Before moving to Hwaido, she did a practical apprenticeship for five years under Jo
Kyung-cheon. After graduating from junior college, she had to work her way up from
the bottom in the hospital. It goes without mentioning that people just starting out
were treated like shit and afforded not even the basic human respect. Lee-yeon had
suffered. While Hwang Jo-yoon had been the student Jo Kyung-cheon cherished the
most.
He was said to have been one of the top elites since his undergraduate years. But
aside from that, he stalked Lee-yeon, who had nothing, whenever he got the chance. When she had seen his horrifying, sharp eyes looking through the window of her semibasement house, Lee-yeon had reported it to the hospital. But it was Lee-yeon, not
him, who had gotten fired.
“While you guys talk with each other, I’ll-” Jo Kyung-cheon’s gaze turned to Choo-ja.
Choo-ja got up and secretly winked at Lee-yeon. It was a sign that she would try to dig
up any information she could find. Lee-yeon was so very grateful. She could finally
breathe a little.

When the two left.
“Hey, Lee-yeon.” Hwang Jo-yoon stretched out his arm towards her. Just then, Kwon
Chae-woo sitting next to her pulled her back onto her seat. Hwang Jo-yoon waved his
hand in the air and Lee-yeon looked puzzled.
“Lee-yeon, I’m worried.” Kwon Chae-woo clung to her closely. His body temperature
was warm. “Who is he?”
“Ahm…” Lee-yeon didn’t know where to begin. As she hesitated, his arm on her waist
pulled her closer. She couldn’t tell whether it was anxiety or vigilance that was
making him act that way but when she saw Hwang Jo-yoon flinch she realized it was
the latter. “Is he someone I know?”
She could understand why he was anxious. If Hwang Jo-yoon was an acquaintance,
then it would make Kwon Chae-woo feel awkward to not remember him. The
memories she didn’t want to remember came unbidden to her mind. She swallowed
her bitterness and answered him.
“He used to be a senior at the hospital where I used to work years before,” she said,
“You don’t know him. So, don’t worry about it.”
“Ah… okay,” said Kwon Chae-woo, nodding slowly. But he didn’t retrieve his arm from
her waist. Rather, he had both his arms around her and pulled her close. She wanted
to tell him not to do that.
“Lee-yeon, who is he?” asked Hwang Jo-yoon, glancing at her waist.
“Yes, Lee-yeon. Introduce us,” said Kwon Chae-woo.
Lee-yeon straightened her back at a sudden warm touch she felt through her clothes.
“This is Kwon Chae-woo. He’s the man I live with.”
I will just say we live together….
But Hwang Jo-yoon’s eyes widened. “You-you’re married?”
She was at a loss for words. Kwon Chae-woo leaned towards her and whispered, “You
should at least nod. He is waiting.”
Right! He urged her to answer, and she was highly aware of his arms around her
waist. It tickles! Lee-yeon twisted her body away and nodded at Hwang Jo-yoon.
“I am her husband,” said Kwon Chae-woo as though to confirm it once and for all.
Hwang Jo-yoon asked again. “So, you are really married?”
She was offended at his reaction. He was acting as though it was quite impossible for
her to be married. But he had always been like that. She had experience dealing with
him. He thought he was always right and everybody else was not.
“No, Lee-yeon. Wait a minute. It’s just that I can’t believe it. How can a person like
you get married? No way. Are you alright?” Hwang Jo-yoon’s lips trembled.
Oh, how I hate him! Lee-yeon was always repulsed by him whenever she saw him
secretly spitting on the flower bed whenever he thought no one was watching. She
had absolutely abhorred him from the moment she learnt that he used to snip off
plants in his childhood, killing them just for fun. She got really annoyed at the way his
lips trembled whenever things didn’t go the way he wanted. He was such a brat, ready
to put the blame on others and interfere in other people’s life. Lee-yeon had gotten
sick of the quarrel and that’s why she had left the hospital for good instead of fighting
for her place.
“You weren’t like that before,” said Hwang Jo-yoon.
“What?”
“You are not the kind of person to date a man. You hated being with people. I know
you, Lee-yeon.”
Lee-yeon rolled her eyes at his audacity.
“Who understands a woman who only has time for trees and fertilizers? How can
anyone fall in love with someone like that? You used to make fertilizers in the
weekend and didn’t even go out. This must be a mistake. I am the only one who could
accept you for being the way you are.”
Lee-yeon was amazed. She should have been angry, but she was so amazed at how
little a person could change. How is it that he hasn’t changed at all?
“It’s because I’m not by your side, so you made such a mistake….” Hwang Jo-yoon
widened his eyes and trembled in anger.
Her head began to hurt from overwhelming stress. She was reminded of how helpless
she had felt at her tiny place. Hwang Jo-yoon would always follow her and she couldn’t
even afford to move to a new place at that time.
On days when Lee-yeon took detours not willing to go home out of fear, he would
burst into a rage. She had always gotten angry at her humble beginnings.
Nevertheless, she had forced herself to bear with it because she had to fill in her
practice hours at the hospital. She had tolerated everything so that she could have her
own practice, her own quiet life.
And she finally made it this far by herself. And now…
“Why are you making such a fuss about this?”
“No, Lee-yeon. Was the time between you and me of any importance to you?”
“Clearly not. I never liked you. I hated you. You made my life miserable. It has been
years since I left that hospital. I made my own place in the world. And I couldn’t be
any happier about it. As you can see, I have a husband. I have my own practice. I am
living the best life I could have dreamed of. It looks like you are still stuck in the phase
of your life where you act like a spoiled brat and look down on me. Grow up.”
“Lee-yeon.” He licked his lips.
“You really are shamelessly making a fuss in front of my husband.”
“Is he really your husband?!” he suddenly shouted.
“What did you say?”
“Bring the family relations certificate! Until then, I won’t believe it!”
Lee-yeon froze. She didn’t any anything. Hwang Jo-yoon didn’t trouble her. But if
Kwon Chae-woo asked for it, then everything would be revealed. Her lie would be
caught. She felt a prick at her conscience. She hated Hwang Jo-yoon for trying to ruin
her life even after all these years.
Just then, she heard a faint grunt. It was a sound that only Lee-yeon could hear.

Lee-yeon… Lee-yeon…”
Lee-yeon felt an odd mix of emotions when she heard her name being called. The way
Kwon Chae-woo called her name sounded so different from the way Hwang Jo-yoon
did. Kwon Chae-woo pressed his fingers to his temple as though this was giving him a
headache.
“Stop calling my wife’s name before I kill you.” His cold gaze was sharp as a blade.
Kwon Chae-woo, at that moment, looked a man possessed. A beast in a human mask.
It could have been an illusion, but she felt the temperature drop. The tension in the air
was palpable. Hwang Jo-yoon froze, holding his breath. It wasn’t only him who held his
breath, Lee-yeon didn’t dare move. She recalled the murderer she had seen two years
ago.
What if his headache leads him to recalling his past? Lee-yeon felt restless. Her heart
pounded.
Kwon Chae-woo turned to look at the glass on the table. He let go of her hand he was
holding. What is he thinking? What is he going to do? Is he going to… No!
Lee-yeon hurriedly grabbed his arm and and placed it on her waist. Kwon Chae-woo
paused for a moment and turned to look at her. His eyes were cold and flat like a calm
sea. “Do I really have to stay still?” he asked.
Lee-yeon didn’t respond. “About what I asked earlier… eyes and the mouth. I really
want you to choose this time.” His face was gentle and calm, as though he had never
been angry before. “Or maybe the right ball or the left?” Lee-yeon blinked in
confusion. “Are those options better than before?” he asked.

To diffuse the situation and to prevent Kwon Chae-woo acting out, Lee-yeon hurriedly
left the cafe with him. Her heart pounded so hard that she thought it might explode.
To protect Kwon Chae-woo from harm, shehurriedly left the cafe with him. In the
meantime, her heart started beating so fast that it felt like it was going to explode.
“…before I kill you.” The doctor had said that his memories might return at any time.
Her blood ran cold at the thought. She felt scared and helpless. She was terrified that
the events of the day had triggered him in some way. No… it’s too early to jump into
any conclusions. She tried to calm herself. Her face darkened.
Nothing stimulated Kwon Chae-woo. He observed and reacted to her mood constantly. When Lee-yeon felt the slightest discomfort, the man quickly took a stance. It was like
she had his leash, and she was doing a very bad job of keeping him under control. Leeyeon clenched her fist.
I shouldn’t ruin my own plans…. She decided to be more careful and try to not display
her anxiety in front of Kwon Chae-woo. She had to remain calm and resolute in front
of him. Every time she lost her composure, he would get triggered, so she had to be
careful.
“I will bring this matter to a close with Hwang Jo-yoon!” she declared after returning
home. Kwon Chae-woo turned to her with a cold expression.
“Lee-yeon…,” he began.
“There is nothing to worry about,” she said hurriedly, “I will solve it publicly and
legally. So don’t dwell on whatever happened today, alright? What if your head starts
hurting again?” She studied his face.
Kwon Chae-woo let out a short sigh and ran his fingers through his hair. “Are you
telling me you intend to meet him again?”
“I mean…,” Lee-yeon stopped and jumped up. “The Open Contest! I want to win
against D Hospital and bring them down a peg! That will show them.” She made a fist
to display her unwavering resolve.
Kwon Chae-woo took off her straw hat and her sweater. “What did that bastard do to
you?”
“Um….” Lee-yeon didn’t know how to answer that. She didn’t want to go into the
details. “He is just annoying. He always was. Every time I talked to him back then, it’s
like talking to a wall.”
“Is there anything I can help you with?” he asked.
“Help me by being happy,” she said, “I want you to only see good things from now.”
He frowned slightly, then smiled. “Well, that’s not very difficult.” He looked at her
fondly.
Lee-yeon scratched the nape of her neck and turned away from his gaze awkwardly.
“By the way, Kwon Chae-woo…”
“Yes?”
“Why did you say you would kill him?” She looked up at him.
“I am sorry,” he said, lowering his head.
“No… don’t apologize. I was just curious. I have never seen saying something like
that.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her. “I don’t know. Every time he called you by your name
so rudely, I nearly went out of my mind. I felt angry.”
“Were you really going to…”
“I was trying to restrain myself from ripping out his mouth.” Kwon Chae-woo clenched
his jaw. “You looked so uncomfortable. It seemed to me that you would burst into
tears. I wanted him to shut up.”
Lee-yeon slowly raised her head. Their eyes met. A flicker of relief flashed across his
face as though he could finally breathe again.
“That man was already dead in my mind, Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo said, touching
her eyes. “I can’t be gently and friendly towards people like him even if I tried to.” He
smiled sheepishly.
“So you’re doing it for real?” asked Choo-ja, surprised. She had just returned.
Choo-ja knew well about Lee-yeon’s aversion to interacting with other people. The
constant followers of Lee-yeon from elementary school to university had been rumors,
not friends. She was always very anxious and self-conscious among other people.
“Are you really going to do it?” asked Choo-ja again.
“Yes.”
“Didn’t you say that cameramen might be there and too many people?”
“I might get eliminated even before that happens.…” Lee-yeon fidgeted with her hands
and avoided Choo-ja’s gaze. “For now, my only goal is to take down D Hospital.”
Choo-ja could only blink, perplexed. She sounded so determined. Why is so
determined while looking at Kwon Chae-woo at that? Choo-ja watched Lee-yeon
closely. Did something happen?
“Sorry, I am not being any helpful,” said Kwon Chae-woo.
“No! It’s alright. You have always been there.”
His face darkened. No matter how much he thought about it, her words didn’t sound
like the compliment it was meant to be. “Lee-yeon, what do you even like about me? I
can neither help during the day or night. I feel worthless.”
“That’s because you were like a plant.”
“What?”
Oops. Lee-yeon smiled at him, trying to undo the damage. “I meant that you were
always so quiet and gentle, lost in your own world,” she said, “Often you wouldn’t
answer my calls. I have always been the one who talked endlessly, while you listened
to me quietly.”
Choo-ja nodded, supporting her statement. She was probably talking about the time
when he was in a vegetative state. My, my… she can spin very convincing lies.
“…And I became more comfortable with you as time passed.”
Choo-ja frowned. She wasn’t sure whether Lee-yeon was lying to make it sound like
the truth or her inner true feelings were actually bursting out of her mouth right now.
Sometimes, when you fight a monster, you become the monster. Choo-ja looked at
Lee-yeon. Is she lying to deceive him or herself?
“Does that answer your question?” asked Lee-yeon.
Kwon Chae-woo stared at Lee-yeon deeply, as though his gaze was trying to drown
her.

“Should we go to bed now?”
The time had finally come. She had known from the time she had woken him, driven
by needless sympathy, that she would not be able to come up with a convincing
enough excuse to refuse to share the bed with him. She couldn’t find a way out of this
problem. If she suggested using different bedrooms, doubts and questions would
surely spring up. And Kwon Chae-woo would forever be suspicious of her.
“I will take a shower and meet you up on the second floor,” she said.
“Well, can we shower together then?”
“What?! No,” said Lee-yeon, shocked.
“Why are you so surprised?” asked Kwon Chae-woo.
“Because I am… I was brought up in a conservative household,” she said hurriedly. “I
was always taught it was scandalous to even sit near a boy after the age of seven. I
know it sounds weird but that was how I was raised.”
“Wow… does that include your husband too?”
“Marriage is not a free pass to everything, you know.”
“Then what is?” Kwon Chae-woo moved closer to her. “Teach me, Lee-yeon,” he said
softly. “There are a lot of things I have forgotten.”
She tried to say something but was at a loss for words.
“Lee-yeon?”
“Y-yes?!” she squeaked.
“I think my self-efficacy will go down if you continuously avoid doing anything with
me. You never use me as your husband.”
Lee-yeon couldn’t respond.
“Because I am like this, you neglected me for a week and didn’t wake me up. You
don’t really need me. Am I wrong?”
Her blood suddenly ran cold. He wasn’t wrong, and that made her frustrated and
embarrassed. It seemed like the man had read her innermost thoughts that she had
wanted to hide the most.
“The doctor said nothing is certain yet. And I was always by your side when you were
asleep…”
They were pathetic excuses and she knew it. Even Lee-yeon herself found her excuses
half-hearted, and she trailed off. The man shook his head as if he didn’t care.
“I only know that you hold my mornings.” His words evoked a strange sense of guilt in
her. Her being insincere could make him doubt everything.
“It’s okay if you don’t want to teach me,” he said, “But don’t let that deny me from
doing my job as your husband.”
“And that ‘job’ entails taking a shower together?” asked Lee-yeon reluctantly.
He tilted his head and looked at her. “I don’t understand, Lee-yeon. What are you
afraid of? We surely have been intimate in our relation before, right? This is just a
shower.”
Lee-yeon was lost for words. Her lies were coming back to bite her.
“The reason why we had no interest in having sex might have been probably because
we are always so distant,” he suggested, “Be a little open with me.”
Lee-yeon ran out of excuses and no longer had anything to say. She just wanted him to
be quiet. “Okay,” she said, “I will let you wash my back. Only my back, nothing more.”
He smiled contentedly.

SplashThe slash of water was just frightening now. This is crazy! Absolutely crazy! After
getting into the bathtub, Lee-yeon turned her back towards the door and faced the
wall. Although she was the one trying to deceive him, she felt like she was losing.
―Knock, knock.
He knocked on the bathroom door.
“C-come in.” Her heart raced. She had witnessed this man burying a person alive in
the mountain two years ago. He had tried to kill her too!
Is it really okay to do this? I want to erase this moment. The foggy bathroom air made
her feel dizzier.
“Lee-yeon.”
She had now become familiar with the sound of his voice calling her name. She was
surrounded by warm air and hot water, but a coldness touched her heart. Kwon Chaewoo dragged the chair nearer to the bathtub.
“Are you feeling okay?” he asked.
“Yes.”
“Is it just the back you want me to wash?”
“Y-yes!” Lee-yeon intentionally made the water frothy to make more bubbles in the
bathtub.
From the moment Kwon Chae-woo came inside the bathroom, she gazed straight at
the wall. She thought it was immensely better to turn her back to him than to face
him, in which case, he might see her chest.
“Are you wearing your panties?” She could hear his faint laugh.
“What?! You can see that?” Lee-yeon flinched. She made a cloud of bubbles around
her to obscure everything. She could feel his gaze.
“Are you wearing that because you are embarrassed?”
“Shouldn’t you be more embarrassed than me? You have no memory whatsoever. I-I
am quite used to it, but I am worried it might be uncomfortable for you to see me like
this…”
“Is that so?” Kwon Che-woo plunged his hand in the water in the bathtub and Leeyeon flinched suddenly. Her back stiffened. Her words were opposite to her actions.
“Why are you acting so cute Lee-yeon?”
She had to guess his actions solely by relying on her hearing. It made her even more
nervous.
“Why are you still being needlessly considerate?” He laughed playfully. His hand was
still inside the water.Lee-yeon wanted to turn around and face him but she had no
choice. She didn’t want to show him her front.
Kwon Chae-woo also wasn’t really as calm as he made it out to be. When he saw her
slender back, he felt an urge to touch her skin, caress her. There was no part of her
body that didn’t catch her attention. If I become greedy and let my desires consume
me, will she run away? He wondered. He looked at her back, her nape, her fragile
shoulders, and her thin waist.
Kwon Chae-woo felt a stir at the lower part of his body. He was already hard. He
lamented losing his memory. Maybe he had been allowed to touch every part of her
body before. He would have spread her legs and kissed her.
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. He wanted his memory back. She had said that they weren’t
sexually compatible, but his body said otherwise. There was never a moment as this
when he wanted his memories back so desperately.
“Lee-yeon, what is this?” He blurted as his fingers slid down the skin of her back,
tracing her scars.
“Get a towel! A towel!” Lee-yeon exclaimed, trembling at his touch.
But Kwon Chae-woo only stroked Lee-yeon’s old scars without a word. He let his
fingers linger a while above each of them as though he could absorb them into his
skin. “Were you abused?”
“It’s nothing.” His touch made her shiver. She turned her face to look at him over her
shoulders.
“That’s not an answer.”
She lowered her head onto her knees. Seeing her slump like that made him feel sad.
He wanted to bite her nape. His emotions were all haywire. An unbearable desire
settled within him. He pushed the chair back and stood up. “Who did this to you?”
A scar is a sign of abuse, thought Kwon Chae-woo. He didn’t need his memory to
understand that. The scars looked as though her skin had been stabbed with a sharp
tip, maybe the tip of a pen or scissors. He frowned.
“You don’t have to tell me if you don’t want to.”
Lee-yeon shook her head. It wasn’t that she didn’t want to talk about it, but she was
just confused. This was all very new to her. Nobody had ever asked her about it in her
entire life. Nobody had ever been interested in her life. So she didn’t know how to
answer.
People had blamed her for it. Everyone had assumed she was a troubled child who
was worthless so instead her family was the one having a hard time dealing with her.
She had thought she deserved the abuse and neglect she received.
Lee-yeon splashed some water on her face and hoped her eyes would stop stinging.
“My family.”
Kwon Chae-woo remained silent. His suspicions about Kwon Chae-woo being ‘gentle
and kind’ began to grow stronger. What if he had done this too before he lost his
memories? It wasn’t just the scars, he could see black spot were bruises used to be on
her skin.
“It’s okay. You don’t have to believe me,” said Lee-yeon with resignation.
“I believe you,” said Kwon Chae-woo at once. Lee-yeon’s shoulders flinched. “Your
family must have been pretty garbage to do this to you.”
“I don’t know, but there must have been a reason for it.”
“There’s no reasonstrong enough to hit a child until it leaves scars.” He clenched his
teeth, suppressing his anger.
“It can happen even you love your child too much.”
He had rushed to her always from the moment he woke up, trying to get close to her,
like an animal in heat. Kwon Chae-woo was wrecked with guilt. He could now guess
the reason behind her aversion to touch, or any form of intimacy. Kwon Chae-woo
froze as though the truth had hit him like a blow.
“Love can turn into anger so fast,” said Lee-yeon. “Humans are different from trees.
They don’t love unconditionally despite their claims. When anything bears bad fruit,
people can’t stand it.”
Kwon Chae-woo closed his eyes tightly.Everything made sense. He could finally
understand her behaviors. He couldn’t brush off the thought that he might have been
part of the problem. The way she was terrified of him could mean their marriage had
also done terrible things to her.

Kwon Chae-woo silently caressed her skin. Lee-yeon tried hard to ignore the feeling of
his hand touching her back.
“What are you doing? Use the washcloth over there.”
“It looks painful.”
“What?”
“If I use the washcloth, it might make your skin sore.”
“What? Then… what is the point of taking a bath?” Lee-yeon bent over and hid the
bruises she got from branches and thorns. This was normal in the type of environment
she worked in.
“Then let’s skip the bath today…”
“What the… are you kidding me?” Lee-yeon turned around and stared at him, furious.
First, he wanted to bathe together even when she refused and now, he was saying
this.
“I’ll just―” He paused for a moment. “I will do it my way.”
His warm palms touched her back. With his rough hands, he gently massaged her
shoulders. Whenever he pressed the middle part of her back, she flinched. She was
uncomfortable of the heat between his palms and her skin.
Lee-yeon bit her lips and held her breath. The air was humid and moist and warm. When the tip of his finger brushed under her breasts, she quickly covered them with
her forearms. He rubbed his thumbs in circles along the spine down to her waist. Leeyeon felt like melting into the hot water.
Feeling awkward and nervous, Lee-yeon fixed her eyes on the ceiling. It’s because of
the water. The water is hot and it feels like my face is burning.

After taking a shower together, she was less reluctant to lie on the same bed with him.
The warm bath, however, had made her cozy and drowsy. She let out a weary sigh.
“Goodnight, Kwon Chae-woo.”
He lifted the blanket, draped it on her and laid down beside her on the bed. The
mattress suddenly felt too small to Lee-yeon. But she felt so comfortable that she
slowly closed her eyes. Today was such a long day, she thought, will everyday be like
this? It’s the first time I spent the day together with him. Not everything was as I had
wished for but… it wasn’t entirely bad…
“Are you sleepy already?”
“Yes…,” mumbled Lee-yeon, then she jerked up awake and sat upright.
“What’s wrong?” asked Kwon Chae-woo.
Why am I feeling this comfortable? Lee-yeon panicked. Did I just think the day wasn’t
entirely bad? What is wrong with me?! The man tried to kill me, and I hit him with a
saw! He might just kill me if he gets his memory back.
Lee-yeon made a fist and hit herself on the head. Kwon Chae-woo got up and grabbed
her small fists. “What are you doing?” he asked.
Lee-yeon looked at him. What the hell is this? Am I really this comfortable lying next
to a murderer? Get a grip, Lee-yeon! Don’t forget about the slaughterhouse! How the
hell can I sleep peacefully next to a murderer? Lee-yeon’s face turned pale and she
turned away.
“Lee-yeon.” Kwon Chae-woo held her chin and turned her face to him. When their eyes
met, Lee-yeon immediately closed hers, trying to brush off her thoughts.
“Open your eyes.” He said gently.
Lee-yeon didn’t open her eyes.
“I don’t understand why you’re acting like this. Why did you put your leg out on the
floor?’
She had instinctively lowered her leg on the floor, ready to bolt. She wanted to turn
her face away from him but he held on. She bit her lips in protest.
Kwon Chae-woo’s face stiffened at her rejection. “Are you really not going to open
your eyes? Are you not going to even look at me? You don’t even want to talk to me?”
Lee-yeon didn’t respond to the man’s impatient voice.
“Lee-yeon, have you ever made someone go crazy?”
Just then, Kwon Chae-woo bit Lee-yeon’s neck lightly. Lee-yeon opened her eyes in
surprise. A short scream escaped her mouth.
“The answer is probably no, because you are being too reckless.”
He buried his head in her neck, licked, and sucked her skin even harder. He was
biting and scratching her like a person who had lost his mind. Her body odor was
heady enough to seduce him.
“Ah…” Lee-yeon squirmed in his grip and groaned in pain. But it only made him more
excited. His head went blank. He only wanted to quench his thirst and nothing else
mattered to him anymore. He held her face with one hand, and the other one grabbed
the back of her head. He wanted to have every part of her, even her blood.
“Ah!” cried Lee-yeon. Kwon Chae-woo pressed his teeth deeper into her soft skin. His
thirst had been ignited since morning.
His drawers were slowly getting wet because of the precum exuded from the tip of his
manhood. Just the act of licking her nape made him heated. This is not enough, I want
more, he thought. Something deep inside him craved for more. Kwon Chae-woo
wanted to devour her, body and soul.

“Is your memory back?” asked Lee-yeon, trembling in his arms. Her question startled
him. “Is it?!” she asked again.
Lee-yeon was scared. A loyal and gentle person suddenly biting her neck so
aggressively could only mean he was back. He was insane. She was scared of the
worst scenario that could happen. He could kill her.
“Is your memory back?” Her voice was distraught. It sounded fearful.
It brought Kwon Chae-woo to the present. He stopped what he was doing. He looked
at her bruised neck and at Lee-yeon who was trembling. It looked painful. “No…,” he
said, ashamed, “No, Lee-yeon.”
Lee-yeon’s eyes reflect fear and suspicion. Her blood ran cold. She studied Kwon
Chae-woo with terrified eyes.
She looked at him as though she saw a monster. Kwon Chae-woo was overcome with a
sense of guilt and shame. Her eyes told the story of the kind of person he might have
been in the past. When his excitement quietened down, he was only left feeling
ashamed.
“Lee-yeon, I’m sorry.” he said. “I lost my mind for a while and made a mistake.” He
ran his hand through his hair and lowered his head. He then covered his eyes with his
palms. “I am really sorry.”
However, questions were boiling within him. But why would she ask me if my
memories were back? Is it because I touched her? What did Kwon Chae-woo of the
past do to her for her to react like this? He took a deep breath to calm himself.
He took a deep breath to calm himself down. “Lee-yeon, we’d better not sleep
together today.”
“What?”
“That will be my punishment. I will give up my morning.” He looked at her. “It doesn’t
matter if it extends to a month or two. Don’t wake me up until you can forgive me.”
Kwon Chae-woo got up from the bed. What the hell does he mean? Is he for real? Leeyeon watched with wide eyes as he started walking away. She was immensely relieved
that his memory wasn’t back and she could sleep alone. She winced as she felt her
neck.
She got up from the bed and followed Kwon Chae-woo. “Kwon Chae-woo, wait!”
He looked up at her urgent voice from the bottom of the stairs. When their eyes met,
he cursed in a low voice. Lee-yeon could tell that it was a really bad cuss word.

Kwon Chae-woo opened his mouth slightly and frowned as if in pain.
“What’s wrong? Are you alright?” asked Lee-yeon, confused. She walked down the
stairs but Kwon Chae-woo held up a hand to stop her.
“Just stay there,” he said with a restrained voice.
“Why?” she asked.
“If you come any closer, I won’t be able to let you sleep alone. So, just stay there.”
Lee-yeon didn’t move.
“Or, is it that you want to see me cum?”
Lee-yeon’s eyes involuntarily turned to his lower body. She realized he was still
aroused.
“Does that mean you want to see it?” He narrowed his eyes.
“What?! N-no!” said Lee-yeon and averted her eyes.
“Really?” he said, “You just looked very interested seconds ago.”
“I was not,” Lee-yeon shot back. “I was just checking to see if any dropped on the
floor. As the owner of this house, I have to keep it clean. I can’t afford to be as
careless unlike someone.”
She was annoyed. She avoided his gaze.
“The floor is fine. For now,” he said, equally annoyed. “But if you make me stand here
like this, it won’t be fine for long.”
Lee-yeon’s face turned red. Kwon Chae-woo clenched his teeth as though he had a
hard time holding himself back. Her blushing made it harder for him.
As soon as he made up his mind, he quickly turned around and crossed the first floor.
Lee-yeon watched blankly at him walking away. She then realized she had come here
to say something.
“Wait!” she said, bounding after him. “If you want to sleep alone, then we should
change rooms. Wait, why are you going to my room? Where will I—”
Kwon Chae-woo had slammed the door close and locked the room from inside. This
was the first time she had seen him like this.
Meanwhile, Kwon Chae-woo tried hard to ignore her voice. Her bed with her odor was
a terrible paradise to him. It reminded him of her. He buried his face in her pillow and
stroked and rubbed his member to satiate his yearning for her.

“Is it just you, Choo-ja, and me in this hospital?” Kwon Chae-woo had once asked on
his way to the meeting banquet.
“There is one more person. But he is more like an insect doctor. But… it’s been a
while since we have seen him. He is busy with school.”
“Is he also a teacher?”
“Um… he goes to elementary school.” Lee-yeon hadn’t given any more information.
Kwon Chae-woo would eventually meet him after all.
“Director!” The front door swung open, and a voice of a young boy filled the room. The
child was carrying a big backpack that looked like it was about to pop with the
contents, but his stride was purposeful. The child was holding a transparent insect box
in his arms.
It was Lee Gyu-baek, a 7-year-old boy, who had just entered elementary school.
“Now I can tell the difference between a large twenty-eight-spotted ladybug and an
ordinary twenty-eight-spotted ladybug by myself. This summer I will catch the Chinese
star-fat fly and study it.”
As always, Gyu-baek rambled on about his knowledge rather than a ‘hello’. The child
took a seat, took out a book on insects and started reading.
There were two good news. One, first tournament criteria for the Hwaidome Project
was revealed. Second, the insect doctor had finally visited the hospital after a long
time.
Lee-yeon waved at the child and turned back to hercomputer. A total of 50 companies
participated in an open screening. Among them, the first opponent of Spruce Hospital
was Green Tree Hospital, which she knew a lot about.
The hospital was considered stable in many ways, including skills, reputation, and
career. Judging from the objective management indicators, Spruce Hospital has a long
way to go to be compared with Green Tree Hospital.
“So, what’s the first tournament about?” asked Choo-ja, walkingup to her.
“Pruning.”
“They’ve been makingsuch a fuss about this contest that I thought the first challenge
would be a difficult one. But… pruning? Really? That’s a piece of cake! Do you want
me to clean the scissors for you?”
“I know. But the thing is….”
“What?”
“The tree is 30 meters tall.”
Chho-ja and Lee-yeon looked at each other and fell silent. The problem was that the
tree was as high as a ten-storey building. It seemed that the city of Hwayang had
saved the complicated cases just for this public contests.
Lee-yeon looked intently at the picture attached to the email. A deformed, narrowly
bent branch of the tree was stretching out to the road.If it broke, it would be a
disaster. It could fall on the cars driving below and cause a terrible accident.
“Wait, what does this mean?” Choo-ja frowned, reading the email. “You can’t use a
ladder-truck?”
By making the situation complicated, the organizers had made their intention clear.
“Looks like we will have to climb the tree by ourselves.”
The test seemed to be focused on the stamina of the tree doctors. The tree doctor’s
job was physically demanding and they often had to climb trees to perform surgeries.
The test was targeted to see if the tree doctors were dedicated and unafraid to do just
that.
“But even if you can climbthat tree, the branches might not withstand the weight of a
person!” said Choo-ja. She was right. Climbing such a tall tree and pruning it wasn’t
going to be easy. Lee-yeon glanced at Gyu-baek, who had walked up to the door to
Lee-yeon’s room.
“Wait!” said Lee-yeon, “You can’t go in there!”
Lee-yeon ran to stop him but the child was faster. He turned the door-knob and
entered her room. Silence fell. A man was lying on Lee-yeon’s bed. The curtains to her
room was closed. His pale skin and eyelashes looked as though frozen.
“Never seen an insect like this before.” Gyu-baek widened his eyes and mumbled. The
child’s eyes twinkled at the unexpected sight. Then, he carefully pulled down the
blanket covering the man.
“This male insect consists of a head, torso, and legs, and boasts a perfect body with
his two arms and two legs.” Gyu-Baek spoke as if he was writing down an entry in
anencyclopedia. It was Gyu-baek’s own way of making sense of strangers.
“It is characterized by its length longer than the bed, large hands and feet, and a
sharp nose.” Gyu-baek said, touching his nose bridge. “The male genitalia—”
“Stop, stop!” Lee-yeon pulled the child out of the room and closed the door. Gyu-baek
looked up at Lee-yeon with bright eyes filled with curiosity.
“Is he your boyfriend?”
“No.”
“Male enters the female’s nest to spend estrus with her or guard their eggs. Animal
Encyclopedia, page one hundred and ninety-three.”
Lee-yeon coughed and scratched the back of her neck. “I told you it’s not like that.”
“You caught the male and stuffed him.”
“What?!”
“That male… he is a rare species.”
Confused, Lee-yeon looked at Gyu-baek without a word. “I like the shape of the male.
He looks cool. With his strength and body, he’ll be a good hunter. His teeth are hard.
His legs are strong.”
Gyu-Baek’s eyes twinkled with excitement. Lee-yeon let out a long, weary sigh. “Gyubaek, he’s not rare but dangerous.”
“Strong males are inherently dangerous.”
Not knowing what to say, Lee-yeon rubbed her forehead. Gyu-baek didn’t stop his
annoying chatter. “The male doesn’t wake up. He sleeps even during the day. You only
like plants. Therefore, you probably caught him by using poison.”
Lee-yeon shook her head. She opened the living room curtains to ventilate the
overheated room. A scream escaped her mouth. Hwang Jo-yoon was at the window,
climbing it like an insect and trying to look inside. He cheeks were pressed against the
window glass. She gathered herself from the shock and opened the window.
“What in hell are you doing here?”
“Lee-yeon.” Hwang Jo-yoon looked at Lee-yeon sadly. “I saw a kid going into your
house.”
“So?”
Hwang Jo-yoon glanced over Lee-yeon’s shoulder. Gyu-baek looked at him and started
writing down in his encyclopedia again.
“This male, which consists of a head, belly, and legs, has a very strange shape. He
doesn’t look good,” muttered Gyu-baek.
“Gyu-baek.” Lee-yeon tried to stop him.
“With two arms and two legs, he barely has the assortment, but his appearance
outside the window looks very weird. He seems out of his mind.”

“What did you say―?!”
Hwang Jo-yoon raised his voice as though he was offended. “Ho-ho,” said Gyu-baek as
if he had found the most interesting thing ever. “It even foams at the mouth.”
The child was right. But that didn’t sit right with Hwang Jo-yoon. No one ever could
guess what would make him go crazy. Lee-yeon shut the window, made Gyu-baek sit
on the sofa and went out the front door. Hwang Jo-yoon stood there, waiting.
“If you snoop around my place again, I’ll call the police,” said Lee-yeon.
“Is he your child?”
“That is none of your business.”
Gyu-baek was a brilliant child. People were amazed when they found out that he
worked at the hospital while being in elementary school. However, Hwang Jo-yoon’s
question was meddling in her personal life.
“So Lee-yeon!” he cried.
“Was…was it because of him that you disappeared like that?”
“What do you mean I disappeared? I got fired because of you.”
“No way… I took good care of you and looked after you! But how! How can you, of all
people, have a child!”
Lee-yeon sighed. He clearly wasn’t listening at all. His eyes twitched in rage and he
pressed his palms to his face.
“I’m calling the police.” Lee-yeon took out her phone and dialed for the police.
“Lee-yeon, no matter how much I think about it, I can’t believe you got married. Were
you forced to live with him because of some debt or due to unavoidable
circumstances? If that’s the case, I understand. I can help.”
I really hate those eyes. Vile, filthy thing. He was an idiot. He loved nothing and no
one more than himself. He always wanted to play the savior even when nobody needed
one. Least of all, Lee-yeon. She just wanted him to disappear from her life.
He was a fool and a stalker. And he knew how to wield his influence. It was a sad and
frustrating thing to be a target of someone as petty as him.
“Hello, police station?” said Lee-yeon, glaring at Hwang Jo-yoon. “A stalker broke into
my house.”
“Lee-yeon, I’m just really worried about you!” said Hwang Jo-yoon animatedly.
“Seems like he’s drunk,” said Lee-yeon into the phone. “He’s making a scene and
talking nonsense.”
“So Lee-yeon!” Hwang Jo-yoon’s face turned red and acted as though she had
betrayed him. “Is caring for you considered a crime?!”
Lee-yeon put the phone away from her ear for a second. “No, but stalking someone is
definitely a crime, and so is snakingly climbing up their windows. You find pleasure in
killing insects!”
Her eyes are unfamiliar.Hwang Jo-yoon thought to himself. The So Lee-yeon he
remembered from the past had been a lonely, easy-going girl who had been easy to
convince and subdue. Director So of today gave off a very different aura.
Somebody who had witnessed a murder and had been forced to live with a murderer
for two years would obviously change. Lee-yeon had always lived on edge and alert
about everything. It was no surprise that she was more cautious now. For Lee-yeon,
every day was a danger and she had to tread carefully. The man in front of her right
now didn’t really faze her as much as it would have, in the past. She had become bold.
“It’s just funny how you play with ants, kill small helpless insects and pretend to be so
mighty. Even my eight-year-old Gyu-baek doesn’t do that. It’s funny how a child is
more mature than you, an adult man.”
Hwang Jo-yoon’s lips twitched in anger. “Are, are you sure about who your husband
is? When we met last time, it seemed like he had a problem controlling his temper.
Are you not struggling to live with a man like him?” He sounded pushy. “Am I asking
too much? We can go to the district office together, and you can show me the
document, and it’s all done!”
“Enough!” yelled Lee-yeon. “I don’t have to prove anything to you. Who the hell are
you anyway?”
“Your attitude is driving me crazy, you know that?” He shouted with his spit flying.
“It’s not that I’m a psycho, it’s that you’re the bitch that drives me to act like this!”
Lee-yeon realized that nothing she said would matter. She didn’t want to argue with
the worthless shit anymore. I’d rather just beat him up and break his jaw. When Leeyeon raised her arm as if to throw a handful of dirt piled up on the cart, Hwang Joyoon staggered back.
“Mind your own businesses. My personal life is not your concern. There’s absolutely
nothing about you that’s appealing. I wonder where your confidence comes from, you
worthless piece of shit.”
It had been several years since Lee-yeon got kicked out of Hospital D because of
Hwang Jo-yoon. He claimed to love her, but the truth was he could never love anyone
but himself. He was toxic. He was a stalker. He just wanted to own her. He probably
tried making other women’s life miserable and when they didn’t put up with his shit,
he was targeting Lee-yeon again because she had been easier to control in the past.
“I have a very scary husband,” said Lee-yeon.
“Lee-yeon…” said Hwang Jo-yoon, almost begging.
“He isn’t afraid of anybody. And yes, he sometimes has difficulty controlling his
temper. Not with me though. He does bite, you know. So, if I were you, I would run.”
Suddenly she was reminded of ‘the night’ when Kwon Chae-woo buried his face in her
neck. She suddenly became embarrassed and let out a cough. She then lowered her
voice and spoke firmly. “Besides, he’s good at burying things.”
She gestured towards the yard full of shovels. “You better stay out of sight. He is
already angry at you.”
Lee-yeon turned around and went inside. Hwang Jo-yoon was not someone who
heeded any kind of warning. He stared at her receding back and recalled the twentytwo-year-old Lee-yeon whom he had known. I must lead this stray lamb to the right
path, he thought.
Cold spring breeze blew. Lee-yeon closed the curtain. Hwang Jo-yoon was still
standing outside, staring at her coldly. His eyes reminded her of the black lens of a
camera. He looked angry. Lee-yeon’s face hardened. She was sick of his creepy eyes.
From that day, Hwang Jo -yoon’s stalking started yet again.

I want to wake Kwon Chae-woo. The thought of Kwon Chae-woo occupied him. She
could think of nothing else.
“Really…again?” The police officer at the front door was bored. Lee-yeon was
stressed. It didn’t matter how many calls she made, nothing ever changed. Every
morning when she opened the door, she found roses at the porch. She could feel his
tenacious gaze everywhere.
She ran in Hwang Jo-yoon multiple times a day. He seemed to be wherever she was.
He would say hello to her. She wouldn’t respond. She was on the verge of a mental
breakdown.
I should have called the police when he was clinging on my window. Filth, vile
cockroach! Lee-yeon collected the fingerprints from the windowsill with tapes. She
even bought and set up a trap for catching animals.
“As I said before, his face and identity cannot be confirmed by the CCTV cameras.
Besides, several people other than the man also glanced at your house over the wall.”
“ What about the roses?”
“There is an alibi who can confirm that Hwang Jo-yoon was already at his work at that
time.”
Lee-yeon wiped her face, looking stressed. Her face darkened even more. “Then what
am I supposed to do? You are the police! He watches me all day. You are supposed to
help me.”
“Is that how you feel?” The police looked at her and let out a sigh. Lee-yeon knew he
was judging her. His tone was so very patronizing. She felt helpless and discouraged
to speak more.
In the end, the police left without offering her any solution. A young policewoman who
had been watching everything unfold came up to her. After making sure the policeman
was in his car, she whispered to Lee-yeon.
“Local big-shots are involved in this case,” said the policewoman.
“What?” said Lee-yeon. She felt a sinking feeling in her stomach.
“I went to Hospital D to check Hwang Jo-yoon’s alibi, but the authorities immediately
contacted our police box, warning us not to mess with them.”
Lee-yeon’s fear had come true. She couldn’t respond.
“I’m sorry.” The policewoman looked at her sympathetically.Lee-yeon nodded. It was
no surprise that Director Jo was trying to take advantage of his connections again.
“And there’s a record that you made a false report two years ago, so…” said the
policewoman softly. Then she nodded a goodbye and left her. She was telling Lee-yeon
that big-shots were involved, and her false report two years ago didn’t work in her
favor at all.
So I shouldn’t do anything?

“Make up your mind before waking him up.” Choo-ja said unexpectedly seeing Leeyeon in the room watching Kwon Chae-woo intently.
“What do you mean?”
Lee-yeon had become ragged. She had lost so much weight because of all the stress.
Choo-ja looked at Lee-yeon with pity in her eyes.
“If you are going to use him, you should give something in return too.”
“What?”
“What I’m saying is that you should make up your mind. If you want to treat him like a
murderer to the end, then it doesn’t matter. But if you seek his help… it complicates
things.” Choo-ja looked into her eyes. “Forget about the old Kwon Chae-woo, no
matter what he did. Treat him like a new man”
Lee-yeon looked at Choo-ja in shock. “He doesn’t remember who he is. His memory is
wiped clean. He is nothing right now,” said Choo-ja. Lee-yeon wanted to leave the
room.

A murderer is a murderer. It doesn’t matter whether he had the memory of the crime
he had committed. It doesn’t erase the fact that he had killed someone and lee-yeon
had seen him. Just because he doesn’t remember it doesn’t mean he hadn’t committed
a crime. A person was dead. Knowing that eased Lee-yeon’s guilt of lying to Kwon
Chae-woo a little.
But Choo-ja was telling Lee-yeon to take one step further. “Lee-yeon, that man doesn’t
have any memory. Kwon Chae-woo is not the same person you saw at the mountain.
He is a completely new person that neither you nor Kwon Chae-woo himself knows.”
So, Lee-yeon didn’t know what to say. It wasn’t as easy as Choo-ja said it was. He
wasn’t a ‘new’ person. He was still who he was: A murderer.
If she woke him, it would be easy to convince him. Her problem would be solved if he
threatened Hwang Jo-yoon. He would never show his face here again. But…
“I’ll stay in the office until morning.”
“But…”
“I don’t want to talk about this,” said Lee-yeon, “I need to clear my mind a bit.” Leeyeon crossed the living room and went into the office.
Choo-ja heard a rustling sound, and she found Lee-yeon wearing her latex surgical
gloves. It seemed like Lee-yeon was going to spend the whole night making a new
fertilizer. She skillfully laid a plastic sheet on the table and pulled a black tin from the
mini-fridge. Choo-ja closed the door and left her to her devices.
Choo-ja quietly opened Lee-yeon’s bedroom door. She looked at Kwon Chae-woo
peacefully sleeping on the bed. She had recently received a call from the inquiry
agency where she had put in a request to verify Kwon Chae-woo’s identity.
“Ma’am, please do not call here again. We are out of this! We do not require you to
pay the rest of the inquiry fee. In fact, we will refund your whole money. Please do not
contact us again.” The agency had hung up immediately after. When Choo-ja tried to
contact them again, their number was out of service. It had confused her immensely.
She had found a clue regarding the mountain behind the Spruce Tree Hospital. The
mountain, the unmanaged land around it and the surround trails was of a size
equivalent to 1/4 of Hwaido. It was all owned by one person: Kwon Chae-woo.
“Lee-yeon… what kind of a man did you bring to this house?” murmured Choo-ja to
herself.

Kwon Chae-woo had a very long dream. But the moment he opened his eyes, he forgot
everything about it. He frowned in annoyance. But his frustration evaporated when he
felt warmth in his arms.
“Lee-yeon…”
Lee-yeon slept with her face buried in his arms. He checked the hem of her sleeves.
The ends of her sleeves were wet with tears like last time. He was sick of his
nightmares. It made him feel pathetic when she saw him crying.
“Lee-yeon.…”
Kwon Chae-woo had no idea how much time had passed. He tried to gently shake her
awake so that he could ask her how long he had slept. But she snuggled against his
chest. She was always so frightened ad on edge when he was close. He smiled seeing
her sleeping peacefully against his chest. He didn’t want to wake her anymore.
He studied her face. Her eyelids twitched and she frowned. Is she having a bad
dream? He rested his chin on is hand and watched her sleep. Just then, Lee-yeon
slowly fluttered her eyes open. When she saw him, her eyes widened in recognition.
Kwon Chae-woo felt his emptiness being filled by a soothing satisfaction.
“Good morning,” he said.
“Ah!” A cry involuntarilyescaped from her mouth.
She was always shocked no matter how many times this happened. She could never
get used to Kwon Chae-woo who slept like the dead days on end and suddenly woke
up one day greeting her. It always felt disturbing. The corners of his mouth rose into a
smile.
“H-hi,” said Lee-yeon, still groggy with sleep.
“How long was I asleep?” he asked.
“Um… today is the eighth day.”
“Hmm… why did you wake me up so early? I deserve a longer punishment.” He
reached out and removed the bandage from her neck. Her neck was still reddish
where he had bit her. His face darkened. “It’s still bruised.”
Tears welled up in Lee-yeon’s eyes. She bit on her lips to hold back her tears. The
veins on Kwon Chae-woo’s neck throbbed. “What’s wrong, Lee-yeon?” he asked
gently. He sat up straight and stroked her cheeks. It was then that he noticed that she
had dark circles under her eyes and her cheeks were so hollow. She had lost a lot of
weight.
Kwon Chae-woo took her hands in his. “Tell me what happened.” He looked at her. “I
am never leaving you alone ever again. I am not going to let you seep alone either. I
will snatch you up or barge into your room if you don’t tell me.”
After a pause, Lee-yeon finally spoke up. “A few things have bothered me. I tried to
solve these on my own, but… things aren’t going the way I expected, and it’s driving
me crazy, so… I…”
Kwon Chae-woo silently stroked her hands. Her pulse was racing. She was just
rambling now.
“Lee-yeon… calm down.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked into her eyes, trying to calm her down. She finally could calm
her breathing. Kwon Chae-woo wiped her tears away.
“Remember Hwang Jo-yoon?”
Kwon Chae-woo’s face turned dark at the mention of his name. “What about that
bastard?” he asked in a low voice.
“He has been stalking me. He is always standing on the yard in front of the main
door.”
Lee-yeon wondered if Hwang Jo-yoon was trying to get a peek at Kwon Chae-woo
instead of her. He probably thought she was lying about her marriage. Maybe Hwang
Jo-yoon became more shameless and bolder because he didn’t see Kwon Chae-woo in
the house.
Lee-yeon had been able to take a picture of him. She had been trembling in fear as she
took it. Hwang Jo-yoon had smiled brazenly at her as though he feared nothing. Leeyeon had immediately called the police but no one had come. Even behind the closed
curtains, her blood had run cold because she could still his creepy eyes everywhere. In
the end, there was only one place where Lee-yeon could escape to.
Kwon Chae-woo wasn’t a switch she could turn on and off. It would be unfair to him as
a human being. She had made up her mind. She would ask for his help, one last time.
She felt guilty for using him whenever she needed and wishing for him to sleep other
times.
Despite everything, she knew that this man could put an end to her suffering once and
for all. He would be more effective than the ignorant and corrupted police. Right now,
what she needed was not the lazy, insincere police but a ferocious wolf.
Lee-yeon refused to be subdued and scared. She refused to take any more of Hwang
Jo-yoon’s shit. She faced Kwon Chae-woo with determined face and told him
everything.
“You must have had a hard time.” Kwon Chae-woo said, after listening to him calmly.
Kwon Chae-woo restrained himself from spitting curses at Hwang Jo-yoon. His rage
boiled. He clenched his fists.
“I will take care of it.” He scowled at Hwang Jo-yoon’s name but hugged Lee-yeon
warmly. “Leave it to your husband, Lee-yeon. You take some rest, alright?”
“Ah…I…”
“Just sleep well and eat well. Everything will be alright.” He hugged her even tighter.
“W-wait. N-no!” Lee-yeon pushed him away from her. Her eyes were filled with doubt
and hesitation. She avoided his gaze and scratched at a spot on her cheek.
Lee-yeon suddenly pushed the man away from her. For some reason, her eyes were
filled with hesitation. She avoided the man’s gaze and scratched her white cheek.
“I already caught that bug.” She said in hesitation.

Hwang Jo-yoon is the kind of person who doesn’t know how to give up. It was that trait
in him which allowed him to snag the first place throughout his school years. He had
graduated college with the same mentality and started working. He had never grown
beyond that. He applied the same mentality to his relationships.
His belief was that there was nothing you couldn’t achieve if you kept at it long
enough. Unfortunately, he applied the same theory to people and relationships
without respecting what the other person might want.
I put so much effort and time on you for five years… !
I always escorted you from behind—in case you might be afraid of walking alone at
night. I even guided you to the right path so that you don’t get along with toxic city
friends.
On rainy days, I often stayed up all night in front of your house like a bodyguard in
case you might have trouble sleeping. But you always treated my pure love like
garbage.
One day, Hwang Jo-yoon found out that Lee-yeon had moved to an island and opened a
small hospital. He also heard the news that her hospital was failing. It wasn’t even
that surprising for him because he was well aware of So Lee-yeon’s rebellious
personality and the consequences it brought.
After that, Hwang Jo-yoon bought the house across from Lee-yeon’s hospital to use it
only as a studio. All for Lee-yeon.
But marriage?! How can you marry someone other than me?!
So, Lee-yeon didn’t get along with people. Anyone who knew her would already know
that after they spent a while with her. In her twenties, she was even less social than
she was now. She had no time for people. All her time was dedicated to learning about
plants and trees. Her co-workers and supposed ‘friends’ always insulted her and
called her crazy. They always insinuated that she go see a psychiatrist for her
avoidance of people and obsession with plants. But she never let that get to her.
As he had expected, Lee-yeon hadn’t changed much.

Hwang Jo-yoon tried to move but his limbs were tied very tightly. It was even
impossible for him to stand. Every time he tried to wriggle free, he could smell the
fertilizer on his philtrum.
He tried to scream but the gag on his mouth muffled everything. The texture of the
cloth that pushed past his blurry consciousness made his throat itch. He wanted to
vomit.
“You tied it well.” The man bent on one knee and examined the knots.
“I thought it would come in handy so I learnt how to.”
“How did you catch him?”
“With a pepper spray gun,” said Lee-yeon. “I had prepared it because it’s highly
effective against pests. I knew Hwang Jo-yoon would be stalking me. It’s amusing that
it only took a vegetable tear gas to catch him.”
“I am very proud of you, Lee-yeon.” The man looked up at Lee-yeon warmly. Hwang
Jo-yoon glared.
Why was the asshole coming out of the house? Hwang Jo-yoon struggled and
whimpered. Those two looked at him like he was a vile cockroach that had crawled
into their house. There was no humanity in the gaze of the man looking at him. He
looked as thought he could gut Hwang Jo-yoon’s intestines and wouldn’t bat an eye.
Cold sweat ran down Hwang Jo-yoon’s face.
“Leave it to me from here.” He stood up without taking his eyes off Hwang Jo-yoon.
Lee-yeon grabbed Kwon Chae-woo’s sleeves.
“You can’t tell the cops! They’ll just release him. They didn’t help me at all. There’s a
CCTV in the yard. It must have filmed my attack. No one will see it as self-defense.
The police are on his side. He is well-connected with those with money and a powerful
background.” She stared at Kwon Chae-woo, wide-eyed.
The man caressed her hair. He leaned towards her and stroked her cheek. “I won’t
report it, I promise.”
Lee-yeon didn’t seem convinced. “Did you forget? I will only do what you tell me to.
So, don’t worry. Just tell me what you want me to do to him,” Kwon Chae-woo urged.
“If you tell me to beat him up, I will,” said Kwon Chae-woo. “If you tell me to remove
his bones, I will.”
She trembled. “Just…”
“Yes?” said Kwon Chae-woo gently.
“I just don’t want to see him ever again!” said Lee-yeon.
Kwon Chae-woo nodded. “That’s good enough. It will be done.”
“I am not telling you to kill him, though! Don’t kill him!” The most important thing
with Kwon Chae-woo was that she should be very clear.
He smirked. “I won’t kill him.”
Lee-yeon looked at him. She didn’t know what to make of his words and his smirk. But
he only looked back fondly at her. Maybe Choo-ja was right. Maybe Kwon Chae-woo
was only an empty vessel now. What he became depended on his environment.
“How can I even do that here?” he said with a smile. “This is not a very suitable place
to kill someone.”
Lee-yeon’s thinking fled out of her mind. Here she was thinking he was a new man, an
empty vessel and he…
“I… I don’t want anyone killed. I don’t want to be arrested as a murder suspect!”
Kwon Chae-woo chuckled. She realized he was teasing her. “I will do no such thing. I
will just try to persuade him to not bother you. You should go home and take a nap. I
will be there soon.”
Lee-yeon hesitated. “Kwon Chae-woo, don’t forget I was the one who caught him. I
will be held under suspicion.”
Kwon Chae-woo lifted an eyebrow at her words. “Please don’t get angry and lose your
head. Don’t get excited either! You… you might get a headache and that won’t be
good!”
He laughed. “Don’t laugh. You still haven’t recovered completely. I promised you that
we would only see good things together and I am sorry for breaking that promise and
making you do this.”
He found her adorable. “He never believed we were married,” she continued. “That’s
why I wanted to show him. That’s all. Nothing more than that, do you understand?”
“I understand,” he said while scratching his eyebrow with his thumb and trying to
hide his smile. She was just too cute. He just wanted to carry her and take her back
home. At least she looked relieved. She left reluctantly.
Hwang Jo-yoon struggled as he saw her leaving. He tried to shout but only muffled
whines were heard. He had no idea what they were talking about a while earlier. He
had shamelessly wandered in and around her house thinking she was helpless. She
had always been helpless. She could never do anything except trembling fear.
He had climbed up the window and watched her face pale as she saw him. I still have
power over you, he had thought. Until that day he had staked her and peeked into the
window again. She had been angry. She had walked to him with firm steps and
sprayed the pepper into his eyes and face. He screamed because of the burning in his
eyes. She had then picked up a shovel and beat him up good.
She had looked murderous. Why did her eyes look like that? Her face had been pale
but her eyes…
“Hwang Jo-yoon,” said Kwon Chae-woo, as he leaned at eye-level and grabbed his chin
harshly. His brutal grip did not match his serene face. “Where do you live?”
He wanted to resist but he couldn’t shake off the man’s grip. “I asked you where do
you live?” said kwon Chae-woo, tightening his grip. He still looked serene. Almost
bored. He looked as though he would yawn any minute now.
Contrary to how he looked, his hands gripped so tightly as though he wouldn’t mind
crushing Hwang Jo-yoon’s jaw.
“Uhhh….!”
“Ahh, my apologies,” said Kwon Chae-woo looking at his gag. “How could you answer
with a gag that thick. It almost covers your whole mouth. Lee-yeon knows her work
well. Don’t you agree?”
Kwon Chae-woo let go of his chin and untied the gag. Hwang Jo-yoon coughed to clear
his throat. His nausea spilled down his lips as drool. “But where did she learn to bite
the finger that was down her throat?” sneered Hwang Jo-yoon. “I am going to sue you
all. Are you really So Lee-yeon’s husband?”
The man who had been staring in the air leaned towards him, his eyes sharp. He was
quiet but he knew how to get the atmosphere to wrap around him when he needed.
Hwang Jo-yoon leaned back.
“Show me proof then,” he said. “Documents, legal forms, anything! Just show me.”
“I hate asking the third time,” said Kwon Chae-woo, “Where do you live?”
“Didn’t you hear me? I am not telling you anything until you bring me some kind of
proof. There is no way you are married to Lee-yeon.”
“Should I guess?” Kwon Chae-woo asked. He stood up and grabbed Hwang Jo-yoon’s
collars. His hands and feet were tied so kwon Chae-woo dragged him.
“Ah…! Let go! I said let go!”
“Shut up.”
“Lee-yeon, Lee-yeon!” screamed Hwang Jo-yoon.
Kwon Chae-woo’s face hardened. “I told you to stop calling her name.”
“Lee-yeon!” He struggled frantically. Kwon Chae-woo grabbed a handful of stones
from the yard and shoved them inside Hwang Jo-yoon’s mouth.
“Ughh… uughh….!”
“When I warn you kindly, you don’t listen.”
“AAAAH!”
“Shut your mouth. Don’t wake Lee-yeon.” Kwon Chae-woo clenched Hwang Jo-yoon’s
mouth shut. The stones were grinding between his teeth. The pain was almost
unbearable. Hwang Jo-yoon started screaming hysterically.

“If you don’t want to lose your teeth, shut your mouth.”
He nodded in fear.
“Good boy!” Kwon Chae-woo dragged Hwang Jo-yoon out of the house. There was no
one passing by on the street outside. Hwang Jo-yoon burst into tears. Kwon Chae-woo
walked without hesitation to the house across the street. It was the house Hwang Joyoon had recently bought.
Hwang Jo-yoon struggled. He was bleeding from his mouth. He was scared to go into
that house with this man.
“Are you wondering how I found out about your hide-out?” asked Kwon Chae-woo.
“Well, one night, I was outside on the porch of the hospital, and I looked at this house
across the street. If I were to be intimate with Lee-yeon, anyone looking outside the
window of this house would see everything.” His voice was hoarse, as though he was
trying to restrain his anger.
“You should have hidden until the end so that Lee-yeon wouldn’t have noticed you,”
said Kwon Chae-woo, dangerously, “You only made her suffer.”
Hwang Jo-yoon was petrified. “It’s better to grow up than act like a kid in an adult
body and get kicked.”
Kwon Chae-woo dragged the man, kicked the front door open. An instant before
Hwang Jo-yoon was dragged inside, he saw a pedestrian walking by carrying a plastic
bag. He yelled desperately at the person. It was his only chance.
The man in the baseball cap stopped in his tracks. He looked at them. He would
definitely have seen Hwang Jo-yoon with his hands tied. He saw me! He saw me!
A glimmer of hope flashed across his face, but the pedestrian turned away and walked
on in a hurry. His last hope was gone. Another pedestrian walked into another house
in the neighborhood without a glance.
What’s wrong with the people in this country! There was no escape for Hwang Joyoon.
The man with the baseball cap entered the house and put down the plastic bag on the
floor. Newspapers were scattered everywhere; some were piled up in bundles. Some
kind of high-magnification lens was installed near the window. The man sat by the
instrument and peered through it at Lee-yeon’s house like it was his daily routine.
He was making a fuss yesterday, and it looks like the man has been finally caught. “He
messed with the wrong person. He was caught by the master,” murmured the man.
It was his first-time seeing Kwon Chae-woo so close in years. But this happiness over
reunion didn’t last long. The moment he saw Kwon Chae-woo mercilessly dragging the
man inside the house, goosebumps broke out on his skin.
If only he wasn’t injured in the head…. The man’s eyes widened, and he pulled out his
phone. Kwon Chae-woo looked strangely calm. He had never seen him so calm and
docile. As far as he had known him, Kwon Chae-woo had a fiery temper and
murderous intent. It seemed that he had really lost his memory.
“Director, this is Beom-hee.” My master… even if he was rendered docile by the
injury, he is still capable of murder.

For the first time in days, Lee-yeon was glad she could enjoy a deep and sound sleep.
She sat in her bed and enjoyed the peace. She was subconsciously getting used to the
unfamiliar scent on her pillow. For the first time in a while, Lee-yeon could enjoy deep
and sound sleep. Just then the face of a man flashed through her mind. So much for
peace!
She rubbed her eyes and walked to the living room. “Kwon Chae-woo…”
The man standing at the wok table, trimming bright red flowers looked quite adept at
removing the thorns and pruning them without any sort of reluctance. Lee-yeon’s eyes
widened. Kwon Chae-woo looked at Lee-yeon standing in the middle of the living
room.
“Lee-yeon,” he said with a smile. “Did you sleep well?”
He put the flowers down. Looking at him casually smiling at her, she felt that the pat
events of the week had been so unreal. He walked to her.
“What are you doing?” she asked.
“I have been practicing flower arrangement.”
“Why?”
“Well, I want to start working again,” he said, “I want to get back to my normal life. Or
what it used to be before I lost my memory.”
Lee-yeon felt a prick of her conscience. She had never felt any regrets with the lies
she had created because she had done it to save herself. But… right now she couldn’t
look him in the face. She turned her eyes away.
“Where did you get the flowers from?”
“I picked them from the flowerbed outside.”He gestured towards the window.
Lee-yeon glanced at him as he looked at the window. He had a sharp jawline and
smooth skin. He turned back to her, and their eyes met.
“Do you want me to tie your hair up?”he offered.
“Ah… I look a bit messy now, right?” Embarrassed, Lee-yeon combed her hair with her
hand.
“No,” he calmly walked closer to her and grabbed her shoulders and turned her
around. “It’s just an excuse because I want to touch your hair.”
He pulled off the rubber band that held the flowers together. He gathered her hair up
to tie them. His eyes caught on the nape of her neck. “Hwang Jo-yoon won’t be any
more trouble,” he said. He felt her body stiffen. “So, you don’t need to worry
anymore,” he said gently.
Lee-yeon touched her hair awkwardly. She felt different from usual with her hair tied
up. “So pretty,”said Kwon Chae-woo.
“Um… Me?” She asked. The man smiled and leaned against the table.
“You can hide behind your work clothes all you want,” he said, “But that doesn’t fool
me. When you come to bed at night after a shower, I know how pretty you are.”
Lee-yeon blushed. She was speechless. “Do you even know how that drives me crazy?”
She stood there without a word and covered her face with her hands.

The scarlet sunset shone on her small back.Lee-yeon, with surgical gloves, was busy
cleaning out the flower bed. She was skillful in what she did. She gently touched the
plants, watered them, tilled the soil and cut the ragged branches and offshoots. She
was very focused on taking care of the plants. Kwon Chae-woo looked at her, mesmerized, half-wishing to divert her attention from the plants to him.
Did she take care of me like that when I was in a vegetative state? He wondered. He
couldn’t take his eyes off her. Lee-yeon reminded him of a creature from a fairy tale.
He was so attracted to her. He wanted to abduct her and take her someplace where
only they could be together.
Lee-yeon hid behind thick layers of clothes and the dirt. But Kwon Chae-woo knew
what lay underneath. A fidgety girl with soft skin and scars. He was enthralled by her
small nose, pretty eyes and red lips. She seemed entirely unaware of how beautiful
she actually was.
Kwon Chae-woo tried not to stare but it didn’t work. The more he looked at her, the
more he wanted to be closer to her. Lee-yeon strokes that tiny leaf, and yet my body
trembles…
Time seemed to pass very slowly. Lee-yeon wiped the sweat from her forehead and
caressed the flower plants as though complimenting it. She then picked up the fallen
flowers from the ground and turned and smiled suddenly at Kwon Chae-woo.
He was taken aback. It was the first time she had looked at him and smiled so brightly
from the time he had met her. He swallowed and clenched his fists. That smiled
contained all his happiness.
‘You… Are you really So Lee-yeon’s husband?… Bring me proof. Show me proof that
you guys are married!’
Kwon Chae-woo recalled Hwang Jo-yoon’s words from days past. He looked at her.
“Lee-yeon, have you ever tried sucking a flower?”
“Ah… I tried it a few times when I was young.”
“Then teach me.”
“Teach you what?” Lee-yeon, carrying flower petals in both hands.
Kwon Chae-woo walked towards the wall and picked a white acacia. Lee-yeon flinched
and tried to stop him, but the flower was plucked in the blink of an eye.
“I want you to teach me how to suck and lick it all the way to the bottom.”
She looked at him perplexed.
“Because I don’t want to leave anything behind.”

The petals from her hands fluttered away in the wind. It was only acacia in his hands,
but it reminded her of the helpless chicken he had killed. Lee-yeon held her breath.
Kwon Chae-woo raised the acacia to her mouth.
“You have to demonstrate first.”
Her face was blank and pale. Kwon Chae-woo looked at her as though studying her. While Lee-yeon sucked the acacia, the man’s gaze was fixed on her lips.
“One more time.”
He put the flower in her mouth again. A cold finger touched her lower lip.
“Is it good?”
“Well… I think it tasted good when I was young, but now it’s not as sweet as I
remember. Maybe I have become used to sweeter snacks…”
“Then how about using your tongue?”
“What?” Her eyes widened at the unexpected question.
“If you look here, there is a hole through which honey comes out—” He pointed to the
tip of the acacia
“So you just suck, and that’s it?”she asked.
“Wouldn’t it be possible to eat the whole thing by sticking your tongue into the hole?
It’s a waste if you leave it. Try.” He handed her the flower again, telling her to try it.
She knew that there was something strange about the situation, but she couldn’t
really say with any accuracy.
She glanced at Kwon Chae-woo and began to lick the tip of the acacia. Se heard a
short laugh and her face turned red. She was embarrassed for falling for this. “This is
not how I usually eat!”
“Then how?”
“I just chew on the tip a little… ”
“You chew it?”
“Yes, if you chew it, the remaining honey will pop…”
Kwon Chae-woo’s shadow lay on her. Lee-yeon had a feeling that if she went any
closer to him, she would be swallowed up by his shadow. “It’s actually not bad to eat
like that.”
He also started sucking on a flower, but his eyes never left Lee-yeon.
“Lee-yeon.” He reached out a finger and rubbed on her lips. She stepped back from
him suddenly. “Sorry… the honey dripped down your lips.”
Liar. Lee-yeon knew that there was nothing on her face. Nevertheless, she blushed at
his touch.
“I think I prefer to eat it peeled.”

The front door slammed shut behind them and their lips met. Kwon Chae-woo pushed
her against the wall and sucked on her lower lip. He pushed his tongue into her mouth
while his hands pulled at her hair.
Lee-yeon’s neck shuddered at the sensation. This was her first time experiencing
something like this. She had never imagined herself getting so close to a man with his
tongue down her throat.
The man nibbled at her lips and pushed his tongue deeper. With their mouth smacked
against each other, all her thoughts were scattered. Lee-yeon could only gasp for
breath because this was so overwhelming.
“Mmm…”
Wait, wait…. What the hell is happening? We were just eating flowers until just a few
minutes ago! Lee-yeon thought about what happened a while earlier. There had been
a very strange atmosphere between them under than sunset. Lee-yeon was grappling
with unfamiliar feelings when Kwon Chae-woo suddenly pulled her into the house for a
kiss. His face had hardened. That was how this started.
She tried to push him away, but he was too strong. He sucked at her lips passionately
and pulled her to him even more firmly. His tongue stubbornly stroked and licked
hers. She pushed hard against his chest. Their eyes met. Unlike his warm lips, his eyes
were cold.
Lee-yeon flinched. Kwon Chae-woo pulled her closer to him. He held her tightly and
sucked on her lips, deepening his kiss. He sucked all the nectar that the flower had
left in her mouth. Their sound filled the house. Lee-yeon trembled and accepted the
kiss.
I should stop him, she thought weakly. She pushed him and hit him on his shoulders as
hard as she could, but he pushed her towards the sofa without taking his lips off of her
even for a second. Lee-yeon hit him harder. She turned her head away, avoiding his
kiss. He just turned her to him and kissed her again while his other hand pressed her
waist to him.
The more she pushed him, the more he held her. They tripped and fell on the sofa. He
leaned over her and finally broke the kiss. He was panting. His sharp eyes reminded
her of a wild animal.
“Would it be okay to ask my wife if I can sleep with her?” he asked.
“I…um…,” Lee-yeon didn’t know what to say. Something hard and thick pressed
against her stomach. She could tell what it was. It urged her to answer fast. “Did you
forget that we are in a platonic relationship?’
“That was the old days.” Kwon Chae-woo slightly frowned. “I am not the same
person.” He smiled. “Forget about the old Kwon Chae-woo and let me help you have
fun.”
Lee-yeon had always molded the relationship as she saw fit. She had been the one who
got to make the decisions but now everything seemed chaotic. She felt helpless and
confused. He lowered his head and kissed her again.
“I will be gentle,” he whispered. Unlike a moment ago, when he was aggressively
thrusting his tongue inside her mouth, he placed a chaste, gentle kiss on her lips now.
But his eyes told another story entirely. “Trust me,” he said, “I will stop if you tell me
to stop. I will go on, if you tell me to.”
He bit her at the neckline of her shirt, grazing her breasts. Lee-yeon curled her toes in
anticipation. “It’s… it’s difficult for me.”
“What do you mean?” he asked.
Lee-yeon tried to think of something. Anything at all. “You… you probably won’t like it
either, because…,” she raked her brain for excuses. “Because I am… very insensitive
when it comes to things like this! Not intentionally but, I just lay there like a rock until
it finishes. Trust me, we have done this before. It didn’t work.”
Her words rang in the silent room. “That’s funny,” he said.
“What is?”
“You. Making excuses.” He smirked. “I wonder how many interesting excuses you
have prepared in that mind of yours.”
Lee-yeon’s face hardened. “If we really got married and we really love each other, you
need to come up with better excuses,” he said. “Just come up with something more
convincing next time.” He lifted her up so that she was sitting up on the sofa.

Lee-yeon felt that it was really embarrassing having to use the same bed with Kwon
Chae-woo after what had happened in the day. While she showered, Kwon Chae-woo
had dropped by her office and picked up a book.
She sat awkwardly on the bed, trying not to look at him. “Goodnight, Lee-yeon,” he
said.
“Are you not going to sleep?” she asked, surprised.
“You go to sleep first,” he said, “I want to read a little before I sleep.”
He turned off the light and walked to the bed. He then turned on the bedside lamp,
pulled the blanket over him and leaned back to read. The silence in the room was only
disturbed by the sound of pages turning.
But it wasn’t only Kwon Chae-woo who wasn’t sleepy. It was close to midnight and
Lee-yeon didn’t feel drowsy. She didn’t know whether it was because she was anxious
and fidgety or because she had woken up so late in the morning that it had been
almost afternoon.
In the end, Lee-yeon pretended to sleep while sneakily observing Kwon Chae-woo’s
profile in the blanket. He quietly read the book. He seemed like a different person. He
was certainly different from the one who had kissed her so aggressively in the
afternoon.
Lee-yeon found it unfair because it seemed like she was the only one who couldn’t
stop thinking about what had happened. His every move, every word made her feel
nervous and anxious. She didn’t know what to do.
Just then, Kwon Chae-woo closed the book with a snap.

“Are you telling me not to read a book?”
Kwon Chae-woo turned his head and looked down at Lee-yeon. His eyes were
suffocatingly silent like a tranquil sea.
“What? But what did I do?”
“How can I concentrate on my book when my wife is looking at me like that?” He let
out a long sigh and rubbed the back of his neck.
“It’s because I can’t sleep.”
He put the book down as he looked into her big eyes. “Then, Lee-yeon, can you tell me
about the old days?”
“About what?”
“About the two of us. For example, our first-”
“―our first night?”
Kwon Chae-woo lay down on her side. His slightly twitched eyebrows looked
dissatisfied.
“Not that one, but about how we first met.”

“I don’t want to hear about a worthless bastard who only cums quickly.”
Immediately, Lee-yeon coughed in awkwardness, hoping he wouldn’t notice her
flustered cheeks.
‘A man in a black raincoat holding a shovel was in the mountain…’ Lee-yeon tried to
erase the image that immediately came to her mind. She instead said, “We met in the
mountains. I left my belongings behind that day, but you thankfully followed me and
gave it to me. That’s how we met.”
Fortunately, it wasn’t that hard to change the genre from horror to romance.
“That’s classic.”
“Yeah, it was.”
“Don’t tell me that it was a handkerchief that I brought to you.”
Hearing his question, Lee-yeon smiled and swallowed words she couldn’t say. ‘It was
my favorite electric saw.’
“It was just a small comb.”
The man also smiled as if he was trying to picture their first meeting in his head. When she saw the man’s eyes softly smiling at her, she suddenly had the bitter taste
of guilt in her mouth.
“From now on, you will have to be more faithful to your husband if it’s true
that we got married because we really love each other.” She remembered Kwon
Chae-woo’s words which now rang in her ears. It was full of hope and affection. ‘If
only he knew…’
The more lies she made, the more she felt like she was being pushed to the edge of a
cliff. Kwon Chae-woo seemed obedient most of the time. But once in a while, he would
say things that made her blood run cold.
And that meant that he was still doubting. Therefore, Lee-yeon needed to make lies
that appeared more sincere.
‘There’s a saying that one climbs over a hill only to face yet another hill, and I guess
I’m the one who’s climbing that hill right now.’

“Is Spruce Tree Hospital here?”
Finally, it was the day of the open tournament.
“Yes, we are here!” Lee-yeon raised her hand as she gasped.
On the slope of the dense forest with a two-lane road behind it, people gathered there
looked up at the 30-meter-tall Ginkgo tree with their mouths open in astonishment.
Anyone could tell at a glance that the crooked branch was dangerous. Besides, the
orientation of the other trees surrounding the crooked Ginkgo tree was also leaning in
a dangerous angle.
“There are two other people besides Director So Lee-yeon working in Spruce Tree
Hospital, am I right?”
“Yes… Wait what?!” She turned to the inspector and asked again. “Two people?”
Of course, in her mind, Spruce Tree Hospital was a prestigious hospital consisting of
tree doctor So Lee-yeon herself, arborist Gye Choo-ja, flower arranger Kwon Chaewoo, and insect doctor Lee Gyu-baek. But the reality was that the two women were
barely paying the electricity bill to run a hospital.
‘But who’s the other officially registered employee besides Choo-ja?’
“It says here it’s Mr. Kwon Chae-woo.”
‘What?! But as the director, I’ve never officially registered him as the hospital’s
employee!’ Lee-yeon was frozen in place, as much so as if she had been turned to
stone. But when she noticed Kwon Chae-woo staring at her right next to her, she
quickly smiled and pretended like she wasn’t surprised at all.
“Yes, yes…. That’s right.”
‘I see. If someone secretly did this, there is only one person that comes to my mind
right now.’
It can only be that man.
Kwon Chae-woo’s older brother, Kwon Ki-seok.
Lee-yeon pressed her forehead with her finger and closed her eyes. The man who
reminded her of his existence occasionally. The thought of him made her tense, and
her breathing got faster.
– So Lee-yeon, how have you been?
He called Lee-yeon once every three months. The intention was clear. His call was the
firewood that was trying to ignite her tension. Just hearing his voice reminded her of
the threat of that night.
As the number of calls piled up, Lee-yeon slowly lost her will.
‘…I feel like he’s watching me.’
Her heart began to thrum wildly against her chest.
‘When will I be free from the shackles…?’
When Kwon Chae-woo was in a vegetative state up to the moment of his awakening,
Lee-yeon had been stressed. She thought she would lose her mind eventually.
Luckily, there were times of respite when she could forget of the man residing under
her roof. All the expenses, including the nursing cost, were taken care of by Kwon Kiseok. Besides, Kwon Chae-woo’s doctor regularly visited for a medical check-up. Leeyeon didn’t have to worry about anything and could focus on her work.
As if everything that had happened on that night was a dream, Lee-yeon quickly
returned to her normal life, and everything was peaceful. She sometimes couldn’t
believe she came out of the slaughterhouse without a single finger cut off.
To Kwon Ki-seok, Lee-yeon was a hostage, and to Lee-yeon, Kwon Chae-woo was a
hostage, her lifeline.
But ever since Kwon Chae-woo woke up, everything changed. A seed of suspicion
began sprouting in her because it didn’t make sense that a man like Kwon Ki-seok still
couldn’t catch the real culprit after two years had passed.
Perhaps she had already foolishly walked into the prison built by Kwon Ki-seok.

Lee-yeon.”
Kwon Chae-woo’s hand lifted Lee-yeon’s face. His warm palm gently melted her frozen
cheeks.
“The tournament has begun.”
“…Ah.”
His voice woke up Lee-yeon, who was lost in thoughts. She bit the tip of her tongue at
the sudden warmth. Just then, someone shouted.
“We will start with the Green Tree Hospital!”.
Lee-yeon clasped her hands and stretched out her arms.
‘Thinking about an unanswerable question right now doesn’t help at all.’
Soon, the camera started recording.
The director of Green Hospital and a staff member tied a rope around their waist.
After finishing the preparations, they quickly grabbed the saw for pruning and began
climbing the tree.
Seeing him climbing the tree without hesitation, Lee-yeon clenched her fists.
Just then, she heard a sigh behind her.
“I don’t understand this situation. Are you telling me you’re going to do that?” Kwon
Chae-woo was standing there with his face distorted by anger and confusion.
Since she had never told Kwon Chae-woo about the details of the tournament, it must
have taken some time for him to figure out what was going on. Lee-yeon shrugged her
shoulders, shading her eyes with her hands.
“I’m not afraid of heights.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked up at the crooked tree and appeared unimpressed, “That’s not
the problem. It’s dangerous.”
“I still have to do it. I’m good at climbing trees like a monkey.”
Kwon Chae-woo’s frown deepened, swallowing the stinging words that almost came
out from his mouth like a fire. ‘Good at climbing trees? But your face is growing pale.’
Although it was clear that she was tense, Lee-yeon pretended like she was not afraid
of anything.

A few minutes later.
Suddenly, there was a commotion from above. Then she saw the director of Green
Hospital coming down without even getting closer to the branch. As soon as his feet
landed on the ground, the director shook his head firmly and burst into laughter.
“Do they want us to die or something…?”
He muttered to himself and turned to Lee-yeon.
“You should think twice before doing this, Director So. The branches are more curved
than I thought. I couldn’t even climb on them, afraid that they would snap.”
Lee-yeon held her breath. Choo-ja, who was standing right next to her, tried to
convince her to give up. “Lee-yeon, wouldn’t it be better for us to withdraw from this
test?”

“What if something happens? Even if you won’t win the monetary reward, at least you
are safe. Let’s just withdraw—”
“Then our hospital will be eliminated immediately.”
Lee-yeon’s eyes looked very determined. Choo-ja snorted at her. “Didn’t you say that
you didn’t want to be in front of the cameras?”
“…But I’m sure this is something I can do well.” Lee-yeon muttered as she turned her
head away.
“Do you really want to take a risk like this? If you treat the clients more friendly,
they’ll keep coming to our hospital one after another!” Choo-ja’s accusing voice was
enough to make the bystanders look their way.
“That sounds very unlikely…”
To her syurprise, Choo-ja sneakily winked at Lee-yeon and glanced at Kwon Chae-woo.
Lee-yeon could immediately tell what her wink meant and dropped her head in
embarrassment. It was to appease Kwon Chae-woo, insinuating that Lee-yeon doesn’t
entertain men other than him.
‘You can do this, Lee-yeon. You even fought Kwon Chae-woo with a saw in the
mountain and won, so this is a piece of cake.’
“Are you ready, Spruce Tree Hospital?” The manager who was taking notes on the
tablet called Lee-yeon.
Kwon Chae-woo stopped her and snatched the rope she was holding over her head.
“Lee-yeon, it’s not too late yet.”
“Give it back!” She stood on tiptoe and stretched out her arms.
“I’ll give it to you if you go home with me.”
“Are you kidding with me right now?”
“I wish I was. Why are you being so reckless?”
Looking at him, Lee-yeon was suddenly lost for words. She had never seen Kwon
Chae-woo looked so worried.
“…Yes, I’m scared, but responsibility comes before that. This is a competitive bid, and
I’m willing to participate. So, give me the rope.”
Silence.
“You said you’ll do whatever I tell you to do.”
When Kwon Chae-woo still kept his mouth shut, Lee-yeon asked, placing her hand on
her waist without realizing it.
“Kwon Chae-woo, are you trying to argue with me right now?”
‘Ah, I didn’t mean to say something childish like this….’ Lee-yeon wanted to take back
her words, but it was already too late. The moment Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes narrowed,
her heart beat faster, and her hands immediately became sweaty.
He stared at Lee-yeon but soon lowered his gaze. “No, Lee-yeon. How can I ever do
that?” It was hard to read his face, but his eyes looked darker than usual.
The obedient man tied the rope around Lee-yeon’s waist. Surprisingly, he hooked and
knotted the rope step by step. Lee-yeon’s eyes widened at the skillful and quick
movements of his hands.
Just then, a raspy voice brought her back from her reverie. “You don’t even think
about your husband, do you?”
Every time he checked the joints, her body wobbled back and forth like paper. Kwon
Chae-woo clenched his jaw so tight that she could hear the creak of bone. Lee-yeon
held her breath.
“I didn’t mean to disturb you, I just wanted to protect you. And I wasn’t kidding, I
really wanted you to comfort me.”

“Because I’m anxious.”
Lee-yeon could only blink her eyes at the man’s voice.
“I don’t want you to go anywhere far.”
His cold eyes were boiling. “I made it clear that I don’t want to be apart from you,
even a little.” His gaze contained no malice, no hate, no irrational satisfaction from
anger. It was fundamentally different from what she saw from her family.
All she could see was the pure affection towards her. She suddenly felt her heart
tickle.

“Spruce Hospital, are you ready?”
It was only then that Lee-yeon’s eyes left Kwon Chae-woo.
Choo-ja handed the saw with a worried face. Lee-yeon carried the saw on her back
and covered her palms with rosin powder.
‘Your blood was on this saw.’ Lee-yeon confessed inwardly. She deceived and tamed a
man who lost his memory. She couldn’t stop feeling uncomfortable seeing a man who
was being brainwashed in the participation of his brother too.
“I’ll go.” She ignored the man’s gaze.
She was light on her feet, skillfully climbing the tree. Her thighs, knees, and elbows
got scratched everywhere in an instant, but she didn’t stop moving.
After 40 minutes of climbing a 30-meter tall ginkgo tree, her clothes were soaked with
sweat. The problem was that her arms and legs started to feel numb even before she
could start cutting the branches.
Still, she thought of the tree that had been neglected for a long time and clenched her
teeth. She wanted to help the tree, which had to bear its burden. As she got closer to
the crooked branch, Lee-yeon became more impatient.
When she finally reached near the top, she turned towards the crooked branch.
The bent branch could not bear the weight of Lee-yeon and began to sway in a large
parabola.
“Uh, oh.”In her entire life, Lee-yeon had never thought that she was afraid of heights,
but―
‘I am actually afraid of heights……?’
It’s not that she didn’t have acrophobia, it’s that she just wasn’t aware of it because
she had never experienced climbing this high. When she arrived at the top of the tree,
her heart pounded, and her legs trembled.
‘Now I know why the director of Green Hospital gave up.’
It was almost impossible to stand on the shaking twisted branches.
‘If it fails to withstand my weight and breaks, it will strike the road behind.’
“Ah!”
Just then, a startled scream erupted from below. Several people began shouting at
once, but Lee-yeon didn’t even have time to look around. The sound of people shouting
hit the back of her head like a wave.
It was when Lee-yeon, who had managed to keep her balance, grabbed the saw.
Suddenly, her body tilted, and her strength drained from her thighs.
‘Ah shit!’
She slipped helplessly. Thanks to the rope, she won’t die. However, since it was her
first time working at such height, Lee-yeon instinctively closed her eyes in fright.
‘I’m falling…!’
It was when she was about to pass out. Someone held her body tight and lifted her
waist. It hurt as if her ribs were about to break.
“I got you.”
Lee-yeon had a sudden sinking feeling in the pit of her stomach at the sound of the
voice. Kwon Chae-woo was holding her in his arms with his big hands tightly wrapped
around her waist.
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened.
“K-kwon Chae-woo?”
Lee-yeon quickly turned her head to the man.
What came into her eyes was the sharp tip of his nose and his eyes containing a mix of
relief and anger. When Lee-yeon realized that the man had come this far without any
equipment, she yelled.
“Are you crazy?!”
“It’s all okay. I won’t let you get hurt.”
Kwon Chae-woo began to soothe her, misunderstanding that she was frightened, not
because of him.
“No, it’s not like…!”
Lee-yeon became speechless for a moment. “What’s wrong with you! I might die of a
heart attack because of you!”
‘Come to think of it, he has always been like that since we first met.’
‘He tried to bury a person alive, chased after me, woke up from a vegetative state,
killed a chicken, fell into a long sleep again, and then shed tears.’
‘And now, this man climbed to the top of the tree without any equipment or skills as if
he had made up his mind to die.’
“Why are you so reckless?”
The man’s hands were already covered with scratches. Unlike Lee-yeon, who was fully
equipped with gloves and equipment, all he had was irrational tenacity.
“Well, I don’t know. Do you?” He took a deep breath and buried his face on Lee-yeon’s
shoulder. His hot breath tickled her heart.
“You decide.”
“Decide what?”
“Whether you’re going to be dragged down by me or not.”
At the man’s calm voice, Lee-yeon answered without a second’s hesitation.
“I will do it to the end.”
The abnormal growth of branches harms the roots as well. Lee-yeon was no longer
thinking about the tournament. The only thought inside her head was that she wanted
to help the tree.
“Okay, then get on my back.”
“…What?”
“I’ll cut it, so you instruct me.”
Lee-yeon widened her eyes in shock.
“No!”
“Why?”
“You don’t even have a rope. Step back!”
“It’s okay. Even if I fall and die, you’ll live.”
Lee-yeon yelled again since she could no longer tolerate his nonsense. “Never say that
again! If you get injured, my life will end too! You get it?”
‘Do you know how scary your family is? If you die, they’ll put me in the drum and
throw me in the ocean immediately!’
Lee-yeon gasped for breath. The words she had to swallow whirled inside her.
“Actually, you climbing up here is crazy enough!”
“… I’m sorry. Please don’t be angry.” He rubbed his nose against her nape.
“And putting aside safety, I’m the tree doctor. And I’m obviously way better at using a
saw than you!”

“So, l, listen to me!” Her face was red, and her voice shook. She could speak so
confidently because she wasn’t facing him. When she lifted her chin in contentment,
she felt a warm breath touching her nape. It seemed like the man was smiling. “There
will be punishment once we get down from this tree, so hold on tight.”
“What―”
In an instant, Kwon Chae-woo hugged her like a piece of luggage and put her on his
back.
“What the…! Kwon Chae-woo!”Lee-yeon screamed and hugged his neck tightly.
Experiencing a sudden change at the height of 30 m made her desperately cling to
him.
His back was surprisingly comfortable. It was her first time getting on someone’s
back. Everything was unfamiliar and frightening, and her heart pounded fast with an
unknowing feeling.

“Give me the saw.”
Without giving her time to think, Kwon Chae-woo bent his body and placed his hands
on the branch, ready to do the job.
“…Ugh.” Lee-yeon tried not to panic and pacified her racing heart as she handed the
saw.
Kwon Chae-woo was in the most defenseless state. If she strangles him or hits his
head from behind, he will be thrown off guard. Her eyes subtly dimmed.
“―yeon.”

“Lee-yeon!”
“Y-yes?!”
Startled, her body stiffened.
“Tell me what to do.”
“Oh…okay.” Lee-yeon shook her head a few times to regain her composure.
Just then, the saw started to spin with noise. She gave detailed instructions on how to
hold it, at which direction to point the blade, and how much strength he should exert
in his arms. What surprised Lee-yeon was that Kwon Chae-woo carried out each step
skillfully and smoothly. His dexterity was much better than that of any veteran man.
“—You are doing great! Please put in more force.”
“Like this?”
“Yes, just like that!”Lee-yeon craned her neck to have a better view— the frown on her
face showing just how focused she was. She was completely absorbed in Kwon Chaewoo cutting the branch.
“Now, just keep up your strength until the end!”

“More, more, harder!”
Kwon Chae-woo flinched and rubbed his ear over his shoulder. “How about now?”
“It’s good, perfect. Ah-! Wait, don’t take it out yet!”

“Put it back in! Don’t pull it out before I tell you to. Push it deep inside! Good, lower
your wrist a little!”

“Oh, it’s there! Yes, there!”

“Ha! We’re almost there! You’re doing great! A little more! Now hold on!”

“One last time! Harder! Now, take it out—!”
Finally, the branch fell with a cracking sound.
“Ha! Ha! Kwon Chae-woo, that was perfect!” Lee-yeon gasped for breath.
Then, she noticed Kwon Chae-woo’s shoulder stiff. He seemed very nervous, so she
complimented him with an unusual display of friendliness to relieve his tension.
“It was tough, right? But it looks like you have more talent in this job than I thought.
You got power and dexterity. You did amazing!”
Suddenly, Kwon Chae-woo let out a sigh. If only she knew.
“Lee-yeon, you have talent in teaching.”
“Really?”
“Yes, you’re a good teacher.”
Lee-yeon smiled, and Kwon Chae-woo clenched his teeth, repressing his desire. The
branch was finally removed. In its place was a stump but a new, healthy branch would
surely grow from it soon.

She looked up at the cloudless blue sky. The air was fresh and clear after the storm.
“He suddenly started climbing up like Tarzan with bare hands. I thought he went
insane!”
At the dinner party held to celebrate passing the first test, Lee-yeon stuffed her face
with grilled meat.
“At first, he just watched you going up without even blinking his eyes, but right after
you stumbled, he climbed up the tree like a jaguar.”
‘That’s why there was a sudden commotion under the tree.’ Lee-yeon scratched her
nape as she listened to what happened while she was up on the tree. Perhaps because
of the grill afront her, she could feel the heat on her face rising.
She glanced at Kwon Chae-woo, who was putting perfectly grilled meats on her plate
like a mother feeding her child even before she could empty it.
“Let me fill a glass for the one who did the most important job today.”It was Choo-ja,
with a wide smile on her face as she relished in victory brought by Kwon Chae-woo.
When Choo-ja was about to fill Kwon Chae-woo’s glass with soju, Lee-yeon put down
her chopsticks and rubbed her knees of dust, preparing to stand up.
“Choo-ja, drinking is not good for someone who’s sick….”
“Sick? You mean he’s sick―?”
Choo-ja snorted. “Can a sick person climb a tree and hold a lady with one arm? If he’s
sick, then I’m already dead.”
Lee-yeon quietly turned her gaze to the grill, unable to say anything in reply. What
then caught her eyes was Kwon Chae-woo’s fingers touching the glass. His fingers had
a few calluses, but they were surprisingly pretty.
“But if he drinks…”
‘His memory might come back…’
The last few words she couldn’t say lingered on her tongue. But Choo-ja, who was
already drunk, couldn’t read Lee-yeon’s now, and instead just continued to pour soju
into his glass.
“Here. Take it, my son.”
Strong, firm hands took hold of the glass which looks delicate now. But, Kwon Chaewoo didn’t throw it down his throat immediately. He instead turned to Lee-yeon as if
asking for permission and Lee-yeon was quick to play upper hand. She snatched the
glass from his hand and finished it without leaving a single drop.
“What are you doing?!” Choo-ja stood up, widening her eyes.
“From now on, if you fill his glass, then it’s mine!”
“What are you talking about? You can’t even drink that much!”
“You can’t just judge his health on his physical strength. Drinking is not good for the
brain cells! I’ll drink instead of him!” Lee-yeon was determined to not let Kwon Chaewoo be intoxicated.
However, not so long after she finished the glass of alcohol, her legs began to sway on
their own and her vision shook until her all she could see was complete darkness.
Yet, she didn’t hit the ground. When she opened her eyes, she was floating in the air
instead, face flat against something soft yet toned. She shook her dangling legs a
little.

“Lee-yeon, stop moving.”
“Huh?” She felt as if she was lying on a cloud. Lee-yeon rubbed her face and pressed
her cheeks on Kwon Chae-woo’s back.
“Lee-yeon.” A familiar voice spoke beside her ear. “You don’t like me drinking?”
The alcohol taking over her senses, Lee-yeon started smiling like a kid on a sugar rus
without any idea that she was being carried by Kwon Chae-woo on his back.
“Yes.”
“Why?”
“…If you drink, I’m afraid you’ll remember everything.”
Kwon Chae-woo, who had been walking silently, suddenly stopped. The faint smile on
his face was immediately wiped off.
Stories about men who change and act like a gangster when they are intoxicated are
as common as rotten cigarette butts on the streets. Kwon Chae-woo did not forget the
old scars he’d seen on Lee-yeon’s body. His face darkened at the thought that made
him feel miserable.
When Kwon Chae-woo was about to move to shake off the feeling of shame and guilt,
Lee-yeon murmured something again.
“Do you know? This relationship is abnormal. No matter how much I think about it, I
think this is crazy. I think I lost my mind back then. I shouldn’t have accepted it…”
With each word she said, Lee-yeon twisted the knife in his heart. It was her true, inner
thoughts that Kwon Chae-woo always wanted to hear. He was not satisfied at all, but
rather, he felt as if something was stuck in his throat.
It was a shabby ending. Lee-yeon was regretting their marriage.
“Did you want to run away?”
“…I’ve thought about it, but I couldn’t. Even if I want to, I can’t, and I have been like
this since I was young.”
“Have you tried running away?”
“Of course, I even went to the police station.”
Kwon Chae-woo’s face distorted. ‘What could have possibly made her go to the police
station?’ Assuming the worst, Kwon Chae-woo clenched his teeth so hard that his jaw
ached.
‘Kwon Chae-woo, you bastard!’ He blamed and trampled on his past self, which he
couldn’t even remember, over and over again. He put it in a coffin and buried it deep
in the ground.
“I just…. want it all to end one day.” She muttered like a person who submitted to
one’s fate. There was no hope or excitement in her feeble voice.
“Lee-yeon, were you scared of me?”
“…Yes.”
“Did you want to live without me?”
“…Yes.” A drowsy voice murmured again.
‘I lost my memory but I made Lee-yeon live with the painful memories I left to her. Why am I selfish ‘till the end?’
“Did I ever hurt you physically?”
“Yes.”
His body stiffened coldly at the answer that came out from her mouth without a
second’s hesitation. He trembled in anger, not towards Lee-yeon but himself. It was
the moment when his doubts became truths.
“Regularly?”
“I think you were like that to not just me but anyone else.”
Kwon Chae-woo closed his eyes to suppress anger. His breathing suddenly became
difficult.
But―
‘If this is an opportunity. If I’m given a second chance to make up for the way I treated
her.’
Rather than dwelling on the unreachable past, Kwon Chae-woo began to think of what
he should do to change tomorrow and the days ahead. He put strength in his hands
holding Lee-yeon as if not to lose her.

“Why didn’t you just leave me to die. You should have just spit on my face and run
away when I was in a coma.” Kwon Chae-woo continued as he ridiculed his past.
He was a terrible burden to Lee-yeon, he realized. If she had thrown away that
burden, she would have led a happy life. Besides, there must have been plenty of men
lining up to marry a young and capable woman.
‘But Kwon Chae-woo without Lee-yeon―’
‘I would not have woken up.’
In other words, it is impossible for him to lead a normal life without Lee-yeon.
He needs her. Instead of just watching her leave him, Kwon Chae-woo would like to
compensate for all the hardship he thought he caused her. He was going to make her
choose him, to return to him willingly. Make her believe that it was her will to come
back to him, not through coercion. And make her realize that the safest and the most
comfortable place for her was beside him, not anywhere else.
“Even if you ran away at that time, no one would have blamed you.” Kwon Chae-woo
spoke thoughtfully with dim eyes.
“…But, there’s a clear promise between us.”
Surprise evident in Kwon Chae-woo’s face, he remained silent and listened.
“It was a promise, an obligation I couldn’t break. That’s why people tell you to think
twice when signing a contract… Although I regret it, even if I go back, I would still
have signed the contract.”

“At the time, that was the only way.”
Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t say anything as if his throat was clogged. He didn’t know she
would mention the word “promise”, which he thought was about their marriage vow,
despite how badly he treated her.
The promise, something Lee-yeon valued more than her own safety. A strong sense of
belonging wrapped around him. His life was no longer insecure and disappointing.
Slowly from the bottom, Lee-yeon was filling up his life.
“Lee-yeon, do you like me?”
She didn’t respond. Kwon Chae-woo shook her body once, but she didn’t move.
It was when they almost arrived at the house that the answer came out from her
mouth. A hand touched his neck.
“…Don’t, don’t even ask me that.”
‘If I’m really given a second chance—’
‘Then God is on my side.’
A cold smile appeared on his face. He won’t waste this chance.

It was already morning when Lee-yeon woke up with a headache. She got up from the
bed, not knowing how the dinner party ended.
Just then, the bathroom door opened, and a man wrapped in a large towel, dripping
water, walked out.
His wide shoulders and the water cascading down his toned chest caught Lee-yeon’s
attention immediately.
“Good morning”
“What, what is that?”
“What?”
“I mean, why are you…”
Lee-yeon couldn’t take her eyes off the man who had just come out from the shower.
She knew that observing a half-naked person was not a manner, but human curiosity
was more tenacious than she thought.
Her hangover went away like magic. Her eyes then turned to the towel that covered
his lower body.
‘The silhouette under the fabric…….’
“Lee-yeon, do you remember what I said after the dinner party yesterday?”
“Y-yes?” Lee-yeon flinched and looked up at Kwon Chae-woo. She brushed her hair
and pretended like she was unperturbed, but there was no way to hide her blushing
face.
“What… did you say?”
“I said my memory came back a little bit.” He said with a frown.
“What?!”Her mouth was wide open, and her face turned pale. The dust floating in the
air seemed to have stifled her. It suddenly became difficult to breathe.
“W—what did you just-”Her voice trembled.
He stepped closer, the water dripping from his hair started to form a valley on ran
down Lee-yeon’s knees.
Kwon Chae-woo looked down at Lee-yeon and said in a calm voice.
“I was going to kill myself.”
Her eyes widened as if time had stopped. ‘He was…. going to kill himself?’ It was
something Lee-yeon didn’t know. Her body became so stiff that she couldn’t even
manage to pry her mouth open.
Since she was the one who knew the truth and hid the truth, she always got the upper
in her relationship with Kwon Chae-woo. But for the first time, their position changed.
“I died two years ago.”
Kwon Chae-woo knelt on the bed and looked down at her. His posture looked like he
was begging for forgiveness, but in Lee-yeon’s eyes, he looked authoritative.
Between the man’s knees, Lee-yeon’s legs were bound. She was so close to him that
she could see the tiny water droplets dripping down his abs.
“I’m dead.” He repeated as if trying to brainwash her. “That Kwon Chae-woo is dead.”

“I never wanted him to wake up.”
It was not only Lee-yeon who took advantage of the memory loss. Kwon Chae-woo
wanted to comfort her by erasing all his past. He wanted to tell her that the man who
gave her unrecoverable wounds was gone.
If only he could squeeze in even a little bit of Lee-yeon’s closed heart and become a
new sprout, he wouldn’t feel guilty about lying.
“… Do you, do you really remember?”
“You don’t believe me?”
Lee-yeon’s eyes filled with confusion.
‘The man who was burying a person was trying to kill himself?’
‘No way.’
Lee-yeon narrowed her eyes, and Kwon Chae-woo did not avoid her gaze. Suddenly,
she remembered the moment when her eyes met with Kwon Chae-woo’s in the dark
mountain that night.
‘He seemed surprised to see me.’
‘Come to think of it, I know nothing about Kwon Chae-woo.’
What nightmares he has every night, and why, as Kwon Ki-seok said, a person who has
sensitive hearing got attacked from behind. There were too many unknowns in the
first place to doubt his confession, so every attempt felt useless.
In that respect, she was no different from Kwon Chae-woo, who lost his memory
because she knew nothing about him.
As if insisting on his innocence, the man looked her straight in the eyes.
“There is only one thing you need to remember from now on.”
She wanted to organize her thoughts, but the man didn’t allow even the slightest gap.
Lee-yeon broke out in a cold sweat despite his mellow, soothing voice.
“Because you told me I was a kind and gentle husband, I wanted to become such a
husband from now on. So, I filled my empty head with only your words.”

“Because your words are my first milestone to change.”
“Keep in mind. Your first husband died two years ago. I’m not your ex-husband. If you
still have a ring, throw it away, and if there are any pictures you took with him, burn
them.”
Lee-yeon didn’t know how to react.
“You now have a new husband, and I’m not going to lose to ‘that Kwon Chae-woo’ in
your memory.” He revealed his fierce possessiveness. “Since you started taming me,
you have to take responsibility until the end.”
Lee-yeon held her breath without realizing it. The man who put shackles on his own
neck was beaming, and she couldn’t tell if that was a good thing or not.

Clear eyes, creaseless forehead, Kwon Chae-woo was enjoying the morning sun
shining through the window.
Lee-yeon couldn’t get used to the man sitting at the table eating breakfast with her.
‘…Why is he not asking anything? If his memory is coming back, he must have a lot of
questions. Did Kwon Chae-woo really tried to kill himself?’
However, Kwon Chae-woo, who was only interested in the present and even made
bean sprout soup in the morning for Lee-yeon.
She began to study the man’s face. He was sitting in a straight posture, and the way
he held the chopsticks was perfect as the images from the textbook.
There was no sound of tableware hitting or chewing food. Lee-yeon slightly frowned as
the unexpected silence fell between them.
She put the spoon down as she rubbed her cheek. “Kwon Chae-woo.”
“Yes?” He immediately turned his eyes to her.
“Don’t you have anything to say to me? Anything you’re curious about.”
“Not really.”
“Why?” Lee-yeon bit her lips.
‘Tak―’ Just then, Kwon Chae-woo put down his chopsticks. It was the first noise he
made since he had sat down at the table.

The man who had been sitting up straight facepalmed and bent over as though he was
suffering from pain. He leaned forward holding either side of the narrow table. His
knuckles were white.
“Whenever I think of your ex-husband, I feel nauseous.” Kwon Chae-woo drew a clear
line between him and the Kwon Chae-woo before he lost his memory as if they were
two different beings.
Lee-yeon remembered him crying in his sleep. His sleeves were never dry. “Still…
aren’t you even a bit curious about your past? About what might have happened to
you…”
But Kwon Chae-woo shook his head. His face was stiff. He didn’t want to talk about
their unhappy marriage nor wanted Lee-yeon to bring up any unpleasant memories.
He put down his chopsticks and lowered his eyes.
“I know I can’t run away from my past self. I mean the past and the present have to
live in the same body but I know he was going to of egret,” he said, “I don’t know
much about my past but the past me was a stupid bastard who could only jump to the
worst conclusions.”
Lee-yeon scratched the back of her neck and tried to drown her complicated emotions.
“Did that bastard make good money?” he suddenly asked, raising his head to look at
her.
“Um… not really.” Lee-yeon avoided his gaze.
Kwon Chae-woo snorted. “I knew it.”
“You do know you are talking about yourself?” said Lee-yeon slowly.
“You have a strong sense of responsibility, and that sometimes becomes a problem for
you,” he said, “You don’t seem to know when to take on responsibility and when to
draw your boundaries to keep people out. Why are you living like this?”
Lee-yeon slowly lowered her spoon feeling his words prick at her conscience.
“No more sacrifices,” said Kwon Chae-woo sadly. “If you let in a man with an empty
brain and a problematic past, you should take full advantage of him.”
Kwon Chae-woo smiled at her. His eyes looked so sad and innocent. Lee-yeon forgot
what she was about to say and stared at him.
“I am so sorry for whatever I might have done in the past,” he said, “I don’t have any
recollection of it. You are the only person in the world who makes me human. I can’t
even wake up without you by my side.”
Lee-yeon bit her lips. “But people don’t change that easily,” she said.
“I understand you can’t trust me completely. But I have no recollection,” he said.
“Who are you comparing me to? Do you think I am no different from how I used to be
in the past?”
“Um… I don’t know.”
“If you end up not being able to erase that trash from your memory, I’ll get rid of my
dick.”
Lee-yeon scooped a spoonful of rice and put it in her mouth. She didn’t know what to
do. She was relieved for now that she didn’t need to talk with food in her mouth. She
didn’t know whether she felt glad of his obedience or his unwavering faith towards
her.
“I can be anyone you want, Lee-yeon,” he said gently.
Seeing Kwon Chae-woo trying so hard to convince her, Lee-yeon held back her smile.

“I don’t think we were properly introduced before.” A child appeared in front of Kwon
Chae-woo, who was on the floor doing his push-ups.
Kwon Chae-woo stopped and got up. The boy was so small he only reached Kwon
Chae-woo’s waist.
“Who’s this little boy?”
“I’m Lee Gyu-baek. A first-grader at Willow Tree Elementary School.” The child
craned his neck to look up at Kwon Chae-woo. Gyu-baek admired the man’s abs.
Just then Gyu-baek saw Lee-yeon through the window. He looked at Kwon Chae-woo
and then at Lee-yeon outside the window. He clapped his little hands together. “I can
smell it!” he said.
“What?”
The child sat down on the floor and took out a book out of his bag. He flipped the
pages in a hurry. Kwon Chae-woo crossed his arms and looked at the child.
“Male ring-tailed lemurs secrete floral scents to attract females. They flirt and try to
win their heart by smell,” he said after a while, “that’s what the male smells like, right
now.” His eyes were twinkling with confidence.

Kwon Chae-woo scratched the tip pf his eyebrow with his forefinger. “I don’t know
who you are, child,” he said, “but that’s just sweat you smell.”
“The male must be younger than the director.”
“No, she said we are about the same age.”
“You can’t be. You’re in trouble. Then you’ll smell bad.”
“What?”
“It’s a disadvantage. Younger lemurs emit pheromone substances stronger and longer
than older ones. The older females don’t like the smell.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at the child, speechless. “The male is now in trouble,” said the
child.
He smiled at the kid and wiped the sweat dripping down the tip of his chin with the
back of his hand. He just wanted to laugh but he restrained himself.
“Our director is very popular,” said the child.
“How popular?”
“Sawmill carpenter, nursery dealer, and a reporter from the Ministry of Environment
stop by once in a while. They all smell like you.” The child looked at him. “The male
needs to try harder.”
The child was distracted by the line of ants near his feet. Kwon Chae-woo realized who
this kid was. Is he the insect doctor that Lee-yeon told me about? Something about an
elementary school…
Kwon Chae-woo sat down on the balls of his feet and held out a hand to the child to
shake. “Yes, male lemur,” said the child. “From now on, you will be my assistant.”

It was a quiet afternoon. Lee-yeon was enjoying her warm tea as the sunlight entered
through the wide window. It was the day of Kwon Chae-woo’s sleep inspection and a
visit to Mt. Dongak.
She lifted the mug to her lips and watched the man doing push-ups under the tree
without faltering. His rms and back muscles shone in the sun. His legs stretched
wide…
No! No! Lee-yeon recalled Kwon Chae-woo the other night when he had come out of
the bathroom with just a towel wrapped around his waist. She shook her head in
embarrassment. Lower part of his body reminded her of a giant mushroom and she
always had to remind her self to not be too curious about it.
“Female peacocks focus on the upper part of the male’s tail from far away but focus
on the lower part when close.”
Lee-yeon almost dropped her mug. She turned around to see a Gyu-baek walking
towards her while staring out of the window. His face was expressionless. She greeted
him calmly trying to brush off thoughts about Kwon Chae-woo.
“How long have you been there?” she asked. “Have you eaten?”
“The director was looking at the male’s reproductive organ,” declared Gyu-baek.
“Gyu-baek!”
“Female peacocks value the colour and length of the feathers. Shape and pattern also
matter.”
Lee-yeon frowned. “Very picky peacocks.”
“The director also looks for excellent qualities in a male.” The child piped in
confidently again.
“What?”
“She is also picky.”
Lee-yeon was lost for words. She shoved a cookie into Gyu-baek’s mouth to shut him
up. Out of habit, she checked him behind his ears for dirt. After making sure
everything was clean, she handed him a glass of milk.
Gyu-baek pulled out a thick encyclopaedia from his bag and looked up at Lee-yeon
again. His eyes were sharp and clear.
“Director, watch out for the elephants.”
“Huh?”
“Be careful.” The child tapped a page of the book with his finger with a serious face.
The Estrus of Animals
It was the chapter that Gyu-baek had been reading lately. A huge elephant with its
ears wide open filled half of the page.
“A male elephant, who’s thirsty for love, becomes a monster.”
“Huh?”
“Male elephants turn violent when they are in estrus. It’s the time when you should
never approach them.” Gyu-baek rambled on. His fingers tapping on the book as
though he was anxious.

“When estrus begins, the elephant’s temples swell and a viscous fluid flow through its
skin.” It was quite a terrifying thing to listen to.
“They also become uncontrollably ferocious. Elephants who fail to control their
emotions attack whatever might catch their eyes. The director needs to watch out for
the male.”
Whether or not Gyu-baek knew the meaning of the term estrus, Lee-yeon was just
happy to see Gyu-baek talking so passionately. Meanwhile Gyu-baek’s eyes didn’t
stray away from the window. She was surprised that the child was showing interest in
something other than insects and encyclopaedias.
Why is he so interested in Kwon Chae-woo?
“When elephants are ready to love—”
Kwon Chae-woo seemed to be done with his workout, he entered through the door.
Lee-yeon shoved another cookie into Gyu-baek’s mouth to shut him up.
They become blinded by love. The child was about to say if not for the piece of sweet
lodged between his mouth.

“Gyu-baek is just a strange child. He doesn’t mean any harm by it,” said Lee-yeon on
her way to the hospital in an old truck that had a faded ‘Spruce Hospital’ sticker on it.
“He wasn’t calling you a lemur to be rude…”
“I know,” said Kwon Cha-woo.
“When he is obsessed with a topic, he just sticks to it no matter what.”
“I guess I am similar in that matter.”
Her hand on the steering wheel trembled. She could feel his intense gaze from the
time she got in the truck. Kwon Chae-woo, seated at the passenger side, stared at her.
“Kwon Chae-woo, look ahead. Ahead.”
“But I’m not even driving, do I need to?”
“It will be no good for you if I cause an accident because of that.”
“Are you going to cause one?”
“Maybe!” She could somehow feel the heat on her skin. He sighed as if he wasn’t
satisfied. But he turned his head away.
“Lee-yeon, I need an ID.”
It was a red light. Lee-yeon slammed the breaks so hard that she jerked forward
almost hitting the steering wheel. Kwon Chae-woo was quick. He thrust his arms
between her and the steering wheel, shielding her.
“Are you okay?” he asked.
Lee-yeon was hyper-aware of her chest pressing against his arms. She couldn’t even
lift her head because she felt her face burning with embarrassment. She was aware of
the fabric separating her nipples from his arms. She felt a tingle down below and
instinctively closed her legs. It was a weird sensation.
“Lee-yeon, what’s wrong? Are you alright?”
“Nothing is wrong! I am fine.”
Lee-yeon leaned back on her seat. “Um… Kwon Chae-woo, you are too close.”

Kwon Chae-woo had leaned towards her when shielding her. Now his face was very
close to her. One of his hands was on the driver’s seat while the other hand blocked
the steering wheel. Lee-yeon looked into his brown eyes. When his eyes moved to her
lips. She realized she was holding her breath.
“What is this about getting an ID all of a sudden?” she asked.
He was quiet. “Kwon Chae-woo?” she urged.
“I want to get a job,” he said and looked at her. Their eyes met. Lee-yeon felt beads of
sweat on her neck and forehead. “Even if I have no memory, I can still use my body to
work.”
Beep! Only after the sound from behind did he finally retreat to his seat.
“I want to get a phone and open a bank account so I can start working.”
Lee-yeon’s heart started beating fast. This was a bad sign.

“He’s recovering well.” The doctor craned his neck and looked into the computer
monitor. The screen was filled with EEG graphs and figures that Lee-yeon could not
understand. The doctor stood up from a rolling chair and faced Lee-yeon.
“Looks like it’s true that the presence or absence of Ms. So Lee-yeon impacts the
patient’s sleep pattern. It’s probably a psychological problem, and there can be a
number of reasons for this.”
Lee-yeon had been trying to deny that fact for days now. With the doctor confirming it,
she had nowhere to escape.
“The fact that the patient only remembers Ms. So Lee-yeon’s face can be a hint.”
Behind the transparent wall, Kwon Chae-woo, in a patient uniform, was lying with
dozens of tubes pasted to his head. When he woke up, he groped his empty bedside as
if looking for Lee-yeon and turned his eyes over the glass wall.
“This is just a guess on my part, but it can be that the patient suffered some extreme
shock before the accident—”
Who? Kwon Chae-woo? I am the one who suffered extreme shock, Lee-yeon thought,
bewildered.
The doctor paused for a moment. “It can be that he was hypnotized in a vegetative
state.”
“What?” Lee-yeon frowned, confused.
“It’s just that the patient doesn’t remember. It can be that his brain accumulated what
he had heard while he was in an unconscious state for two years.” The doctor rubbed
his chin with his arms crossed.
“Because right after the patient woke up from the vegetative state, he said something
like this.” His dark eyes turned to Lee-yeon. “Please don’t wake up.” The doctor
suspects that Kwon Chae-woo had heard this several times while he was in coma.
Those words felt like a slap to Lee-yeon. She clenched her hands together and lowered
her head. Her pulse was racing. She found it hard to breathe. When Kwon Chae-woo
slept, she was constantly there talking to him, begging him to sleep forever and not to
wake up.
“That… that Sleeping Beauty syndrome—”
“You mean Kleine-Levin syndrome.”
“Yes, that one. Is it curable?”
“There is no specific treatment method. So, for now, I think Ms. So Lee-yeon’s role is
the most important one for his recovery.”
An indescribable sense of responsibility weighed on her chest. Did my words really
flow to him and shaped his thoughts? Why am I feeling so uncomfortable and guilty?
He tried to kill me!
Her face darkened as if a shadow had fallen on it. She felt that the fear she felt
towards him was justified, considering what she had gone through. And that was
reason enough to want him to sleep forever. On the other hand, guilt rose in her heart.
“Did you find anything strange about the patient?” The doctor continued as he took off
his white coat. “Usually, this syndrome is accompanied by symptoms such as
aggression, hypersexuality, and behavioural abnormalities. Have you ever noticed any
of these symptoms at home?”
Lee-yeon was nervous. Too many answers came to mind. “Behavioural abnormalities
and hypersexuality?”
“Well, not all patients show such signs but most do. If you think he is showing any of
these symptoms, please let me know,” said the doctor. “It would be difficult to live
with someone like that in one house.”
Lee-yeon recalled his behaviours at home. “What kind of behavioural abnormalities?”
“Hm… anything that he might do differently. Sometimes it manifests as intense
emotions, excitement, impulsiveness and increased sexual desire.”
Lee-yeon realized that what the doctor described was accurate to how Kwon Chae-woo
sometimes acted. He had smashed the second-floor door. He had bitten a live chicken
and killed it. He had relieved himself last time and kissed her out of the blue. He had
even climbed a 30-meter tree without any equipment.
Whenever Hwang Jo-yoon had called Lee-yeon’s name, he had shown most excessive
and aggressive reaction. I thought he acted that way because of his nature but based
on what the doctor just said… It can be that his strange behaviours are symptoms of
his illness…
Lee-yeon didn’t know how to react. The doctor walked over and tapped the glass
window. The medical staff began to remove the tubes attached to Kwon Chae-woo’s
head. The doctor looked at Kwon Chae-woo carefully as he got up from the bed.
“There is no patient who does not rely on medicine.”
Lee-yeon, who had only been staring at her feet, lifted her head.
“The patient knows that he needs you, Ms. So Lee-yeon. I am sure he will cling to you
and even show some obsession towards you… for years. Are you prepared for that?”
The doctor looked at her. It felt like he knew everything. Lee-yeon reminded herself
that the doctor in front of her was nothing more than a puppet of Kwon Ki-seok. She
couldn’t reveal her trepidations no matter how much she wanted to.
“I do sympathize with the patient more.” The doctor muttered as he tilted his head.
“Because the patient will have to beg you for the rest of his life.”

Lee-yeon was climbing the mountain with a visiting bag to check the trees that was
aided through the surgeries. Lee-yeon, who was used to walking on uneven ground,
quickly pushed her way through the thick bushes and followed a winding path.
“Lee-yeon.”
Kwon Chae-woo stubbornly followed her all the way to the mountain, despite the many
times she told him to return home. Just then, he snatched the visiting bag from Leeyeon’s hand.
“Wait.”
“Why?” Lee-yeon, who was walking forward without even giving a glance behind,
stopped helplessly. Her face was as stiff as a statue.
“You don’t look okay.”

“Are you not feeling well? Or is it because you’re mad at me?” His sharp eyes studied
Lee-yeon’s face.
“No, it’s not like that—”Lee-yeon did not finish her words and instead let out a sigh.
Continuing her made up excuse was futile as Kwon Chae-woo could read her like an
open book. Unlike her denial, her face was certainly telling him that she was not
alright.
Kwon Chae-woo’s intense gaze showed how determined he was to find out the cause
that made her so unhappy. It was only then that her expression, which had remained
looking sullen since they left the hospital, relaxed.
“It’s because I heard something shocking.”
“From who?”
Lee-yeon was unable to emit an answer.
“From the doctor?”
Seeing his brows scrunched together, Lee-yeon waved her hands. “No, no. Me! From
me!” Shewas surprised at the panic her voice had unveiled.
If all the man’s strange behaviors were due to the symptoms of the disease, not to the
blindness created by her lies, it meant Lee-yeon had another retreat route. However,
she couldn’t understand herself feeling ridiculed rather than happy. She felt a heavy
burden on her back.
“I must’ve been born under an unlucky star.” She said with a sigh.
“What?”
“I underestimated how fucked up my life is…..” Lee-yeon muttered to herself as she
slapped herself on the forehead.
“Stop it.” Kwon Chae-woo covered her forehead with his hand.
The leaves shook above their heads in the breeze, akin to the woman’s calmness
before Kwon Chae-woo. But he didn’t know Lee-yeon was having an internal battle.
She was a mess.
“Mm… there are many trees I have to check. Wouldn’t it be better for you to go back
now?”
“Does that mean you want to be alone?”
Lee-yeon avoided his gaze and scratched her head. The man raised his brows as if
trying read her thoughts but eventually withdrew his gaze and stepped back. “Then
I’ll just follow you from behind.”
“It bothers me.”
“I don’t know the way back. And taking the bus is still difficult for me. It’s all because
I don’t have anything in my head except you.”
‘He always pretends to be sick and weak only at times like this.’
As if to prove her thought, Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes were glistening like that of a
wildcat, which didn’t match with his slightly pouted lips.
Just then, heabruptly turned his head.

His eyes became sharp, and his neckline from below his ear to his collarbone was taut
as a tugged string. Lee-yeon swallowed at the sudden change in the atmosphere.
Deep wrinkles formed on his forehead. His face, focused on something other than her,
was frighteningly serious that Lee-yeon felt like her existence was forgotten for a
moment.
“What’s wrong―”
“When I give you a signal, don’t look back and run as fast as you can.”
“What?”
Kwon Chae-woo grabbed Lee-yeon’s wrist and pulled her towards him. “You’re good at
climbing trees. Can you climb this tree and stay up there for a while?”
In a moment of confusion, Kwon Chae-woo pushed her back. Hard. His hands felt
scalding hot that Lee-yeon flinched in surprise.
Kwaeeeee―!
The ground shook. A chill ran down her spine at a menacing growl. Turning to where
the sound was coming from, she saw a big, wild boar running down from the uphill.
“Kwon Chae-woo!”
“Go up, Lee-yeon! Now!”
It was a harsh voice. Scared witless of his authoritative gaze, Lee-yeon climbed up the
tree like an obedient child. Her feet slipped, and her hands trembled.
Kwon Chae-woo opened her visiting bag, and without hesitation, pulled out a hatchet
and several stakes.
“Ouch…! Kwon Chae-woo, don’t do anything risky! That’s used for cutting down trees,
not for slaughtering animals! I’ll call the rescue center, so come up first!”
She grabbed a branch and stretched out one hand. But the man did not listen. Biting
her lips, she turned on her phone in a hurry.
Meanwhile, Kwon Chae-woo was axing a tree. The time he spent striking the tree
dozens of times was only a few seconds. After a few more hits, he managed to make a
groove in the tree.
“Kwon Chae-woo, what are you doing? Run!”
The wild boar was approaching fast, but the man was still axing the tree.
“Stop! Put that down!”
He didn’t listen and continued what he was doing.
“I said put that down!”
“Just stay there still.”
“Are you trying to die or something?!”
“Haha.” Kwon Chae-woo laughed although there was nothing funny about the
situation. “There is only one reason why dogs turn their backs."


“Kwon Chae-woo! I don’t need a husband who doesn’t even listen to me!”
While Lee-yeon was hitting her own chest in frustration, he moved even closer to the
direction of the approaching animal. When he came into the boar’s sight, the beast
snarled even more wildly and rushed towards him.
With nothing to do but be a witness of the disaster that was about to fall before her
very eyes, Lee-yeon covered her mouth tightly with both hands.
The moment when the boar’s fangs came close up to Kwon Chae-woo’s face, he
quickly turned the stake he was holding. It stabbed the wild boar, and blood spurted
from its neck.
Although it was a fatal wound, the wild boar only paused for a second and began to
butt Kwon Chae-woo again.
He was pushed and pushed, and eventually, to the tree where Lee-yeon climbed up.
‘You can’t die!’ Lee-yeon held her phone with trembling hands, and for the first time,
she hoped for the man’s safety.
However, Kwon Chae-woo clearly didn’t regard this as a predicament. In fact, he
was… smiling.
With agility comparable to that of professional hunters, he pierced the stake between
the axe marks he had just made. The beast, unable to slow down, couldn’t stop before
the sharp blade pierced into its body.
KueehhhhhAt the painful howl, the mountain birds flew away.
While holding onto the shaking tree, Lee-yeon didn’t take her eyes off the man.
What gave her creeps was that Kwon Chae-woo was smiling as if he was playing a fun
game. Just then, he began to wield the axe he was holding firmly.
Whoosh. Whoosh.
Blood spattered every time he swung the axe. When he grabbed the boar’s protruding
fang and tore the carotid artery inside it, he was covered in blood from head to foot.
The man looked like he had been painted bright red. The red water seeped between
his teeth.
“Ew…!”
The man looked like he had been painted bright red. The red liquid oozed between his
teeth. After making a terrible noise, the beast staggered as if it was exhausted.
“You can come down now, Lee-yeon.”
Her mouth was dry, and her heart was beating fast. For some reason, she felt like she
shouldn’t go down. It was as if she was in a manga and became the sister who escaped
from a tiger because of the man who constantly made her choose between “Don’t die”
and “Don’t kill.”
(‘The sister who escaped from a tiger’ is an expression that derives from the Korean
fairytale called ‘The Sun and The Moon.’)
“Do you want me to go up?”
“No!” She responded firmly.
“My legs, my legs are shaking. I’ll take a breather for a second and go down. Kwon
Chae Woo, you should… also calm down.….”
“You think I’m excited?”
When she glanced down, Kwon Chae-woo was no different from usual, except his
chest was slightly heaving up and down to catch a breath.
Rather, he was still and calm as a fog.
“Oh, I see. You must have wanted to see me getting excited covered in blood.” He
clearly had different ideas in his head.
Turning his shoulder as if he was about to do a stretch, he continued, “If that’s what
you want, just say it. Do you want to see my penis get excited?”
“What the f―, no!”
“I told you I can do anything you want.”
“I’m not a pervert!” Lee-yeon made it clear. At the same time, the doctor’s words of
concern and the serious look on his face lingered in her mind.
‘Behavioral abnormalities, aggression, hypersexuality.’ Those three words perfectly
described the present Kwon Chae-woo.
When he noticed that she was holding her breath, he wiped the blood clean from his
face with the back of his hand and asked. “Were you scared?”
“I’m more scared of your face now.”
With that, he burst out laughing.
“Don’t laugh with an axe in your hand!”
Anyone who saw them would mistake the guy for a killer waiting for his prey under
the tree. Lee-yeon held onto the tree even more tightly. She felt the strong urge to
erase the moment she felt the slightest betrayal at the doctor’s diagnosis.
‘I really have to get my head straight from now on to become a better liar.’
Just then, Lee-yeon heard Kwon Chae-woo, with his back slightly bent over, moaning
in pain.
“Kwon Chae-woo, Are you all right?”
She stuck out her face between the branches. Because he acted so fine, Lee-yeon
forgot that Kwon Chae-woo just fought with a big, wild boar.
“Does it hurt a lot?”
Seeing the man not moving, Lee-yeon sensed something was wrong. It was when she
was about to switch branchesto move closer to Kwon Chae-woo that the axe fell to the
ground.
“As you told me, I put down the axe.” He straightened his back and waved his hand.
“So now it’s your turn to come down.”

Kwon Chae-woo got bruises all over his body. When she cut his clothes drenched in
blood with a scissor, bluish, angry bruises covered his upper body.
A beast weighing more than 500 kg pushed him with all its might, so it was no
different from a traffic accident. The ligament in his wrist, which had been holding the
stake under the boar’s neck, was badly damaged.
The doctor, who rushed to the emergency room after receiving her phone call, was
surprised when he saw Kwon Chae-woo. It was because the man was only mildly
injured, and he didn’t look like someone who came back from fighting a wild boar.
“I will go to your house in a little while.” After giving first aid, the doctor left with an
aluminum tray.
Thanks to the doctor, they didn’t have to complete any forms or documents at the
reception. She drove the car to the emergency room without a second thought, and
she could have gotten into a situation in which she couldn’t even write down her
husband’s resident registration number.
“Lee-yeon.”
When the curtains closed, only two people were left in the bed. Lee-yeon, exhausted,
plopped down on the edge of the bed.
“I’ve always wanted to ask you – who is he?”
“…Who?”
“The man.” Kwon Chae-woo nodded carelessly towards where the doctor was sitting.
“The doctor?”
“Yes.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her with an intense gaze. His torso was covered in white
bandages, and his face with dried bloodstains made him look like a gangster fresh
from a fight.
“What about him? He’s just a doctor.” Confused, Lee-yeon tilted her head.
“Hm.” A cold glare trying to determine if it’s a lie or not. The way he stared at her
without blinking once was enough to give her goosebumps. Frightened, Lee-yeon
suddenly became a wife trying to justify herself.
“He’s your doctor, Kwon Chae-woo.”
She was met with his silence, so she continued.
“He has been in charge of taking care of you since you were in a vegetative state. You
saw him go back and forth from home to the hospital, right? That’s because he’s your
doctor―.”
“Are we that rich?” He cut her off in the middle. “How did you hire a personal doctor
who comes right away with one phone call?”
“Uh….” Her heart thrummed wildly against her chest. She couldn’t determinethe
intention behind his question, but his slightly raised brow made her nervous.
“One who commits a fault would think everyone speaks of it.” This saying
crossed her mind. She was overthinking and it won’t help in this situation.
‘If I fail to give him a good answer, he’ll start to doubt everything and eventually
uncover the lies.’
“Y-your family, I mean your older brother, gave full support!” She said in haste, “I’m
telling you, he’s a good doctor, so don’t worry. Why would your family send us
someone who’s not qualified? He worked really hard day and night.”
“Day and night?”
“Yes!”
“Did that person come in and out of your house when you were alone?”
Suddenly, Kwon Chae-woo brought his face close to hers.
“W-what?”
“Did he?” He asked again in a cold voice that pressured her.
“Yes…? That’s what’s good about having a personal doctor.” At the same time, Leeyeon took a step back and his dark brown eyes that resembled trees slightly trembled.
She made sure to not blink even for once to not miss even the slightest change on the
man’s face.
“So, is that guy the first person who comes to your mind in a situation like this?” Kwon
Chae-woo brushed her hair with his hand slowly.
“It’s because you got hurt, and he’s your doctor―”
“What did he do day and night?”
“Uh… give treatments?”
“Who treated who and how?” He grabbed the neck of his t-shirt and wiped his chin.
He clenched his teeth so hard that the cracking sound even reached her ear. It was
then that she sensed something strange about the man.
“Are we talking about the same doctor right now? I don’t really understand what
you’re talking about.”
He remained silent and looked sullenly at the wall.
“Do you want me to call the doctor again? I think what happened earlier impacted
your cognitive abilities.” Lee-yeon stared at his face and tilted her head to get a better
view of him.
Kwon Chae-woo let out a short sigh and uttered, “I’m sorry.” He closed his eyes for a
while, “For being oversensitive about small things.”
With bloodstains on his face, Kwon Chae-woo looked like an actor in the waiting room
without makeup. He continued, “It seemed like you were dependent on that doctor.
And it was after you talked with him that you suddenly wanted to be alone.”
 Lee-yeon rubbed her clothes and tried to avoid his penetrating gaze.
“Thinking that he came in and out of your house while I was lying down like a useless
idiot―,” He grimaced, “I couldn’t control my anger.”
He pressed his temples and let out a long breath.
Lee-yeon dropped her head. She could somewhat understand why Kwon Chae-woo
tended to overthink since he lost all his memory, but for some reason, he went too far
when it came to people associated with her.
‘Is this really because of the syndrome?’
“The one who caught the boar, are you here?” Suddenly, the curtains were parted
open, and a firm voice like that of an announcer spoke.
Seeing Kwon Chae-woo, a woman smiled, revealing her charming snaggletooth. “Ah,
he’s here.” The woman was wearing a large jacket with the logo of Wildlife Rescue
Center. She was tall, had a freckled face, and was not wearing any makeup.
“Hello.” She bowed at the two of them. “We just came back from cleaning the carcass
of the boar. Just in case, we’ve also done the ASF virus test.”
Behind the curtain, men in the same color jackets were standing around. They were
curiously looking at Kwon Chae-woo with gleaming eyes.
“Thank you so much for catching―, I mean, reporting it. There was a lot of pressure
from the authorities. He was notorious for being a man-eating wild boar because he
kept biting and killing people.” Her voice sounded somewhat excited. “Since the size
of this boar was much bigger than the normal ones, we created a separate hunting
team to be prepared, but I guess that wasn’t needed.”
She scratched her head as she smiled. “Besides, it’s the first time I’ve seen a boar
hunted with his carotid artery torn.” The woman looked at Kwon Chae-woo with eyes
twinkling with admiration. Her cheeks were blushing like apples, and the smile on her
lips grew even broader. “With an axe and a stake, right?”
The woman couldn’t hide her excitement that her voice trembled noticeably. However,
none of the two mirrored her enthusiasm.
Kwon Chae-woo closed his eyes quietly, pretending that he had not heard her. Hence,
Lee-yeon, who couldn’t bear the silence, answered instead of him.
“Yes.”
“Ah, I apologize for my rudeness. My name is Joo Dong-mi, and I work for the mammal
team at the rescue center.”
Suddenly, there was a whistling sound from behind. The men in the same jacket as
hers put fingers in their mouths and cheered. Joo Dong-mi, whose face turned bright
red in an instant shouted. “Please give me your phone number!”
Surprised by her voice, Lee-yeon flinched back.
Noticing that, Kwon Chae-woo immediately grabbed and pulled her wrist.

“Excuse me but how do you know each other?” Joo Dong-mi looked back and forth
between them.
Lee-yeon looked into the man’s stubborn eyes. “He is my… employee.”
If everything was because of his syndrome…. She had to make sure whether it was his
passion or his disease.
“Why do you leave out that we’re sleeping together every night?” Kwon Chae-woo
laughed. His scoff was so poignant that Joo Dong-mi opened her eyes wide and was
checking the atmosphere.
There was a sudden silence.
“Ah, is that so? You’re young so you can. It’s a necessity for this generation.” Joo
Dong-mi seemed stiff for a moment but now she appeared relaxed again. She looked
very confident, inside and out.
“Then can I have a business card?”
“Employees doesn’t have a business card yet, but I do. Is this okay?” Lee-yeon handed
Joo Dong-mi her business card. Joo Dong-mi bowed politely and accepted the card.
“You are a tree doctor?” her eyes widened and she looked at Lee-yeon happily. And
then she suggestively bit her lips while scanning Kwon Chae-woo.
“How can a tree hospital employee beat a boar down with an axe? Aren’t you wasting
your talent too openly? What do you do in the tree hospital?” she asked.
“I trim flowers.” Kwon Chae-woo answered nonchalantly.
“F-flowers?” The spark in her face faded. She frowned and turned towards Lee-yeon.
“By the way, there are times where we wound the trees when we do rescues in the
mountain. Can I contact you then?”
Lee-yeon was flustered as she had never found customers like this before. But she
nodded. “Of course! We will be happy to help.”
Even during all of this, Joo Dong-mi’s eager eyes were still on Kwon Chae-woo. Even
when she knew that he was holding another woman’s hands and had eyes only for the
said woman, she didn’t seem to care. Lee-yeon found Joo Dong-mi quite confident in
herself.
Even when it was Kwon Chae-woo who had to take the test, Lee-yeon couldn’t help
feeling she was being roped into it too.
“I hope you get well quickly. And next time we meet, please tell me your name first.”
And just like that, Joo Dong-mi was gone. She was like a storm, here one moment,
gone the next. Her co-workers huddled patted her on her back.
“I don’t know what this is all about, Lee-yeon,” said Kwon Chae-woo. “Employee?” His
voice was low and dangerous. “You could come up with nothing else? Why did you
throw me under the bus again?”
His glare wasn’t normal. Lee-yeon swallowed.
“What if I had decided to do something?” he asked.
“Well… Joo Dong-mi…,” Lee-yeon tried to explain.
“Joo Dong-mi again?” Kwon Chae-woo got up from the bed and walked to her. His
shadow towered over her. He laughed dangerously. “You don’t know anything since
you touch nothing else but trees,” he said. The eyes that stared at her looked strange.
“You are treating your own dog like shit, Lee-yeon.”

Neither of them had talked during the drive home. Kwon Chae-woo stared out of the
window and Lee-yeon focused on the steering wheel.
The atmosphere in the air was tensed.
Lee-yeon caught his eye in the mirror. She had glanced at him to find out that he had
been glancing at her too. He slightly raised his brows but his face had some kind of
dark joy hidden behind the eyes.
Lee-yeon turned away in surprise. Her mouth was dry and her heart pounded. She
could feel his stare. The side of her face that turned to him felt ticklish. It was as
though she could feel his gaze on her cheek. The feeling remained until they reached
home.
It had been suffocating.
Kwon Chae-woo pulled off the shirt by the neck in a rush the moment he crossed the
door to the inside of the house. The hard cast on his wrist was visible. The bandage
was wrapped around his top. His face and head crusted with dried blood.
He turned and looked at her. “Wash me.”
“What? M-me?”
“If a dog is dirty, the owner should wash it clean,” he said. “I am practically your dog.”
Lee-yeon was speechless.
“Well, that’s the basic,” he said, scratching his head. “But you only ever touch trees,
so maybe you don’t know how.”
“You told me not to serve you!”
“Service is an act without a reward.” He smiled while walking closer. “I have all the
intention to reciprocate in multiple to whatever you do. You just thought that I’m a
freeloader? Neither are you.”
Lee-yeon couldn’t answer.
“So, wash me.”’
His tone was calm but she froze. The tub was small. Kwon Chae-woo laid down
casually with his feet at the end of the tub. Whenever he moved, water splashed onto
the floor. The blood that had crusted in his hair trickled down and mixed like ink in
the water.
He leaned back in the tub staring at Lee-yeon. Drops of water latched onto his skin.
Lee-yeon frowned.
“Your bondage is all wet!” she said.
“Doesn’t matter. You said that doctor is coming back.” His voice was calm, lulled by
the water.
“Then why did you go into the tub with your pants on?” She asked incredulously.
“I couldn’t undo the buckle because my hand hurts.”
“You expect me to believe that?” It was an absurd and stupid excuse. A man who was
able to kill a boar was acting so fragile to the point he couldn’t unbuckle his pants!
The audacity, thought Lee-yeon. “You could just as well use your other hand.”
“I tried,” he said with a smirk. “I couldn’t do it. I felt so miserable.”
He rubbed his cheek with his normal hand. His arm rested on the edge of the tub. His
eyes never wavered from her. Those deep orbs seemed to smile at her.

“I don’t know if it’s because of all the time I spent in a vegetative state, but I feel
scared and uneasy when I can’t control my body.” He was pretending to be weak.
“Lee-yeon, hurry. I want to wash up fast and rest.”
Lee-yeaon was scared but she couldn’t just up and leave. She didn’t want to rile him.
Nothing good would come out of aggravating a man when his memory was supposedly
returning.
“I will use the towels to wash you,” said Lee-yeon, getting the towels from the hanger.
“Unbuckle me first.”
Lee-yeon put her hand in the tub. The temperature warmed and soothed her. She
carefully touched his pant. He let out a little sigh. Lee-yeon had closed her eyes. When
she opened them, she saw his face very close.
“That’s not the spot, Lee-yeon,” he said.
“What?”
“Those are my balls you are touching,” he said with a smirk. “Go a little higher for the
zip.”
She snatched her hand back in surprise. Kwon Chae-woo’s smile disappeared. He then
grabbed her arms and pulled her into the tub with him.
Her clothes were all wet now. Lee-yeon pushed his chest away and lifted her head in
anger. “Don’t play around!” she yelled.
“You started it.” She wanted to wipe that smirk off his face.
“I did not!”
“How can I not be furious when my own wife puts me on a market?” he said. “And you
were in charge.”
Weren’t we done talking about that? She saw kwon Chae-woo’s scowl and realized he
had bee holding back until this moment. Their fight was just beginning.
“There are times where I want to teach you a lesson,” he said in a low voice.
“What do you…”
“What’s the point of holding the leash when you don’t even take advantage of it?” Leeyeon was speechless. What is he even talking about?
“You tremble just unbuckling my pants,” he said. “You’re so unused to me being under
you, but you thought about selling me to another woman?”
Lee-yeon stared at him. “Didn’t you find it a waste?”
He lowered his head and nibbled gently on Lee-yeon’s breast that stuck out from the
top of her brassiere.
Lee-yeon gasped. Her heart pounded at the sudden bite. Isn’t this a fight?
She tried her best to ignore the heat building down her waist and pushed him away
hard. But he was too heavy. He suddenly lifted her up and placed her on the tub. Now,
she was beneath him. The water splashed out of the tub at the movement.
“Kwon Chae-woo, t- this is….”
The body on top of her towered over her. Kwon Chae-woo looked at her with bloodshot
eyes. “If you are going to give me away, you should try me first,” he said.
Lee-yeon was speechless. “Use me properly before you dismiss me.”
“Kwon Chae-woo, it’s not like that,” she said. She couldn’t tell him the truth. She
needed to determine whether all this was his illness talking. She didn’t know how to
explain that to him. His reaction wasn’t good.
“You pretend to be so conservative whenever I come near you,” he said, ‘If you were,
why would you swap me to another woman? I didn’t think I would get backstabbed by
someone who pretends to be so loyal.”
“Kwon Chae-woo…”
“Were you always like this?” he asked. “Since you can’t throw me out directly because
you feel like I am your responsibility, you dump me on other people instead?”
Lee-yeon was so flustered. She didn’t know what to say. She wanted to defend herself
but she could only manage an occasional ‘uh’ or ‘huh’.
“Of course, I said I would do anything you wanted,” he said. “I need to clarify for the
last time. Do you really want me to fuck another woman?”
Lee-yeon was speechless. She hadn’t meant anything like that. “Is that what you
want?” he asked coldly.
Who even said that? Lee-yeon realized miserably that his thoughts and behavior were
always so extreme. The doctor was right.
“You want that?”
“No!” She shook her head. Every time she moved; the water splashed.
“Explain to me properly. Or else I’m going to misunderstand that you’re trying to get
rid of me because you’re curious of how other’s dick tastes.”
Lee-yeon didn’t respond. What was he even talking about?
“I’m a little empty in my head so I’m self-critical,” he explained.
Lee-yeon had gotten used to his gentle, obedient side. This was completely
unexpected. Lee-yeon felt completely confused.
He spoke calmly enough but he looked angry. Lee-yeon felt frustrated. She was
completely clueless on how to handle the situation.
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her and smiled. “Is that your final answer?”
“I… what?… no.”
“It’s okay,” he said. “I understand perfectly.”
He lowered his head and sucked on Lee-yeon’s lips. He dug his tongue into her mouth.
The water splashed out of the tub. Her lips were moist so it opened readily. His eyes
were calm. His hot breath was on her skin.
He was intertwined with her from their waist, to their mouth. His strong hands
wrapped around her face as he kissed her. Every time they moved; the water spill out
of the tub. His chest pressed against hers. His tongue played with hers.
Lee-yeon gasped as his knee pried her legs apart. They were pressed so close
together. His manhood was hard and it poked against the bottom of her belly. It
brushed against her over her clothes and left her quivering.
He gathered her breasts in his rough hands. He lowered his lips from her lips to her
cheeks, then to her neck. Every time, his tongue brushed her skin, she felt the heat
build up. His hands found their way underneath her clothes in a hurry. He grabbed
her perky breasts and sucked on them. His tongue brushed over the tip.
Lee-yeon moaned. She felt weak and shivery. If her legs weren’t intertwined with his,
she would have just fallen in the water. She felt her grip on the sides of the tub
weakening.
Suddenly, she was lifted up by her waist and her pants were pulled off. While she
fumbled in surprise, his thick hands rested on her panties.

“Wait….!”
Lee-yeon pushed him away but kwon Chae-woo wouldn’t budge. He looked her in the
eye and found her lips again. His nose pressed down on her cheek. His hot palm
rubbed against her panties. She wasn’t pushing him away anymore. She felt
something for the first time in her life.
He rubbed her clit slowly. She bit her lips to withheld her moans. His strong forearm
held her to him. Kwon Chae-woo was breathless too. She gasped for breath. Every
time he kissed her and rubbed her, moans tore out of her.
Kwon Chae-woo, seeing her aroused, grabbed the back of her head and deepened his
kiss. He kissed her frantically and passionately. He kept rubbing her there, over her
panties. Her heart raced and the heat she felt boiled within her.
Kwon Chae-woo swore. He pulled at her panties, partly taking them off. She felt the
rush of water splashing against her privates. Lee-yeon took ragged breaths to calm
herself.
“Kwon Chae-woo,” she mumbled. “You are sick right now.’
His hands stopped. Lee-yeon panted and tried to calm her breathing. His eyes
acknowledged her. “Yes, I am. My dick is.”
“That’s not what I meant!”
Lee-yeon bit her lips. Kwon Chae-woo continued fondling her and making it harder for
her to explain. She pushed him as hard as she could. “Kwon Chae-woo,” she said, “Just
listen. The doctor told me that there are many symptoms accompanying your
syndrome. It includes aggressiveness, impulsiveness, hypersexuality. These symptoms
fit you. This is what you are doing right now!”
Kwon Chae-woo stared at her. His eyes looked so innocent. “Just calm yourself,” she
said. “This might just be part of your symptoms. This compulsion and your horniness.
It could be your disease. So, just stop for a moment.”
He scoffed. He tucked a stray hair behind her ears. His hand was gentle but his eyes
were dark. “That is just nonsense,” he said. “You just want to believe that.” He got off
her and leaned against the wall. “The doctors might not be right all the time. But you
were so easily persuaded. Do you think I don’t know what my own body wants?”
He washed his face and ran his fingers through his hair to get them out of his eyes.
“Maybe you’re right,” he said. “let’s say my brain is screwed up and I become hard
whenever I see you.”
The crusted blood fell in rivulets down his face. “Since, I am not well, does that mean I
can act as sick as I want?”
She was then lifted up and placed harshly on the bed. Lee-yeon was reminded of their
second meeting when he had woken up from his vegetative state and then attacked
her.
“K-Kwon Chae-woo…,” she tried to protest. He crawled on top of her.
“Yes?”
“Please. This is…”
“It’s because of my illness, or whatever you want to believe,” he said with smirk and
pulled her by the collar, leaning close. His lips aggressively found hers. Lee-yeon
froze, in spite of herself. Her eyes were teary.
Kwon Chae-woo suddenly stopped. He looked at her teary eyes and went quiet. He
frowned. He then sighed a sad sigh as though this caused him so much pain.
Why is he acting like this? I am the one who is scared! “Don’t do this,” she pleaded.
“Don’t take out your anger in this manner. You aren’t like this.”
Lee-yeon didn’t know him beyond the fact that he had been a murderer. But the new
person he had become hadn’t been like this. He was never aggressive or violent. He
had respected her wishes and her opinion. He had cared for her.
“Then how much more do I have to endure you?” he looked at her. His eyes looked
tired. “Do you know how many times I have to hold myself back from grabbing you
and taking you right there?” He gritted his teeth.
Lee-yeon shrank at the sound of his voice. “You tried to leave me in the mountain,” he
said. “You almost shoved me towards another woman. You ignore my emotions and
always make this syndrome an excuse.”
“You tell me, was that right of you?” he asked.
His eyes really looked bloodshot. He looked very tired. Too many things had
happened. He had to deal with Hwang Jo-yoon after waking up from his sleep, he had
climbed a tree which he had never done before. He had even gone to that social and
then to the hospital for a check-up. On top of all that, he had beaten down a boar. He
must really be exhausted.
But Lee-yeon treating him just as a patient ruined him. Kwon Chae-woo was shaken
just by her breathing. Lee-yeon thought that maybe he was mentally exhausted
because he had hurt his head.
“Perhaps, you are just playing with me because I’m a handicap?” he suggested.
Lee-yeon lowered her eyes guiltily. It wasn’t completely untrue.

“How much more do I have to endure this?”
“I am sorry,” she mumbled. Lee-yeon could have defended herself but at this time, she
though he was right. She had used him when she needed him.
“Are you playing with me because I’m a handicap?”
She had lied to him. She had fed him stories just because he had no memory of his
past life. “I am sorry. I think I did a little because I was confused.”
She had to tread carefully. A little bit of truth and honesty so that he can accept her
explanation. He had no memory of his own so she had the upper hand. Maybe she
could try and diffuse the situation. At least that was how she had rationalized so far.
But—
“Who’s really the one being swayed from the deep down.”
He bumped his forehead to hers. Their nose met and their hair got mixed. Lee-yeon
opened her eyes wide at the sudden bump and forgot about everything she was about
to say. Strangely she couldn’t say a word. She had a few excuses that came into her
mind but she couldn’t utter a word.
“I’m sorry. But I….”
I don’t believe in emotion. That was the closest thing to how she felt. But that was
something she should have been hiding because she was still pretending to be his
wife.
“I still worry about you….”
“Ok.” His voice was cold. “Then I will just be a crazy person for you.”
He pulled off her top suddenly and caressed her lower back. She felt goosebumps on
her skin because of the cold. “A crazy person with sickness of his dick erecting
uncontrollably. I can do that, if you need an excuse.” He looked at her. “So, humor
me.”
He pulled her brassier off and fondled her breasts. Her smooth skin was squished in
his thick, rough palms.
“Kwon, Chae-woo, wait….!”
He lowered his lips and took her breast in his mouth. “Kwon Chae-woo…”
His tongue brushed her tip and sent her quivering. His hands fumbled lower and took
her panties off. The cold air that touched her naked bottom felt dirty. Lee-yeon tried to
push him away weakly, but his mouth playing with her chest rendered her unable to
think. His teeth grazed on the tip and he gently bit her. He looked at her as he did it.
She moaned.
The inside of her thighs felt hot and burned. She wasn’t used to something like this.
She didn’t like this. This was all so sudden. She instinctively grabbed his writs and he
let go.
“Lee-yeon, you love me,” he said. “So, how can you doubt your husband?” he smiled
and lowered his head towards her thighs. Lee-yeon clenched her legs together but he
simply grabbed her thighs and pried them open. The hands that grabbed her bottom
was rough and firm. Kwon Chae-woo buried his lips between her legs without
hesitation.
She felt his hot breath on her skin before the tip of his nose touched her skin. Her
privates were sensitive and swollen. He sucked and nibbled on her clit and played
with it with his tongue. Lee-yeon gasped and shuddered.
He licked her and rubbed her down there, occasionally sucking her enlarged lump to
evoke pleasure. Her toes curled and she grabbed his hair. She buckled without
intending too. As his mouth played with her, she felt like she would lose her mind.
His thump pried her lower lips open and his lips and tongue became even more
tenacious. When he bit on her sensitive part gently, the heat built up so much that she
arched her back not able to take it anymore.
Her vision blurred and pin pricks of light blinded her sight. She let out a long moan.
He didn’t stop there. He drank all her fluid.
When she thought that she was gaining her sanity back, Kwon Chae-woo pulled her
bottom to him and imitated with his tongue what he wanted to do to her. He sucked
her skin even more. Her mind went blank. Her body felt weak.
Thump, thump, thump.
Her hazy mind instantly became clear when she heard the footsteps. “Someone’s
coming!” she exclaimed as she pushed his head away. She could hear them on the
stairs now leading to the second-floor window. “Kwon Chae-woo!”
Lee-yeon’s heart pounded. She was terrified that someone might see them like this,
naked. But he wouldn’t stop. He just laughed. “Kwon Chae-woo! Someone’s coming! It
must be the doctor!”
“Good.”
“What?!” She half-listed herself on her hands and glared at him. “You crazy bastard!
Let me go! What will they think if they saw us like this? What about my reputation?”
“Then I think the bastard who is coming here should know what happens when they
sneak into a newlywed’s room. And don’t worry about your reputation, I am your
husband, not a stranger.”
His lips were slippery from a clear liquid. Lee-yeon knew what it was. She looked
away.

Sweat dripped down Lee-yeon’s body when she felt door lock was being pressed.
“He even knows the password?” Kwon Chae-woo scoffed.
All this time whenever doctor visited, either Kwon Chae-woo was unconscious or Leeyeon herself opened the door for doctor. That’s why doctor standing outside the house
couldn’t understand why he found door locked this time.
Inside, despite the criticality of situation, Kwon Chae-woo sucked Lee-yeon’s neck on
purpose.
Her face colour drained, “Stop, stop! Do you hear me?”
“No.”
Lee-yeon froze at his audacity.
At the moment, they heard buzzer indicating that the password entered is incorrect.
Not giving in, doctor started pressing numbers again.
Lee-yeon felt rushed. “I told you to stop!”
Since her requests were given a deaf ear, this time, she warned Kwon Chae-woo by
hitting his head lightly.
He lifted his brow with an odd expression. “If I stop…?”
“What?”
“What are you going to do for me, if I stop now?”
“Are you asking this for real?” She raised her brows.
Careful knocks were heard from outside. But to Lee-yeon, it was more of a rush than a
horsewhip.
She was trying to think of ways with which they could escape this situation. To her
surprise, she yelled because Kwon Chae-woo was touching her private part again.
“Ok!” She muttered hurriedly, controlling her erratic breaths. “I’ll do whatever you
want, anything but touching!”
“Anything?” Kwon Chae-woo smirked.
She nodded furiously, glancing at the door. He lifted the tip of her lips and completely
took his hands off her body. The moment he stood up, front door opened revealing
doctor.
Lee-yeon froze as she didn’t get a chance to hide her bottoms. But Kwon Chae-woo
was quick in wrapping a blanket over her. He lifted her up like a princess.
The doctor couldn’t believe his eyes and stammered, “Uhhh…”.
By then, Kwon Chae-woo covered her entirely with a blanket. There was not even a
single hair shown.
Kwon Chae-woo glared at the intruder aggressively and soon barked, “You didn’t learn
ethics in elementary school?”
Purposely, he picked a fight while going downstairs. All this while doctor felt lost. His
mind was numb remembering Lee-yeon’s pants and lace panties that laid carelessly on
the bed.

“You have to put me down!” Lee-yeon yelled when Kwon Chae-woo continued holding
her. They came back to the room a while ago.
Insides of blanket felt hot and stuffy. Her eyes finally met him when the blanket that
was covering her head went down.
Kwon Chae-woo didn’t break the eye lock rather frowned his brows.
Frowning deeper, he confessed, “I still don’t know the password of this house. But
that bastard pressed it like it was his home.” He was gritting her teeth. I don’t know
the number to the backdoor either.
The backdoor was meant to be used only by the medical staff. Whereas second floor
was renovated by Kwon Chae-woo’s brother.
“What’s the password?”
Her body turned stiff, and gaze shifted downwards. She obviously had nothing to
respond.
He added, “I swear I won’t let it go if it’s our wedding anniversary, your birthday, or
your cell phone number which that bastard pressed so naturally.”
“Who?” Lee-yeon felt stupid at her question.
Ignoring, he further remarked, “C’mon, think of it, I don’t know anything. Is it from
our wedding anniversary, your birthday and cell phone number?”
Lee-yeon was silent.
“Why do I know nothing?” He hugged Lee-yeon hard and dug his face. He rubbed his
head so hard that her shoulders were hurting despite blanket was acting as a cushion.
“I’m your husband but I know you less than others. I feel so impatient whenever this
happens.” His left cheek brushed her ears instantly transferring his warmth.
“Even though I probably knew before,” he continued.
No, you didn’t! Lee-yeon tried hard to cover up her blank expressions. She loosened
herself from his hold and consoled, “It’s, ok. You are hurt.”
He creepily mumbled, “But I still can’t forgive myself.”
Slowly determination took over. He continued, “Let’s start with the backdoor
password. To avoid this helpless feeling, I need to know everything concerning you
and your life.”
“Uh,” she was tongue-tied. “I can’t.”
He was being unnecessarily curious.
It was only better if Kwon Chae-woo decently ignored housework. But as he was
getting used to the fact of losing past memories, he was inevitably getting interested.
Into Lee-yeon and everything around her.
He didn’t care to ask about his past, family or hobbies, but he was showcasing this
weird obsession about Lee-yeon.
Her head hurt thinking of ways to escape this situation. “Kwon, Kwon Chae-woo,” she
called.
At last, the thing that can turn his attention stuck her. “By the way, in my life, I’ve
never made that sound before.”
sex it is. She knew she hit jackpot when his eyes loosened up and his face suddenly
became blank.
“You want to keep doing that with me?” Lee-yeon squirmed her hand out and touched
his lips.
He turned his head. His ears revealed him blushing.
“You need to get better quickly. I’ve only touched trees before, so I’m not even
surprised at something that’s just normal hard!” She exclaimed.
Silence.
“So, put your bandage on and recover quickly.”
“Are you doing this on purpose?” He clenched her chin hard without meeting her eyes.
The man’s Adam’s apple moved as he felt anxious. “When are you going to stop
making me such a fool? You’re comparing me to a tree-” He didn’t finish his sentence
as he kicked his tongue in frustration.
“So, I can get my hopes up.”
“Pardon?” Lee-yeon passed him an odd look
“Your palms that only touched trees.”
A brief silence passed.
“I’ll become better quicker.” He was all time pressing his lips. Soon, the tip of his lips
squirmed oddly like he was trying to hold back laughter.
Lee-yeon went blank. She dug her face within her knees. The corner of her heart was
becoming dark. She really didn’t like this part about herself.

It was dark outside. It’s an everyday routine for sky to turn gloomy for some people by
the time night arrives.
Lee-yeon was staring at the man that was sobbing like he was having a nightmare.
The man who was aggressive, wily, and was extreme during the day became a weak
boy each night.
One hardly knows who really wants to cry.
“Go,” Inhaling heavily, Kwon Chae-woo whispered.
Lee-yeon chose to stay silent and be by his side.
“I’ll come…” He continued murmuring one thing or other which she couldn’t decipher.
Another set of tears escaped his eyes which Lee-yeon wiped with calm expression. Whenever she watched Kwon Chae-woo’s nights, her heart felt heavy. Why is this man
so sad?
One day he was looking for someone, someday he was hiding it, some day he was
running away. Why?
Lee-yeon stood up. She couldn’t bear watching his trembling lips. His condition was
deeply affecting her. But for some reason, she didn’t want to leave him alone tonight.
She slowly made her way outside and went downstairs. The office that was filled of
smell of soil and herbs was now messy with bunch of stuff.
She opened drawer after drawer, rummaging each one for a while. Finally, she fished
her hand out with an old CD. Her eyes were glistening with happiness.
That CD was the first gift she received from someone special. This memory is also
linked with the first tree.
Her fingers stopped at the roughness behind the old surface of CD. It was a classic
record. Noting down one of the titles in her cell phone’s notepad, she placed CD back
inside her drawer.
Going upstairs, her footsteps were light. She again lied beside Kwon Chae-woo and
played must on her smartphone.
[Bach: Suite for Cello Solo No. 1 In G, BWV 1007-1. Prelude]
Only the man’s crying mixed with the melody of this masterpiece was being absorbed
with the night like moonlight. Otherwise, the room was quiet and only had a sleeping
lamp on.
While listening to the music she missed for the longest time, Lee-yeon was hoping
Kwon Chae-woo would fall into deep slumber.
For the first time, moons and stars together witnessed how the man’s crying started to
calm.

“You just have to go and smile!”
“But I still don’t want to do that.” Lee-yeon frowned and turned her head.
Choo-ja who was shaking evening dress covered in a vinyl bag glared at her.
Today, there was a celebration party for the owner of Joorim Seedling Park Limited,
an agricultural corporation celebrating 40th year.
For all the people working in agriculture or forest industry, Chairman Lim has been
that superstar who cannot be forgotten. He has been effectively maintaining this
region for years. And Choo-ja strongly felt Lee-yeon should show up before him.
Lee-yeon opposed the thought. She didn’t want to do it because of the dress Choo-ja
was holding.
As Choo-ja noticed the way Lee-yeon was looking at it, she spoke first. “Not again! It’s
not revealing and looks nice.” Choo-ja knows how Lee-yeon preferred to keep herself
wrapped completely and was extremely careful when choosing a dress for her.
The calm mermaid dress with square neck.
Because of thick green, it looked elegant. The length that reached her calves and the
line that emphasized her waist was luxurious.
Lee-yeon, who was looking at it without any expression, pointed at her bedroom, “In
my closet, I have lots to wear.”
“Please! Those aren’t clothes but mere covers.” Choo-ja flashed her eyes like she
wouldn’t back down.
Kwon Chae-woo walked downstairs.
His black suit highlighted long legs and straight shoulder line. Suit covering him
looked like his natural skin. Neither did he pull the sleeves up or stretched his neck
while touching the collars.
Hair which reached underneath his eyebrows, untied tie and white socks—he looked
dishevelled but nonetheless dashing. Lee-yeon couldn’t take her eyes off him.
It felt as if she never knew this man. The shiny black raincoat. Loose patient clothes.
Her mind suddenly popped up a nonsense thought. What if he’s not the real Kwon
Chae-woo?
And this thought nowhere made her happy.
Choo-ja’s voice broke her trance. “Now I can only trust my son-in-law.” She handed
over Lee-yeon’s clothes to Kwon Chae-woo.
Kwon Chae-woo was quick in exchanging glances between dress in his hold and
pouting Lee-yeon. Understanding, he lifted the tip of his lips.
“I believe in you.”
“Choo-ja-” Lee-yeon glare-warned her but Choo-ja turned her back pretending she saw
no warnings coming her way. Her ability to ignore was as high class as her quick wit.
It wasn’t like Choo-ja didn’t know why Lee-yeon was trying to cover herself. She knew
her story inside out, nonetheless she was hoping for a change. She wasn’t in a rush
after 10 years long wait. But this seemed a great opportunity to initiate the same.
Someday, Lee-yeon has to come out of her cocoon and turn into a butterfly.
“Lee-yeon, you don’t like this?”
She refused to answer.
Kwon Chae-woo lifted his eyebrow and crossed his arms. “Then I’ll use it on this.”
“Use what?”
“My wish.”
“What?”
“Lee-yeon remember you told me you’ll do anything that I asked once but touching?”
Lee-yeon opened and closed her mouth. She was not in a position to speak.
“If it wasn’t for that, why would I have stopped? There was so much more for me to
lick.”
Lee-yeon was blank. Kwon Chae-woo’s wit left her flabbergasted.

The moment Lee-yeon walked her way inside the hotel, fancy wreaths fall above her, making their way into her eyes. She tightly clenched Kwon Chae-woo’s arm that she
was loosely holding.
A short sigh escaped her lips. In her head, she was all ready with her plans on ending
this quick. I’ll show my face to Chairman Lim and run.
Lee-yeon was clearly not comfortable with her outfit. Her stockings were tight around
her legs and tickled every time she walked. She was desperate in folding her knees in
and out. To top it all, square neck continued to reveal her collarbones.
She felt unfamiliar with herself. Wearing high heels, showing off her calves and slow
pace.
“Do you feel nervous?” He lowered his gaze while escorting Lee-yeon.
Lee-yeon was busy wondering how despite his casually brushed hair, he looked
differed because of a slight forehead show. His leisure demeanor was oddly stable
making him look like an adult.
Her thoughts made it difficult for her to find a single place to stare.
She took her own sweet time before answering, “Not nervous, just a little
uncomfortable.”
Her eyes travelled from his eyes till nose. There was a perfect ration between them.
His sensual lips and chin line later gathered attention. He was a sight to be seen at a
place like this.
“Are you Lee-yeon?” Jo Kyung-chun, the director of the D hospital, examined Lee-yeon
up and down; his eyes opened like a bull.
Her half-tied hair waved whenever she moved. Her white-tone skin and pretty facial
features looked rather new. Director Jo couldn’t keep his eyes off. Her thick green
dress outlined her thin body and smooth skin well.
“Wow, Hwang Jo-yoon would be surprised!”
“I’ll be off first,” Lee-yeon felt annoyed and walked past him coldly.
For a long time, she has used her fashion and smell to keep people away. It was her
way of using thorns and it worked pretty well.
Of course, there were exceptions like Hwang Jo-yoon.
She was confident that her life was different from her parents. Love and emotion
aren’t required in her life. Loneliness is the only way to save her.
“Lee-yeon, are you not feeling well. Should we leave?” Kwon Chae-woo held her hand
tightly.
She suffocated and jerked his hands off.
“No, I’m not leaving.” I’m not going to leave one step out of this line.
She pushed down what was coming up from her stomach and averted her attention to
the people who were busy laughing.
“Director!” A woman walked towards them, waving her long arms. Being owner of an
amazing body, she was wearing a black see-through dress that fit her curves perfectly.
“Umm, who are you?”
Lee-yeon blinked in surprise. There was nothing more critical than for a director of a
hospital to not recognize someone in a social gathering.
“I’m Joo Dong-mi!”
“Ah!” Lee-yeon exclaimed unintentionally. Joo Dong-mi looked complete different from
her previous version with no makeup and her big, oversized coat.
“Hi.”
“Wow! I never imagined meeting you here!” Tall and thin, flowing short hair and
elegant makeup made her look quite urban. Lee-yeon watched Joo Dong-mi pass her
glass of champagne to the server. It was smooth as if she was familiar with that
setting.
Lee-yeon questioned herself. Was she mistaken considering Joo Dong-mi, looking like
a fancy carnivorous beauty, looked more natural to her than the Joo Dong-mi that
looked plain in the emergency room?
Joo Dong-mi blinked one of her eyes adeptly as if she heard Lee-yeon’s question. She
remarked, “My uncle is the guest of honour tonight.”
“Chairman Lim?”
Joo Dong-mi smiled and nodded without a word. She lifted the tip of her lips thickly
when her eyes caught Kwon Chae-woo nicely dressed. Lee-yeon felt like her throat
swelled.
“You said you’ll tell me your name when we meet again.” Joo Dong-mi tilted her head
confidently.
Kwon Chae-woo stayed silent. His eyes were chasing Lee-yeon tenaciously with an
unknown expression.
Joo Dong-mi noticed his unwavering gaze and soon changed her target. “Can I talk to
your employee alone?” She was clearly asking Lee-yeon to leave.
Lee-yeon was about to step back as she was trying to negate her face hardening with
a smile when Kwon Chae-woo whispered quietly near her ears, “You’re not paying
attention,”
In the party full of all kinds of beautiful and loud noises, Kwon Chae-woo’s soft voice
shook her like a thunder.
“You should behave well like a married woman. Lee-yeon, there will be no forgiving
for your mistakes this time.” He said, awaiting her response.
She stuck her neck up, it was starting to get very suffocating. To her displeasure, her
thin bones lining collarbones stuck out too. Before she knew it, her heels were briskly
walking away from everything, dodging Joo Dong-mi, champagne, and dresses. Lights,
and Kwon Chae-woo.
She didn’t stop until she was enveloped with the chilly air of the night.

Lee-yeon sighed in relief. This place was less suffocating and little better.
As she mindlessly walked in the garden, many round trees cut ‘nicely’ from human’s
perspective appeared.
Lee-yeon pushed down all those random thoughts that were pushing down her heart
and started checking their health.
“Lee-yeon.”
Her back turned stern at an old voice. There was only one person this voice belonged
to.
She turned around frowning. As expected, Hwang Jo-yoon, with big gauze on his
forehead and nose, holding onto a crutch, was glaring at her. He became momentarily
blank when he noticed Lee-yeon’s dress.
“What are you wearing?”
Even though she was seeing him in horrible state, she couldn’t feel any emotion. If
anything, that bruised eye suit him well.
But if she were to feel sorry, she felt this emotion more for those trees wrapped by
thousands of small light bulbs. These light bulb decorations ruin their growth. Bulbs
slowly dries up their skin and leaves end up turning brown.
“You’re completely ignoring me now?”
She was snapped out of her train of thoughts. “The least you could do is say sorry!”
“Why should I?” Hwang Jo-yoon limped his way and pointed at her like putting a dart
in her. “Your husband isn’t normal.”
“You aren’t, as well.”
“What?”
“You think it’s normal for an educated person to rub his cheek against someone else’s
window?” Lee-yeon responded drily.
Hwang Jo-yoon’s face flushed and in response, he glared at her.

“Look at me!” Hwang Jo-yoon shouted.
“My husband must have been generous, to not have killed you.” Lee-yeon shrugged
her shoulders and tried to walk away.
“At least he gets to breathe normally, unlike me!”
Lee-yeon was bored with this conversation. Her fear of Hwang Jo-yoon no longer
plagued her. She turned to leave him behind.
“Your husband thinks he knows you better than me?!” Hwang Jo-yoon screamed.
“Does the bastard know about your family?!”
Lee-yeon stopped, frozen in her tracks at his words. Her face went blank.
“If he doesn’t know about your family, then you have a fraudulent marriage,” Hwang
Jo-yoon continued on, behind her. Lee-yeon could not think of the words in which to
respond.
“What kind of man in this world, what kind of a family, would accept a child like you?
Do you know how sensitive people are about family circumstances? This is how a
woman is judged to be worthy of marriage.”
Lee-yeon barely managed to keep her head high. She clenched her fists as tightly as
she could. Her short fingernails dug deep into her palms, bringing a sensation of pain.
“If you hid this when you got married, he could even go to a court and ask for an
annulment. If he had known about your family’s status beforehand, your husband
probably would not have even married you. He would have doubted if you were a
woman who could manage to take care of a family.”
At this moment, Lee-yeon needed a tree large enough where she could disappear
amongst the branches. Hidden in the leaves of such a tree, she could relax and
breathe in the clean air of the world.
“How can he live with the child of adulterers? It’s disgusting.” Hwang Jo-yoon was
relentless. “You are an illegitimate child. Did I not hear that your father is actually
your uncle?”
Lee-yeon felt like she was going to be sick. She covered her mouth, fighting to hold
back the bile. But Hwang Jo-yoon wouldn’t stop.
“You were born with a mess of a life from the very beginning. From filth. To think that
I pitied you and even told you, you were pretty. That’s why bastards that don’t have a
true family are…!”
Lee-yeon couldn’t hold it in any longer and bent over vomited the contents of her
stomach. Hwang Jo-yoon quickly stepped back to avoid the stream. The truth she
fought so hard to conceal was out. Lee-yeon’s aunt was several years younger than
her mother. Lee-yeon’s mother had to leave high school and raise her sister, as the
parents were absent. As time passed, each sister got married and had children.
However, when her mother suddenly became pregnant with Lee-yeon, though she had
supposedly given up sex due to her age, there was only one obvious explanation. She
had been caught in an affair with her sister’s husband. And a much younger man, as
well.
Her mother had even called it “love”. How could someone cheat on a sister who she
had raised like her own? That too, with her own brother-in-law. How was that love?
After the fact was discovered, the two adulterers fled in the night, leaving the
newborn baby behind in a shattered home. Her aunt was destroyed, betrayed by her
older sister and her husband, who had been her first love. So Lee-yeon was raised by
her aunt, and her mother’s husband who remained behind. They became Lee-yeon’s
parents, taking the place of the sinners who ran for the hills.
The only thing left, in what used to be the homes of two happy families, were the
spouses who lost their partners and the children who had lost their parents. All of
them struggled with a sense of betrayal. Lee-yeon grew to the age of seventeen in a
home that seemed as hollow as a ruin. This was why she had such anger.
The capricious aunt took care of Lee-yeon and hated her at the same time. She fed
her, whipped her when she misbehaved, and threw her on the street in the cold when
she became older. Lee-yeon remembered one day when she accidentally called the
woman who was raising her ‘Aunt’. She was forced to write a reflection letter for
hours, while sitting on the fresh welts of a whipping and tears streaming from her
eyes. She still did not understand what she had done wrong, as she repeated the
words ‘Because she was the errant child.’
Lee-yeon’s cousins/ half-brothers couldn’t stand to see her smile. Even though they
shared the same tragedy, they would accuse Lee-yeon of being responsible for the
misfortune and sin. Each year, whenever she moved up to a new class in school, they
secretly spread a wide variety of degrading rumours amongst her classmates.
She heard every single one of them: My mother told me that her mother had an affair
and ran away leaving her behind. It’s more horrible than just being born out of
wedlock. Dirty blood! If you make eye contact with her, you will die! I heard that if you
talk to her, your mom and dad will also have an affair!
The rumors had started when she entered elementary school and continued until Leeyeon became an adult. She was forced to change jobs three times. Wherever she went,
or whatever ties she cut off contact with, her cousins were there to uproot her life.
As a result, she had become wary of men, distant from people, and was happier to be
alone. It seemed like only solitude could save her. The continuance of a quiet life. Maintaining her daily routine. Living a life that complete and alone, like a tree.
She began to retreat to nature even more. The only moments she felt relaxed were
under the trees. Lee-yeon tried to become one with the plants, to exist on the same
level as them.
Hwang-Jo-yoon’s piercing voice cut through her thoughts and reflections, drawing her
back to reality. “He may hate me at first but, over time, your husband will thank me.”
Hwang Jo-yoon smiled like he had achieved a victory.
Lee-yeon’s body began to tremble once more.

Kwon Chae-woo’s face contorted in pain, his one eye twitching, as the sudden
headache split his skull like lightning. His hand was trembling as he reached out to
grab her. He stopped and placed his hands to his skull, as music added to the pain.
“Can I help you?” The woman he had been reaching for asked.
“Bach.” This was the only thing he could comprehend right now.
“What?” Joo Dong-mi looked at the man, confused by his answer. Kwon Chae-woo
looked around to find the source of the music. Joo Dong-mi followed his gaze and saw
that he was showing interest in the string music trio playing on the street. Kwon Chaewoo was staring at them with intensity.
Joo Dong-mi was accustomed to seeing wild animals in the street, cornered, and
exposing their teeth. However, something about this man disturbed her, with his
sharp eyebrows and vacant stare. She shook her head, saddened at the sight.
“Cello Solo No.1 Prelude,” Kwon Chae-woo murmured softly, his words clear
compared to his mind. Joo Dong-mi was taken aback.
“Do you like this composition?” she asked.
Kwon Chae-woo remained silent. After losing his memory, the title of the music spilled
forth from the void. There were no feelings attached to it, just a name. He broke out in
a cold sweat, as his heart begin to beat rapidly. The ensemble of strings, vibrating as
if the shrill pitches were going to tear the very fabric of reality, made him feel sick and
his breathing tight. He quickly undid his tie and pulled the top button of his collar
open.
“Hey, I know this is a cliché, but haven’t I seen you before? For some strange reason,
you look familiar.” Joo Dong-mi waited for an answer but was met with the continued
blank stare. “Are you okay? You’re sweating.”
Kwon Chae-woo instinctively looked around for So Lee-yeon. He remembered her and,
right now, he thought that only seeing her would calm his trembling heart. An image
of a cozy garden beyond a wall of glass, that extended from floor to ceiling, entered
the chaos. Standing before it, he saw Lee-yeon covering her mouth and staggering as
if drunk. The music cut off abruptly. So had every other sound. He clenched his fists in
the silence. His mind was beginning to shatter. He turned his back on the woman
before him, both on the street and in his mind, and ran.
Joo Dong-mi reached out a hand to stop him, then thought better of it. Calling after
him, she said “Next time, tell me your name and maybe I can help you.” She remained
in place for a moment as she struggled to remember where she had seen the man
before.

With both hands, Lee-yeon drank water from the fountain in the center of the garden.
After rinsing the bile out of her mouth, she contemplated running away again. As if by
instinct, she found a large tree that she could hide in and sat down behind it. She tried
to calm her erratic breathing, but she couldn’t seem to gain control of it. Lee-yeon
pulled the restrictive clothing away from her neck and concentrated on relaxing. It
had been a long time since she last hyperventilated.
Her chest ached. Unable to control the rapid breaths, she clutched at the ground with
both hands, connecting to the energy of nature. She could still see the man on the
crutches, taunting her. He was smiling in joy from his torment.
“Yeah, this is the So Lee-yeon I knew,” he had mocked in glee. “I missed you, Leeyeon. I really missed this.” He had looked her in the eyes as he slowly and
methodically crushed the plants beneath him.
“No matter how many scholars say that plants are sentient, that they have emotions, I
find the whole idea amusing. It’s just a patch of grass. I have the power to save it or
kill it. Just as I do you.”
Lee-yeon moaned as the image in her mind, once again, Hwang Jo-yoon reached out to
touch her.
But before Hwang Jo-yoon could get his hands on her, he fell on the floor with a thud.
Kwon Chae-woo stood there looking exasperated. He pulled Hwang Jo-yoon roughly up
from the ground.
“K-kwon Chae-woo,” Lee-yeon managed murmur.
“Shh,” said Kwon Chae-woo. “It’s alright. Don’t worry. Just try to breath.”
Kwon Chae-woo ripped out Hwang Jo-yoon’s tie and stuffed it in his mouth while
holding him in a choke-hold by his neck. Hwang Jo-yoon pulled at Kwon Chae-woo’s
hand desperately as though he wasn’t able to breathe. He appeared red in the face
while Kwon Chae-woo’s face only reflected coldness. Lee-yeon looked at the scene
blankly and her breath stabilized a little. Kwon Chae-woo pulled the man over to a
tree and tied him with his tie skillfully.
“Let go of me, you bastard!”
“Do you want me to tie your neck instead of your hands?” asked Kwon Chae-woo in a
low voice so that only Hwang Jo-yoon could hear him. Hwang Jo-yoon froze.
“I think I explained it very clearly to you the last time… we met.”
“Ugh…” He struggled pitifully.
“Don’t you know that the more you do this, the more I get excited to make you
suffer?” said Kwon Chae-woo. “Stupid bastards who think they are tough really kill
me.”
Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes glittered. Hwang Jo-yoon swallowed. After he was beaten by
Kwon Chae-woo, he had gone to get a medical certificate as evidence so that he could
put Kwon Chae-woo behind bars. But around dawn, he had gotten a call from Director
Jo Kyung-cheon.
“There’s someone here who wants to see you. But exactly how do you know this guy?”
Director Jo Kyung-cheon had repeatedly told him to not trigger the guy because he
had a hard time with the person.
At the drinking party, Hwang Jo-yoon met a man who seemed to be the same age as
him at best. Despite the location, there was not a single bottle of alcohol in sight. A
face without the hint of a smile, hair shaved like a soldier…
“You!” he had cried in that bar. It had been the man from next door! The bastard had
ignored Hwang Jo-yoon’s call for help when he was dragged away by Kwon Chae-woo!
At that moment, a yellow envelope fell at his feet.
“This is the message from the director,” the man had said.
Director? Who’s the director? Hwang Jo-yoon had looked around. He blinked at the
incomprehensible situation, and then picked up the envelope. When he checked the
contents, he turned pale. The man had noticed his stiff face and gotten up from his
seat. “Don’t be foolish.”
“Who the hell are you people?!”
When Hwang Jo-yoon was an undergraduate, he once sold cannabis seedlings that he
had secretly grown to teenagers. He was almost put behind bars, but his record was
erased with the help of Professor Jo Kyung-cheon. Why the hell is this here…
“Jo Kyung-cheon is smart, but it seems like the same cannot be said about you.” The
man told him, “Do I have to teach you the direction that you have to bow? If you had
fun with young masterjust go home and wipe your feet, why get the medical
certificate?”
“What do you mean, young master―?”
The man pointed at his wrecked face. “The director is watching you, Hwang Jo-yoon.”
Kwon Ki-seok, CEO of Suguk Pharmaceutical. Jo Kyung-cheon had become a professor
with the support from the Kwon family. They were still behind the scenes regarding
everything, acting as a sponsor.
Is he really just about 40 years old?
Suguk Pharmaceutical, which ranked No. 1 in pharmaceutical company brand
reputation, was a company that gained more fame because of its young and handsome
CEO. That was no comfort. Hwang Jo-yoon suffered a sense of defeat whenever he saw
his bruised face in the mirror. So Director Kwon and ‘young master’ are somehow
related? Young master, my ass! He was a thug and a bully. Hwang Jo-yoon gritted his
teeth.

“You are making a mistake! I was trying to help you!”
Kwon Chae-woo turned away from Hwang Jo-yoon. He struggled with all his might,
struggling where he was bound to the tree.
“I’m trying to help you before you get trapped by a gold digger, damn it! Do you know
what kind of bitch So Lee-yeon is?”
Kwon Chae-woo walked to Lee-yeon and leaned down to her. He hugged her quietly.
His hands wrapped around her and pulled her close. She didn’t push him away.
“She is from a completely broken family! And that’s because the same family members
fell in love with each other and committed adultery —”
“I know.”
“You know?” asked Hwang Jo-yoon in disbelief.
“I’m her husband, of course I know everything about her. She told me.” Kwon Chaewoo dismissed Hwang Jo-yoon. He pulled Lee-yeon to him and hugged her. Lee-yeon
could finally breathe a little properly. Hwang Jo-yoon tried to spread his venom again.
But they ignored him as they walked in the garden away from him.
“Kwon Chae-woo?”
“Hm?”
“The tree,” said Lee-yeon. “If leave him tied around it, the branches might break. It
might harm the tree.”
He pressed his lips to her forehead. His heart ached for her. She was in pain but still
she worried about her trees.
“The staff will find him soon enough and let him go,” said kwon Chae-woo. “But now is
not the time for you to worry about trees, Lee-yeon.”
“What?”
“I told you that I’m ruthless, didn’t I?” he said. “If you run away, then don’t get
caught.” He went deeper into the garden with Lee-yeon. His headache disappeared
like it had never been there in the first place.
“You!” Hwang Jo-yoon trebled as he saw the man appear in front of him. The same
man he had met in the bar.
“I told you to live quietly.” The man was in a server’s costume as though he had just
been serving guests in the party.
“Fuck Director Kwon,” shouted Hwang Jo-yoon. “You are all thugs! Every time you
open your mouth, you threaten people. Do you think the stench of bullies can be
covered so easily?”
“Who is So Lee-yeon’s husband?” asked Hwang Jo-yoon. “Is he a thug too? Does he kill
people as well?”
Jang Beom-hee suddenly raised his head from his phone. He had been putting up a
front like a veteran soldier but he had momentarily lost his composure.
“Young master is different from us.”
He pressed send on the phone. It read: Get the bucket ready.
After a while, only a tie remained on the tree, swaying in the wind. The man was no
longer seen.

“I am sorry,” said Kwon Chae-woo. “I did explain very clearly to that bastard to not
bother you again. But I didn’t expect him to appear in front of you again.”
The Venus Garden, the pride of Hwaido Grand Hotel, was mysterious and beautiful.
Kwon Chae-woo led Lee-yeon towards the thicket of trees. Lee-yeon followed quietly.
They sat down under the largest tree they could find.
“Did you… did you hear what Hwang Jo-yoon said about my family?”
“What do you mean?”
“My… family story.” She couldn’t look at him. However, kwon Chae-woo didn’t care
about that. He wanted to tuck her hair behind her ear.
“We are a married couple,” he said. “Of course, I would have known, wouldn’t I? It’s
just I forgot it with the rest of my past.”
So, you don’t know about it…. It all felt absurd and strange to her. Just a while ago he
was acting cranky because he didn’t know anything about her. Here he was now
claiming he might know about everything just to comfort her.
“I… I didn’t tell you. Even before marriage,” she said. “I deceived you.”
A heavy silence fell between them. Lee-yeon dreaded what came next. She had
confessed now. Even if it wasn’t the whole truth. She had deceived him. She was even
deceiving him right now.
The Kwon Chae-woo burst into laughter.
Lee-yeon was confused. She didn’t know what she had expected. Anger, maybe. But
his laughter didn’t match the situation at all. She looked at him. Kwon Chae-woo
leaned back on the tree with his hands behind his head. He looked so relaxed.
“Then why are you telling me now?” he asked.
“What?”
“Are you implying that I am now more reliable and trustworthy than I was before?” He
looked at her. “Is this a confession?”
How did it get interpreted that way? He squinted his eyes in the sun and smiled at
her. His eyes only looked at her, unwaveringly.
“Lee-yeon, if you do this suddenly, then I might get turned on. Just saying.”
“No… I… it’s not like that,” said Lee-yeon hurriedly. “I just meant that I led you on.
You were led on by a woman with a complicated family history. Think of the situation a
little!”

"I maybe an idiot, so I don't know about that," he dabbed at his dry lips. "But if it is you, I think I like being led on."

Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes were twinkling and it lit up the night. She stared at him blankly
for a while and then blushed. She bit her lip in nervousness.
“I am not a gold-digger…” she mumbled.
“A shame,” he said. “I wouldn’t mind you being one and coming after me.”
“You’re broke,” said Lee-yeon, amused.
“Didn’t you say my family was rich?”
“They are very scary.”
Lee-yeon sighed. “My family was a complete mess.” It was better to not get close to
people too much. She felt torn. She wanted to tell him about her family while still
wanting to build a wall around her.
“We were related by blood,” she said. “But we couldn’t really bring ourselves to be a
family.”
Kwon Chae-woo listened patiently. “I was called Song-yeon at home,” she said.
“Song-yeon?”
She nodded. “It was sort of like a nickname.” When the name So Lee-yeon is written
vertically, it read as Song-yeon. So that name had stuck with her. “Song-yeon is the
soot from burning pine trees.” Lee-yeon paused. “I was considered a dirty stain on the
image of my family.”
Just then, there was an eruption of noise and fireworks lit up the sky. She could
distantly hear people cheering and applauding. Lee-yeon couldn’t take her eyes off the
dazzling and colourful shower of light in the sky.
If only they could fill my empty heart with warmth, thought Lee-yeon. I would do
anything not to miss my family.
“Is that how you’ve been seeing yourself till now?” His calm eyes looked at her. “As a
stain or soot? Is that how you see yourself?”
His gentle eyes made her heart ache. His eyes seem to urge her for an answer. His
eyes were like mirrors. And she didn’t see herself reflected as a stain or soot in his
eyes. It made her see herself, for the first time, as an independent and resilient
woman who had survived despite all odds. A Tree Doctor, a caregiver. She had
overcome bullying from her co-workers and cousins. She had thrived in spite of
difficult conditions.
“Do you know that after a forest fire, the tree still lives and makes a forest anew?’
“Hm… and?” he asked.
“I might have been Song-yeon but now I am a Tree Doctor.”
He smiled at her. “I have built myself up anew,” she said, her voice cracking. She
managed to smile and didn’t mind the welling up of tears in her eyes.
A barren childhood had prevented her from putting down her roots. At a time when
she should have been discovering the world and growing up strong, she had rotted
and dried. With thorns in her life, he had only learnt to distance herself from others.
She had painful memories but she had tried her best. Maybe a flower would not bloom
in a place like this but… maybe someone…
She had hoped that someone could tell her that she had done her best and it was
enough. That she was good enough.
“It might not be pretty, but it’s me.”
The fireworks erupted again. Kwon Chae-woo smiled brightly at her. His smile was so
warm that it melted her heart. He wrapped his rms around her and pulled her close.
“I knew it!” he said.
“What?”
“I didn’t think a person who even picks up fallen petals from the ground with so much
care would ever think of herself as a dirty stain.”
Fireworks went off one after another simultaneously. People cheered. But Lee-yeon
couldn’t hear anything else. It was as though she was removed from the rest of the
world. She was only aware of her closeness with Kwon Chae-woo and her pounding
heart. It was different from how she had met him in the mountains months before.
Lee-yeon clenched her sweaty hands. At that moment, she thought of running away.
But she stayed her ground. “I wanted to live a quiet life away from people. I was afraid
of them. I was afraid of how they saw me. I chose trees instead of people,” She
blurted. “They accepted me. Trees don’t have prejudices. The forest was the only
place where I felt safe, but….”
He was still looking at her patiently. “But you…”
She looked at him. “You constantly….” She trailed off.
“Go on,” he urged.
“You are poisonous,” she blurted. “I think so. I think you are poisonous.” She suddenly
skipped over what she had wanted to say. She panicked.
He was patient. He waited. He knew she was dancing around the words she actually
wanted to utter. He would let her.
“So?” he asked.
His calm and steady voice helped her gather herself. “So… I…”
Another batch of fireworks lit up the sky.
“I think I really do have a second husband. A new man.”
“What?” he asked, now utterly confused.
“I no longer see the old Kwon Chae-woo. You are a changed man,” Lee-yeon declared.
She looked as though what she said was embarrassing. She didn’t know whether to
laugh or cry at herself.

“Something is going on between you two, isn’t there?” Lee-yeon raised the cup of
coffee to her mouth.
She often seemed lost in thought and Kwon Chae-woo had no eyes for anything except
her. Choo-ja was certain something had happened between them.
“What?” Lee-yeon asked. Her hands holding the coffee cup trembled slightly.
Choo-ja narrowed her eyes. “Did you do it with him?”
“What?”
“Was it good?”
“Choo-ja!”
“Looks like you perfectly know what I am talking about.” Choo-ja laughed. She smiled
teasingly at Lee-yeon who was fanning herself and trying to hide her blushing cheeks.
Lee-yeon had been seventeen when her parents had run away. They had met their
deaths on the same day. Choo-ja had met the girl at the funeral. She had been skinny
and pale with long black hair. She had looked like a ghost herself.
Her father’s funeral had been in the room on the left and her mother’s, on the right.
The girl had looked very lost in between. In the end, the girl had lowered her head and
stood there frozen. The townspeople who came to pay their respects frowned at her.
Choo-ja, at that time, had just reunited with the love of her life. She had seen the girl
at the funeral. Apparently, one of them was her fiancé’s distant relative. Ch—ja had
glanced at the young girl while she helped with the funeral. Lee-yeon had stood there
numb and frozen as though she couldn’t feel anything anymore.
Like a dead tree.
Nobody went near her or talked to her. Only the family that was in mourning directed
at her a murderous look from time to time.
They looked at her as though they were going to cut down this dead tree if they had
the chance. It was a bizarre moment.
However, Choo-ja was quick to see that no matter how they looked at her, Lee-yeon
was the one who held the family together.
The family came together in shared hatred for her. Not love.
Choo-ja understood that someone who grew up in families like that would lack the
ability to trust someone else. Despite being so young, she had looked so tired and
despairing.
Choo-ja had been mesmerized by her at that time. Lee-yeon was kicked out of her
family’s house after that and she kept transitioning between her distant relatives’
households. In the end, Choo-ja had asked the poor girl to come live with her and her
lover. The three of them had lived happily. Until Choo-ja’s fiancé, the poet, had passed
away from cancer.
He was the first and the last man Choo-ja gave her heart to. Lee-yeon had watched her
live in love. This time Choo-ja wanted to do the same. She wanted to see Lee-yeon
surrounded by love.
“Lee-yeon.”
“Yes?”
“Don’t be afraid.”
Lee-yeon stared at Choo-ja.
“I know you have grown up in a place without much love or happiness, but you are
strong.” Sometimes, Choo-ja couldn’t figure out whether Lee-yeon was strong or
actually foolish. She didn’t know whether Lee-yeon was frugal or hopeless. But Chooja wanted Lee-yeon, for once, to desire more for herself. She wanted Lee-yeon to take
a chance in life with people.
Neither Hwaido nor the hospital, may she find the home she so misses, Choo-ja
prayed.
“Love can sometimes appear like a natural disaster which destroys everything in its
wake,” said Choo-ja. “But not everyone ends up like your parents.”
Lee-yeon’s face darkened at the mention of her parents.
“You already know the joy of love.”
“What?”
“Is it a singing tree?”
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened.

The little girl who isolated herself from everyone else in the world started to heal. She
felt welcomed in the lush greenery, away from people.
“Lee-yeon, what are you thinking about?”
“Trees.”
Kwon Chae-woo raised his eyebrows at her answer.
This day was same as every other day except Choo-ja had gotten mad at her for
leaving the celebrations in the middle. But the celebrations were days ago.
『Recently, illegal harvesting of forest products such as matsutake mushrooms, pine
nuts, wild medicinal herbs, and wild ginseng has been on the rise. 』
The voice of the new reporter on the TV filled the living room. Lee-yeon hadn’t been
herself after the celebrations. She often found herself spacing out and staring blankly
at nothing in particular.
『Recently, their method has become more sophisticated. They began to move
systematically to avoid crackdowns. Reporter Hwang Ji-yeon on the report』
Suddenly, the TV was turned off and static flared on the surface of the screen. It was
only then that she was wrenched back to the present. Lee-yeon turned her head in
confusion and met Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes, who held his chin up on his palm and
looked at her.
“Why did you turn off the TV?”
“I don’t know. Maybe I need attention,” said Kwon Chae-woo. His eyes looked dreamy
and he had a ready smile on his lips. It gave her goosebumps. “What should I do to get
your attention? Should I bite your shoes and bark like a dog?” he leaned closer to Leeyeon.
“You always leave me alone,” he said. “What are you thinking about so intensely? You
seem more lost these days than ever before.”
“I…um…,” mumbled Lee-yeon. ‘I was thinking about a… tree.” Lee-yeon scratched her
head. She wasn’t lying.
A singing tree…
Choo-ja had brought up precious memories from her past that Lee-yeon had forgotten.
She had never expected for her past to come up.
“A tree…,” kwon Chae-woo frowned. “My wife seems to be lost in thought about thick
trees and she can’t even spare a second to look at her husband’s dick.”
“It’s not like that!” Lee-yeon protested.

His face didn’t change. Lee-yeon knew Kwon Chae-woo could be annoying when he
sulked. “You know the hospital. I named it after a tree I liked when I was young. I was
just recalling that.”
It was that tree that had given her hope to live when she had found herself despairing
at seventeen years of age. She still remembered the forest vividly. The lush green
grass. Sunlight filtering through the leaves. Lee-yeon had met a singing tree in that
forest.
It was the only precious and warm memory she had of her childhood.
“Now that you can’t give me away to someone else, you are trying to evade me
mentally?”
Lee-yeon was going to protest when Kwon Chae-woo gently grabbed her chin and
turned her face to look him in the eye. It seemed that she had been spacing out again
without realizing it. His calm eyes reflected her face.
“I can tell what you’re lost again just from your face.”
Lee-yeon smiled awkwardly.
“Didn’t you say you were from a conservative family?”
“I am,” she said.
“Then it seems you are only conservative towards me.” He shook his head slowly. “Am
I boring?”
“What?” asked Lee-yeon.
“I understand that I might not be so much fun to be with,” he said. “You are only
interested in tress, and I am not interesting enough to get your attention.” He stared
at her in disappointment. He leaned back on the sofa and closed his eyes.
He sighed. “I’d rather be a vegetative man again,” he said. “Because you will only
think of me then.”
Lee-yeon was speechless. She didn’t know what to say.
“When will the day come when you can love only me?” His melancholic voice hit her
like a pack of bricks. Her words tugged at her heart. Kwon Chae-woo opened his eyes
and looked at her.
The soft carpet touched her feet. She could feel the warm fabric of the sofa. She was
aware of even the flowerpots that filled her living room.
A deafening silence fell. Each second felt like an hour.
Bzzz. Bzzz.
Lee-yeon’s phone started ringing and ripped apart the silence in the room. Her face
hardened as she stared at her phone screen. Lee-yeon abruptly got up from the sofa.
“Who is it?” asked Kwon Chae-woo.
“Nobody,” she said.
She rejected the call with her trembling fingers. She dropped her hands by her side
still clutching the phone. It rang again. Lee-yeon glanced at her phone again. Kwon
Chae-woo leaned over and snatched the phone from her hands before she had time to
move it away.
“No!” she shouted. “Kwon Chae-woo!”
He frowned at the name on the phone screen. Kwon Ki-seok.
Lee-yeon lunged at him to get her phone back. But he dodged her and accepted the
call.
“Hello,” said Kwon Chae-woo.
Lee-yeon glared at him. He turned the speaker ‘on’ and placed the phone on the sofa.
Lee-yeon froze. She was at a loss for ideas.
“Who are you?” asked Kwon Chae-woo.
The man on the other side did not speak. Kwon Chae-woo clenched his teeth. Who is
this bastard that startles Lee-yeon so much?
“It’s your brother,” said the man on the phone. Lee-yeon could hear the smirk in his
voice. She flinched.
Kwon Chae-woo raised an eyebrow at her, questioningly. He was asking her if that
was true. Lee-yeon gave a nod.
“So Lee-yeon,” said the voice. It reminded her of a slippery, poisonous snake. “How
are you?”
“Hello,” she squeaked out.
“I have been very busy with work, so I haven’t kept in contact,” said the man.
Lee-yeon closed her eyes in fear. She wished this nightmare would end. Such a bad
timing! If any of us lets anything slip, it’s all over.
One slip and everything she had created will fall. She will be exposed. Lee-yeon bit
her lips.
“I heard the news,” came the voice from the phone. “I know he woke up and is not in a
normal state.”
Lee-yeon glanced at Kwon Chae-woo.
“But it seems you are interesting after all,” said the man.
“I am sorry? What do you mean?” asked Lee-yeon, dreading the worse.
“To do such a thing,” said the voice. “How reckless!”
“Well… I…,” stammered Lee-yeon. Her heart was beating so viciously she thought it
would burst. She recalled the bloody slaughterhouse that she was dragged into. She
remembered everything with vivid details. She even remembered grabbing the
contractor’s hand as she hung from the cliff.
He knew! He knew the lies she had concocted to tame his brother. He knew
everything!
“Of course, I understand why you must have done it,” continued the intimidating
voice. “Maybe you did it without knowing what kind of a man he is. But… you have
made a big mistake.”
Lee-yeon felt like she would suffocate. She was about to bury her head in her hands
when she felt Kwon Chae-woo’s gently taking her hands in his. The tall tree, the
moonlit night, and the fireworks flashed through her mind.
“It’s alright,” he said to her. “I don’t care. I can’t even remember his face anyway, so I
can’t really believe all this bullshit. I am not even curious about my family.” Kwon
Chae-woo frowned.
“What are you talking about?” said the voice from the phone.
What if Kwon Ki-seok blurts out everything? Lee-yeon closed her eyes and prepared
herself for the worse. She had a feeling that this was all going to go down terribly.
“I am talking about the competition. I heard that you are participating in the bidding?”
said the voice, suddenly turning friendly in tone. “I just wanted to warn you that the
screening process might be extremely difficult. They will try everything to make you
lose. You are the only female director participating. Also, it’s a big project. They won’t
choose a random small hospital for it unless you show them something different and
formidable.”
Lee-yeon dropped her hands. She didn’t know what to do. At the same time, she felt a
sense of relief. She had thought that Kwon Ki-seok would have revealed everything
just to spite her. What is he playing at?



---

Continue in part 2!!

